ftp://oak.grove.iup.edu/compsci/GLOSSARY.TXT;1

* - 
(1) a symbol for multiplication in programming languages.
(2) a wildcard character that stands for 0 or more characters.
(3) see Kleene star.

.dia - 
the extension that lse assigns to a file of diagnostic messages it generates
from a compile/review command.

.lis -
the default extension for a compilation listing in VMS (and other listing
output from VMS system processes).  If you enter a type or print command
without an extension, .lis is the default extension.

.map - 
the extension that VMS assigns to one of the optional files generated by the
"link" command.  See $ help link.  Note that a batch "submit" task assumes that
you want a .map file, while an interactive "@" execution of a .com file assumes
that you do not want a .map file.

4GL - 
a popular acronym for "fourth generation language."  A fourth generation
language is a "very high level language" (VHLL) concept in which the
programming language supports the first three of the following concepts
directly, and often provides  support for the fourth concept:

    (1) non-procedural programming
    (2) report writers
    (3) screen painters and data collection
    (4) relational database management

A man a plan a canal Panama - 
an example of a palindrome (if spaces and upper/lower case are not considered).

abend - "abnormal end of program"

ABET - Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology

abeyance file -
a file of transactions that are rejected by a batch validation program.
Synonym: "suspense file".

absence check -
a data validation check which assures that data for a field is not entered in a
transaction where that data is inappropriate.  For example, a mail-order
transaction may have included sales tax where it is not required by law.  See
Welburn & Price, page 380.

absolute address - 
an explicit machine address, which is specified without the use of any
intermediate reference.

abstract data type (ADT) - 
a concept for a data object, together with operations that manipulate it and
relations that test its properties. An ADT is specified without regard to how
it is implemented in a particular programming language or computer system.  The
procedures and functions that are part of the ADT are called the "interface" to
the ADT.  The word "abstract" refers to the fact that details of the data
structure and its operations are "encapsulated" or "hidden".  (See also
information hiding, encapsulation, class.) 

abstraction - 
the process of modeling something in general terms, using symbols for key
features and leaving other features unspecified.

access - see "file access"

ACE/ODT -
Advanced Computing Environment/Open Desktop Unix, the Unix system to which DEC
hopes to migrate its Ultrix users.

ACK - the acknowledge character (see acknowledge character)

acknowledge character -
(1) (ISO) a transmission control character transmitted by a station as an
affirmative response to the station with which connection has been set up.

(2) A transmission control character transmitted by a receiver as an
affirmative response to a sender.  An acknowledge character may also be used as
an accuracy control character.  (see negative acknowledge character)

ACM - Association for Computing Machinery

ACRF - The Advanced Computing Research Facility at Argonne Labs

acronym -
a word formed from a combination of initial letters from several words.  For
example, ACM for Association for Computing Machinery; bit for binary digit; and
radar, for radio distancing and ranging.

There are several conventions for using acronyms.  An acronym is usually chosen
to be mnemonic, that is, easy to remember.  An acronym that is not
pronounceable is spelled out when it is spoken.  An acronym which is jargon is
capitalized, while one which has become part of common language, such as radar,
is printed in lowercase.  Pronounceable names of programming languages are
often not capitalized, such as Pascal, Fortran and Cobol.

The first time that an acronym which is jargon is used in a printed document,
the words that it is derived from are printed in full followed by the acronym
in parentheses.  For example, Association of Computing Machinery (ACM).

activity ratio -
The "file activity ratio" is the number of master file records
affected by a batch of transactions divided by the number of records
on the master file. For example, the IUP class schedule Fall 1994 may
contain 4,000 records with a batch of changes in June that affect 600
records.

actual argument -
in Fortran jargon, the identifier or value that is passed from a program to a
subprogram in the CALL statement or function expression. This term is
synonymous with the term "argument" as it is used in other contexts.

ad hoc -
something that is done with only a particular goal in mind and without
consideration for broader application or ramifications. This is not a CS term,
but we do a lot of it.

Ada - 
a higher-level programming language developed for the DoD in 1975-79 and
published as ANSI/MIL-STD-1815A standard in 1983.  Ada, the language, is named
after Ada Lovelace, who is regarded as the first programmer.

ADP - automated data processing

ADT - abstract data type

AFS -
Andrew File System, a distributed file system which integrates the file storage
resources present in a LAN or WAN.

agenda -
a list of topics to be addressed in a group activity.

agent -
a computer program that communicates with external programs exclusively via a
predefined protocol.  An agent is capable of responding to all messages defined
by the protocol and it uses the protocol to invoke the services of other
agents.  (Storti, 1993)  

The concept of an agent is that of a computing system, software and/or
hardware, that interacts with its environment to carry out a task without being
told in programming-level detail how to do that task.  For example, the SimAnt
program creates many software "ants" that carry out tasks, such as feeding the
queen or defending the colony.  A commercially viable agent might be able to
schedule a meeting or layout a page of a newspaper.

AI - see Artificial Intelligence

air-time fragmentation -
the situation in meetings where the amount of speaking time available to each
person at the meetings is, on the average, the length of the meeting divided by
the number of people there. This severely limits the amount of active
participation that is possible when more than a few people attempt to interact
about something at a traditional face-to-face meeting.

algorithm -
a finite sequence of definite steps that can be carried out systematically to
achieve a specific goal.  More simply, a sequence of data manipulations that
achieves a specific goal.

algorithmic music -
music that is based on algorithms which are defined as step-by-step procedures. 
The algorithms are often shown as block diagrams with lines interconnecting the
various portions.  Pieces of this nature are generally completely produced by a
computer. (Jeff Senley, December 1991)

aliasing -
in computer graphics, imperfections in images which are caused by too small an
image sample. For example, jagged edges, loss of detail and uneven light
intensity in lines are aliasing problems. The term has its origin in signaling
theory where too small a sampling frequency may result in one signal being an
improper alias for another signal.  The cures for aliasing (called
anti-aliasing) are more resolution, "blurring" edges and intensity averaging
(as in TV).

alignment -
in the jargon of cooperative work, the concept that each person in a work group 
affirms (i.e., supports) a stated purpose, vision, goal, or task. (see Miller,
p. 130)

allocate -
assign a resource for use in a specific task.

alpha testing -
testing within the group producing the thing being tested, under the direction
of engineering, quality assurance, and/or customer support.

alphabetic - 
includes all characters of the alphabet, uppercase and lowercase.  Cobol
includes a space (blank).

alphanumeric -
includes all ASCII characters, that is, alphabetic, numeric, and special
characters.

ALU - arithmetic and logic unit; part of the CPU that performs calculations and 
compares.

ambiguity - 
the situation where a statement or part of a statement may have two or more
different meanings. For example, "user-friendly" could mean menus if it refers
to occasional users or function keys for skilled users.

analysis - 
breaking a whole into its parts to understand their function. 
See also "system analyst."  "Synthesis" has an opposite meaning.

analyst - in the context of computing terminology, consider this term
equivalent to "system analyst". See system analyst.

ANDF -
Architecture-Neutral Distribution Format, an OSF mechanism for allowing
software developers to distribute a single version of code that can be
'installed' on any hardware platform that has the ANDF installer.  The
advantage is that ANDF code is designed to be at least as difficult to reverse
engineer as binary code and produce executable programs that are as about as
efficient.  Performance appears to be the major issue at this time.  This is
still a 'vaporware' product (i.e., not a finished product in October 1991), but
an interesting idea.

ANSI - 
American National Standards Institute.  ANSI is responsible for standards in
many areas.  With regard to standards for programming languages, it generally
follows the direction of CODASYL.

ANSI format -
the punched-card format for Cobol source code.  Its principal features are
leaving columns 1 through 6 empty for sequence numbers and columns 73 though 80
empty for program id.  These things are unnecessary when source code is not in
punched-cards, but old habits die hard . . .  See also terminal format.

anthropology -
the study of humanity in relation to distribution, origin, classification,
and relationship of races, physical character, environmental and social
relations, and culture. Anthropology relates to computing when there is an
interaction of anthropological concerns and the effect of information
technology on people. (Webster's 7th) See also ethnology and anthropometrics.

anthropometrics -
a concern for human body measurements, especially with regard to the
ergonomics of human-computer interaction. See also ergonomics.

API -
Application Programming Interface (a term from Unix/IEEE POSIX open system
standards).

APPEARE -
an acronym suggested by William C. Miller in his book, "The Creative Edge", as
a way to begin thinking about the creative process.  The letters stand for:

A = be AWARE of you complete current situation
P = be PERSISTENT in your vision
P = PERCEIVE all you alternatives
E = ENTERTAIN guidance from your intuition
A = assess and select among your ALTERNATIVES
R = be REALISTIC in your actions
E = EVALUATE your results

APSE - 
ADA programming support environment. This concept emphasizes the integration of
ADA concepts and standards with the entire SE life cycle. The use of ADA PDL
(process definition language) as a design tool can be a powerful first step in
the use of ADA, even for an application area for which no practical ADA
compiler is available.

archie - 
a system name for the archie archive collection. Archie may be accessed by
telnet to archie.rutgers.edu and logging in as archie. Archie provides pointers
to thousands of documents and programs available thru the Internet. Users may
do a keyword search on the collection by using the "prog" command. A help file
lists and describes commands. Once a user identifies a document that looks
interesting, the document is obtained by FTP to the host listed in by Archie,
then doing a "get" of the location/file. Note that users telnet to archie and
FTP to get a file.

argument -
a value that is passed between a user and a procedure or between a calling
procedure and a subprocedure. The value may be represented as an identifier
(which represents an address) or a value (often a literal). A called procedure
may use an argument as input or output or both, so care must be taken to assure
that what a called program does with an argument is not inconsistent with what
the calling procedure intends. For example, Fortran programmers occasionally
send a literal value to a subroutine which tries to modify that value,
resulting in errors. 

(see also parameter, dummy argument, actual argument)

There are a variety of ways to 

array -
a data structure used for storage of a collection of data items that are all of
the same type. E.g., all the exam scores for a class.  Parallel arrays have the
nth occurrence in each relating to each other.  E.g., a second array containing
the names of people who took an exam parallel to the previous example.

artifact -
something produced by people (or other intelligent creatures). For example, the
artifacts of a software development project may include code, design, test
plan, whatever. This term is used in research studies to refer to something
that is caused by the method, not the phenomenon under scrutiny.

artificial intelligence - 
the ability of machines to perform functions that are normally associated with
human intelligence, such as reasoning, learning, and self-improvement. The
development of artificial intelligence is motivated by two fundamental
concerns: a desire for more useful machines and a desire to understand human
intelligence better. Cognition, perception and motor capabilities are
frequently lumped under this banner, but they are really separate concerns. For
example, artificial intelligence may be focused on computer science or
psychological concerns; artificial vision may combine physiology, psychology
and algorithms; and robotics is fundamentally an engineering problem, although
it can make good use of the previous two kinds of research. (See strong AI,
weak AI)

ASAP -
(1) as soon as possible.

(2) Application-Specific Array Processors, a conference of the IEEE Computer
Society.

ASCII -
American Standard Code for Information Interchange.  The ASCII standard uses 7
bits to represent keyboard symbols of English and control characters. See the
file ldisk$colib:[compsci.jac-txt]ascii.txt.  See also collating sequence,
EBCDIC.

ASIS - American Society for Information Science

assembler -
a computer program which converts a program written in an assembly language
into instructions for a specific computer system.  See assembly language.

assembly language -
a programming language which may consist of declarations, labels for addresses,
and statements which are in a one-to-one correspondence with instructions on a
particular processor.  Macro instructions are often included in an assembly
language.  An assembly language is generally thought of as a computer-dependent
or computer-oriented language.

asynchronous - 
not coordinated with respect to time.  See "synchronous".

ATM -
(1) Automatic Teller Machine
(2) Asynchronous Transfer Mode, a wide-area, packet-switching broadband 
technology for LANs.

attention panel -
Window interfaces utilize an "attention panel" to resolve something which
requires immediate attention, like responding to an error.  An attention window
can cause an infinite loop if it simplifies notifies the user of an error
condition without allowing the user to fix it (as in AVS).  (see panel)

attenuation -
the fading (loss of magnitude) of a signal over distance between points.

attribute -
(1) a column in a table which stores relations of a data base.

(2) (n) any property, quality, or characteristic that can be ascribed to a
thing or a person.  E.g., an type and source are attributes of a data field.
(v) to consider something as belonging to, produced by, or resulting from
something else.

attributed grammar -
a syntax-directed definition in which the functions in semantic rules cannot
have side effects.

attunement -
in the jargon of cooperative work, the concept that each person in a group
shares a common union, camaraderie, and feeling of personal support with every
other member of the group.  See Miller, p. 130.

audit trail -
a record of each operation on an object. For example, an audit trail might be a
record of all actions taken on a bank balance or a sensitive file.

automatic - 
  (1) an action done by machinery without outside commands, or 
  (2) an action done by an organism without conscious effort or voluntary
      control.

availability -
considered as a function of time, availability is the probability that the
system is operational at a particular time. (Related terms: reliability, MTTF,
MTTR, MTBF. Contrast the probability of gaining access, availability, with the
probability of system survival for a given time period, reliability.)

AVL tree -
a binary tree in which the height of the right and left subtrees of each node
differs by at most 1. The name AVL comes from the initials of two Russian
mathematicians, G.M. Adelson-Velski and E.M. Landis. An AVL tree is a minimal
height tree for a given number of nodes, which assures that the maximum search
time for any node is minimal. However, the average search time (for uniformly
distributed searches) is not minimal until a search tree is also
"weight-balanced".  Related terms: pivot node, rotation of the nodes of an AVL
tree.

AVS - Application Visualization System, software available on the DecStation
5000 network in Stright 219.

awk - 
a Unix utility that is also a programming language. It is named after Aho,
Weinberger, and Kernighan. Its greatest usefulness is in processing a single
sequential file with a compact yet clear language. Its logo is an auk, a
puffin-like seabird of the northern hemisphere.

B+ tree -
a B-tree with all the actual keys and data organized in the leaves as a
linked-list called a "sequence set".  A B+ tree is often used as a file index.

b-tree -
(Aho, Hopcroft, and Ullman, 1983) an m-ary search tree with the properties:

    (1) The root is either a leaf or has at least two children.
    (2) Each node, except for the root and the leaves, has between ceiling
        (m/2) and m children.
    (3) Each path from the root to a leaf has the same length.

    Note: a b-tree is an almost-balanced m-way search tree.

Babbage, Charles -
recognized as "The Father of Computing" for his early designs for automatic,
programmable, numeric computing devices.  His design for  an "Analytic Engine"
(1846) is the earliest documented design for what we now call a computer.

bacterium -
in hacker jargon, a stand-alone program that repeatedly replicates itself and
takes over a system by its sheer numbers.

bak - a filename extension that indicates a backup file.

bandwidth -
technically, the difference expressed in hertz between the two limiting
frequencies of a communication band.  Popular use of the term has concretized
the meaning to the simultaneous signaling capacity of a communication band. 
For example, bandwidth may be expressed as the number of simultaneous voice,
data, and video links through a single cable.

banner -
(1) a message printed on continuous paper in very large letters.
(2) a message displayed to users when they log in to a particular project or
    onto a system.

bannerware -
freeware that is distributed primarily to promote another product.  For
example, its documentation may describe an additional program. (This term was
originated by Public Brands Software.)

baseline - 
the collection of items for a project which have been accepted for
configuration management support.  The contents of the baseline are tightly
controlled to ensure integrity in the software product which is derived from
it.

BASIC - 
an acronym for Beginner's All-purpose Symbolic Instruction Code.  BASIC was
developed at Dartmouth College in the 1960's as a simple, easy-to-learn
programming language.

batch process - 
an off-line process that is scheduled by a computer's operating system to suit
system load and available resources, rather than direct interaction with a
computer user.  A batch process is the opposite of an interactive process,
which executes on-line at a user's command and allows direct interaction
between a user and the computer as the process occurs.

baud -
transmission rate in bits per second. The IEEE standard definition states: a
unit of signaling speed equal to the number of discrete conditions or signal
events per second.

bbs - 
a bulletin board system that is computer-based with communication links to
other computers. At a minimum, the bbs host should allow remote connections and
posting and reading bulletins by the users of the system. The BULLETIN system
on the IUP vax requires a special privilege to add bulletins, which simplifies
its management but limits its impact as part of the IUP community. See bulletin
board and bulletin.

benchmark - 
a point of reference from which measurements can be made. In computer jargon,
this becomes a test designed to evaluate the performance of computer systems,
programs, or devices.

beta testing - 
product testing done at selected customer sites prior to general product
release and support by creating organization.  Engineering should remain
closely involved with beta testing. The purpose of beta testing is to expose
the product to a wide variety of uses and volume usage, and to expose bugs and
deficient functionality.

binary tree -
a finite set of nodes which is either empty or consists of a root and two
disjoint binary trees (called the left subtree and the right subtree).

binding - 
making an abstraction more complete by associating it with specific properties. 
Examples include binding a specific memory location to a declaration that a
variable of a certain type is needed.  A second binding would be to establish a
particular value for a variable.  The type of the variable might also be
considered a preliminary binding. Binding at compile time is "early" and
"static" compared to binding at run-time which is "late" and "dynamic". 
Run-time provides the flexibility of generic data types for OOP, but it also
provides run-time overhead and adds complexity.  For this reason, early binding
may be preferred when there is a choice.

biometric device -
a device which measures physical or behavioral characteristics of a user for
the purpose of identifying the user to a system.  Examples include fingerprint
reader, retina scanner, voice verifier, signature dynamics, keystroke rhythm. 
(Galura, 1993)

BIOS -
Basic Input-Output System. This term goes back at least to the infancy of
personal microcomputing. It was present in early Commodore Computers as the
name for a chip and in CP/M and DOS operating systems.

bird -
                                    _~~_
                                  /      )
                              ___(  o     )
                               \         )
                                >       <       /\_____.
                               /         \     /      /
                              (            \  /     /
                             (       <       \    /
                             (        \       > /
                              \         \     |'
                                \_  ____/ \   |
                                   V  V     \ |
                                   |  |       `
                                  /   |
                                /T\  /T\

    (Copied from help messages for the lark.x processor on Honeywell CP-6) 
 

bit - a binary digit;  the smallest unit of computer data storage.

bit-mapped display -
a display that consists of specifications for individual bits rather than
character strings.

bitmap -
a common term for a rectangular image that is stored offscreen.  The term is
technically incorrect because each pixel value may consist of many bits.  The
term pixel map is more correct, but the term bitmap is more popular.  See pixel
map and bit-mapped display. 

bitnet -
an acronym for the "because it's time" network for electronic mail.  Bitnet was
initiated in 1981.  Bye 1992, bitnet has been largely superseded by the
Internet network.

bitwise operator - 
an operator that operates on the bits contained in data values rather than the
values that those bits represent.  For example, a one's complement changes the
sense of each individual bit (from off to on and vice versa).  Other common
bitwise operators are shift, and, or, and exclusive or.

black box -
a view of a program from the outside as a "black box" which responds to input. 
See also white box.

blind copy - 
a second set of copies whose recipients are only known to other blind copy
recipients.  All copies of the message should show TO and CC lists in the
headers.  Copies to BC recipients  should also show the BC list. (Mark
Strawcutter, IUP Postmaster, October 20, 1991)

block - 
(1) any group of contiguous characters in a document or display that may be
    processed as a unit. For example, a block of disk space in the IBM VSM
    system is 512 bytes.

(2) see program block

block if - 
a synonym for a "General IF Statement" (see general if).  The emphasis in this
term is on the ability of the language you are using to encapsulate a "block"
of statements as the actions which are dependent on the conditions in the if
statement.  (see block-structured language)  The Fortran IF statement and the
Cobol 85 IF statement are considered to be block-if statements because they
have an ENDIF statement which can mark the end of things which depend on a
particular IF.

block structured - see block-structured

block-if - see block if

block-structured language -
a programming language which has the capability of encapsulating local
declarations, control structures, and imperative statements in a manner which
allows them to be treated as a single imperative statement.  Fortran and Cobol
are not block-structured languages; C and Pascal are block-structured
languages.

Bloom's taxonomy -
a hierarchical list of cognitive skills developed for educators but widely
applied wherever a little knowledge of educational psychology can be a big help
in analyzing human cognitive skills and performance. <I will place a short
handout in td:blooms.handout ASAP, JAC, 10/11/92.>

blow up - see "bomb"

Boehm's spiral model -
an alternative to Royce's waterfall model of the software development. See IEEE
Computer, May 1998.  The essence of Boehm's spiral model is that as each stage
in product development is completed, the next phase is planned and management
decisions are made. The key element in each spiral is risk-based decision
making.

bomb - 
to fail suddenly, totally, and/ or disastrously.

boot - 
the process of reading the operating system (in Unix, the kernel) into system
memory and starting it.

booting -
the process of loading and running the operating system.

bootstrapping -
a figure of speech describing an ambitious person pulling herself up by her
bootstraps.  In computing, loading an operating system by running one
instruction, which loads additional instructions, until the whole operating
system is loaded. (Rob Leister, 1993)

bot -
short for "robot" in the argot of people who are addicted to on-line
discussions on the Internet. See also IRC.

bots - see bot

bottom-up development -
designing, coding and testing subprograms before you develop the programs that 
use them.

bottom-up testing -
testing a subprogram with a driver program before testing it with an
application program that will use it as a subprogram.

brainstorming -
Brainstorming is a technique for generating ideas.  Brainstorming is normally
done in groups, but it can also be used for individual idea generation.  The
ground rules for brainstorming are designed to produce quantity, from which
quality is later derived.  

>   Each person must be able to contribute to the solution of the problem.
>   Record ideas publicly.
>   Suspend evaluation until the group agrees to end or suspend the 
    brainstorming phase.
>   Encourage embellishment and building ideas, rather than evaluation.
>   Stretch for ideas, even wild ones.

Problems with brainstorming include:

>   poor statement of problem (e.g., "How to bash registration at IUP" vs. 
    "How to improve registration at IUP").
>   poor recording of contributions.
>   idea killers (e.g., "We tried that before").
>   reluctance to contribute ideas because of interpersonal factors (e.g., a 
    contribution may sound dumb or be dumb but have good points; idea may 
    conflict with ideas of boss).
>   may need to be combined with idea generation techniques (e.g., SCAMPER =
    substitute, combine, adapt, modify, put to other uses, eliminate, reverse 
    rules or rearrange patterns.  Miller, pp. 64-81).

The effectiveness of brainstorming is derived from its openness to
unconstrained associations to a problem that may are generated by human minds. 
Synergism is generated by triggering effects of the list as it develops, even
when the technique is used by a single person.  Brainstorming is also a
low-budget, easily implemented technique.  (Hence, it sometimes happens that a
group uses it when another technique would be more appropriate.)

breadth-first -
working with each level of a hierarchically structured thing completely before
proceeding to the next hierarchical level. This is equivalent to working with
all the Roman-numeraled items in a document outline, then working with all the
items labeled with uppercase letters, then integers, ...
(see also depth-first)

break -
a special-purpose key or signal that is often used at IUP to establish multiple
concurrent decserv activities. The trick is what key or combination of keys
send the break signal from different keyboards at different times. You may need
a simple break, a <control-break> (from a DOS/Kermit system), a <shift-delete>
(from a Macintosh), or something else.

bridge -
a device that connects 2 LANs running the same network protocol. (see router).

BSD -
stands for Berkeley Software Distribution, which refers to one of the major
versions of Unix.  It is a product of the Computer Science Department of UC at
Berkeley.

bubble chart -
a common term for a data flow diagram (DFD), a notation for specifying the
functions of an information system.  This notation is attributed to Constantine
and DeMarco (1977).  The DFD notation is not standardized, but it is simple and
popular.  The basic elements are "bubbles", circles used to represent
functions, and arrows, used to represent data flows.

bucket address -
a virtual address for a chunk of storage that can contain multiple data
records.

bug -
something in a program or computer system that may cause a run-time error.

build -
to create an executable version of a system, usually by some combination of
compiles, links, and other system commands. See "install" and "make".

bullet -
a mark to denote items in a list (without indicating a particular sequence).
In WordPerfect, bullets can be keyed "<control-2>4,0<any white space>". A 4,1
gives an open bullet. Other extended characters are documented in Stright 319.
On a Macintosh, you may use <Option-8> or <Option-Shift-V> to get a bullet.

bulletin -
a vms utility that allows users to selectively display and file messages from
different bulletin boards on a particular system. Note: JAC sets up the VMS 
projects he supervises with a one-line login.com to print a file called 
xxxbulletin.txt. This is similar to bulletin, with fewer features and less
control. See also bbs and bulletin board.

bulletin board -
a metaphor for electronic bulletin board systems. Basically, a bulletin board
in a public area allows public posting, browsing, and removal of postings. An
electronic version is likely to limit removals access to certain postings at 
the option of the person who submits the posting. See also bbs and bulletin.

bus -
in the context of computer systems, any data transmission path. Devices
connected to a bus can take data from the bus or place data on it.

bye - a word that is often used as a command to terminate an application
process or a login session. Similar command words: quit, exit, end, off,
logout, sys?, whatever ...

byte -
(1) an amount of computer storage that contains enough bits to store a binary
representation for a character of data and is related to the storage
architecture of the host computer system.  A byte is typically 8 bits, although
the ASCII standard codes for characters require only 7 bits.  Some systems,
such as IUP's Honeywell CP-6 computer, have 9-bit bytes.

(2) A popular computing magazine.

C -
C is a general-purpose programming language which was originally designed for
writing the UNIX operating system and implemented at Bell Labs by Dennis
Ritchie in 1972.  The first ANSI standard was approved in December 1988.

C++ -
an object-oriented (OO) superset of the C programming language. Its name is
taken from the C increment operator ++. It offers enhancements in information
hiding, inheritance, polymorphism, and operator and function overloading. It is
the most popular OO language. It is not regarded as being as good a language as
Objective C (of NeXT fame) or newer versions of SmallTalk, both of which were
designed as OO languages rather than enhancements. One of the difficulties of
learning C++ is a tendency for C programmers to simply do everything in C,
rather than designing and implementing programs in an OO paradigm. One of the
major goals of C++ users is reusing objects, to the extent of sharing or
purchasing objects. (Note: the AVS software in Stright 220 has done this very
successfully thru a clearinghouse in North Carolina.)

C3I (C cubed I) -
used by the U.S. military for a command, control, communications and
intelligence system.

cache -
in a processing unit, a high-speed buffer storage that is continually updated
to contain recently accessed contents of main storage. Its purpose is to reduce
memory access time. (IBM Vocabulary, 1981)

CACM - Communications of the ACM, the principal journal of the ACM.

CAD - Computer-Assisted Design

calendar -
a Digital software product that manages appointments and allows individual
calendars to be coordinated to schedule group events.  Help may be obtained by
entering $ runoff ldir$docum:calendar.rno.  Special privileges may be required
to print this help.

CAM - Computer-Assisted Manufacture

caret - a ^ character (also referred to as a "circumflex")

CASE - 
(1) computer-aided software engineering, e.g., by the use of a software product
    such as Excelerator or Teamwork. In its broadest sense, CASE is a generic
    term for the automated support of software development (see Sommerville, 4th
    Edition, p. 330).

(2) in programming, a "case statement" is a decision structure that chooses one
    of a list of actions.  In Pascal and C, there is a case / switch statement
    that chooses one of a list of actions depending on the value of a single
    variable.  Cobol has a more powerful "EVALUATE" statement.  Higher-level
    languages normally allow some form of an IF..ELSE IF..ELSE..END-IF
    implementation of a case statement.  A case statement is also known as a
    multiple-alternative decision.  See also "linear nested if".

case-sensitive -
software which interprets user input differently if it is in capital letters or
"small" (lowercase) letters. Unix is case-sensitive; VMS and MS-DOS are not.

cat -
(1) a Unix utility that is the equivalent of a VMS "type". The term is derived
from the word "concatenate," which is a weird thought, but that's Unix for you.

(2) short for "catalog", the Apple-DOS equivalent of a "dir" command.

CBIS - Computer-Based Information System. See Computer Information Systems.

CCITT - the Consultative Committee of International Telephone and Telegraph.

CCP - Certified Computer Programmer. See ICCP.

cd - the "change directory" command on DOS and UNIX systems. VMS users
may program their own version of a cd command (but the directory
structure at IUP makes it tricky.) As one option, you could define
    cd :== "@ldisk$colib:[compsci.jac-com]cd
type or print ldisk$colib:[compsci.jac-com]cd.com for details, but
note that this is only one possible personal cd command on the VMS
system at IUP.

CD-ROM - compact disk, read-only memory.

CDP - Certified Data Processor, an ICCP certification. See ICCP.

CDR -
(1) Critical Design Review
(2) a builtin function in LISP

Centris - 
A name for a model of Macintosh computers. (Dr. Cross has a Macintosh 650 in
his office as of Spring 1994.)

CEO - Chief Executive Officer

CERN - European Center for Nuclear Research (in Switzerland), where the WWW
started and still a popular starting point for exploring the WWW.

CGA -
Color Graphics Adapter card.  This is the most primitive way of getting color
capability on a microcomputer display.  See EGA and VGA.

CGM -
Computer Graphics Metafile defines the way graphics images are stored in a
device-independent fashion in peripheral storage devices for archiving and for
transfer to other systems.

channel -
a programmable processor which connects a CPU and its main memory with I/O
device controllers.  The operating system of the device which uses the
channel usually sends it a "channel program". 
See channel program, "selector channel" and "multiplexor channel".

channel program -
the instructions that are executed by a channel to access devices and control
data pathways.  (Loomis, p. 446)

chaotic system -
a dynamic system which exhibits large changes in the system at later times when
small changes are made in its initial conditions.  See also dynamic system.

character constant -
a value that is a string of one or more characters and is expressed as a
literal expression, often within quotes, or an identifier for a value that is
not allowed to vary within a program.  Fortran statements enclose character
constants in single quotes; Cobol encloses them in double quotes and calls them
nonnumeric literal values.

character string -
a sequence of characters that is treated as a unit. In computing, a character
string value is often enclosed within quotes. A length is usually associated
with a character string value. A substring is any set of adjacent characters
taken from a string.

chat - see IRC

chauffered style of EMS -
only one person uses the EMS technology. For example, a typist could record
brainstorming ideas in a word processor connected to displays visible to
everyone at a meeting. VisionQuest supports group interaction but allows verbal
exchanges among a group. VaxNotes, as it is designed to be used asynchronously, 
could be described as an interactive use of EMS with few or no other verbal
exchanges.

checksum -
digits or bits summed according to arbitrary rules and used to verify the
integrity of data. For example, a checksum operation may result in a 64-bit
number being appended to a long message, so that a change in the message would
cause the message and the checksum to no longer match and indicating an error.

CHIEF -
An acronym standing for Communications Handler and Information Exchange
Facility.  The CHIEF operates much like a telephone switchboard. Some CHIEF
lines are connected as terminal lines, to the campus users or modems.  Other
CHIEF lines are connected as service lines, to communications handlers on the
ethernet, known to users as DECSERV, LATSERV, TELSERV, and/or XYPLEX. Some
service lines are connected to outdial modems. Service lines could also attach
directly to the IUP computer systems, but this is not as cost-effective as
using communications servers.

Typically, when a user attaches to the CHIEF, they receive a prompt 
which says:     "Which service would you like?"

The user picks the communications server desired, or modem, etc. The CHIEF
then creates a data connection between the user's terminal line and the
communications server.  Due to the scripts included with the KERMIT
software, many users do not see this interaction. The scripts connect users
directly to the computer system of their choice, without any manual
interaction on the part of the user.
 << contributed by Don Rosenberger, 3/18/94 >>

chip - an integrated circuit on a piece of semiconductor material

Chronicle of Higher Education - http://chronicle.merit.edu

chronological order -
arranging data in the order it occurs (rather than by values of its fields).

CICS -
an IBM product for Customer Information Communication Systems. This software
has been used since the early 1970s to provide full-screen I/O in a Cobol
context and manage concurrency and reentrant code needs to facilitate the use
of corporate information resources based on an IBM mainframe.

circuit switching -
a method of communication in which communicating devices use a dedicated
end-to-end path that is held for the duration of the call. Most telephone voice
connections are circuit-switched.

CIS - see Computer Information Systems

CISC - Complex Instruction Set Computer (typically around 300 instructions.)

class - 
a set of closely related objects sharing similar attributes.  A class
description defines the properties and features that characterize the behavior
of any object that is an instance of the class.  A class is an abstraction that
extends the concept of an abstract data type to include inheritance and
polymorphism.  Note that a class may be a possibly partial implementation of an
ADT. (a template for an object) 

class library -
a group of classes for similar tasks. Class libraries become a corporate
resource that can be bought, sold, and traded. For example, class libraries
exist for GUI manipulations and mathematical and CAD functions.

cleanroom software engineering -
a process for developing error-free software thru formal verification that each
artifact of the development process meets its specification and statistical
testing of the available executable software as each increment is submitted for
testing. This process is described in Cobb & Mills, IEEE Computer, November
1990, pp. 44-54.

clear box - 
a better term for "white box", but it is less commonly used.

client/server model - 
a system in which application processing is shared between at least two linked
computers thereby enabling the originating node (the client) and the node or
nodes which are linked to it (servers) to accomplish something that no single
node could do by itself.  This is the basic model for distributed computing. 
Client/server applications include file-sharing, messaging (e.g., E-mail), and
processing-intensive applications that distribute computing tasks among
connected computers.

closed lab -
a lab in which students from a single class work on a single task with
supervision.  See also open lab.

closed subroutine -
(ISO standard) a subroutine of which one replica suffices for the subroutine to
be linked by calling sequences for use at more than one place in a computer
program.

cluster -
(1) a VMS term for the smallest allocatable number of blocks of disk storage. 
The default cluster size on public packs at the IUP ISCC is three.

(2) an IBM term for a VSAM data set which includes a data component plus any
control or index components for the data component.

CM - 
(1) configuration management (see entry under configuration management). 
(2) Connection Machine, a parallel computer.

CMM -
Capability Maturity Model, an SEI term coined in 1987 and evolved since then.
The most recent publication is the 1992 SEI Technical Review.

CMOS -
Complementary Metal-Oxide Semiconductor.  CMOS is a technology for RAM.

CMS -
The VAX DEC/Code Management System is a library system for software development
and maintenance.  CMS stores source files in a library, keeps track of changes
made to the files, and records user access to the files. (see vms help cms)

CNRI - Corporation for National Research Initiative

COBOL - Common Business-Oriented Language

COCOMO -
COnstructive COst Model, a Barry Boehm method for estimating software cost. It
is an algorithmic model that starts with a base estimate and refines that
estimate based on factors related to the application, the development
environment, and the development team. See "Software Engineering Economics," by
Barry Boehm, 1981.

CODASYL -
The Committee on Data Systems Languages.  A non-profit "volunteer" committee
that makes recommendations on standards for programming languages to ANSI.

code -
[noun]: a representation of data structures or executable procedures in a form
that a computer can compile or interpret. Fred Brooks calls code "the
accidents" of software engineering in his "Silver Bullet" article.

[verb]: to write code. Arguably, coding and programming are the same.
Programmers are a lot happier if you let them design, compile, and test.

code generator -
software that translates a program model into compilable code.

cognitive dissonance -
a theory that individuals who hold certain beliefs or who have made a
certain decision avoid, reject, or fail to perceive things which
contradict those beliefs or that decision.

cohesion -
a measure of the strength of relationships within a module of software. Parnas
(CACM 1972) categorized and ranked different forms of cohesion in a form which
is still useful today. See Sommerville, 4th Edition (1992).

cold boot - starting (booting) a computer by turning it on.

collaboration -
to work jointly with others, especially in an intellectual endeavor. (Webster)
Collaboration involves a group focus on a single concern.  See also
"cooperation", "coordination", and "CSCW".

collaborative filtering -
people collaborate on selecting documents from a document server by recording
their reactions or annotating the document.  (Cathy Lawrence, 1993)

collate -
to merge two or more data sets in an organized way.  Often, the original data
are arranged in sequence by the same attributes and the collating activity
consists of merging them into a combined file which is in the same sequence.

collating sequence -
the ordering determined by a set of codes. For example, the ASCII collating
sequence for character data includes putting blanks before numeric digits,
followed by uppercase (capital) letters, then lowercase letters. The EBCDIC
collating sequence places blanks before lowercase letters, then uppercase
letters, then digits. See ASCII and EBCDIC.

collision -
the event that two records in a relative file have keys which hash to the same
home address.

collocated -
working together in the same place, as opposed to geographically distributed
work activities.

colors -
in DOS (or Kermit), screen colors may be set as follows.
From:	GROVE::WYJTGWA   "CPT Donald E. Rosenberger" 26-OCT-1994 16:57:48.44
To:	JACROSS
Subj:	Kermit colors

Hi, John.

I found my old notes on DOS colorization, so wanted to save you a little
research time in Kermit......

As you know, the commands to use are:

set term color foregnd ____
set term backgnd ___
set term color foregnd ____ backgnd ____

It seems that colors ONLY CHANGE when 30's are used for foreground, and
40's are used for background.  The colors are:

30 or 40 :: black
------ 1 :: red
       2 :: green
       3 :: brown
       4 :: blue
       5 :: cyan
       6 :: aqua (light blue)
       7 :: white

command - 
a message to a computer that directs the computer to perform an action.

communication -
a process which results in a sender signalling a receiver in such a
way that the receiver is informed in a way that the sender intended.

compiler -
a program used to translate a computer program expressed in a problem-oriented
language into a computer-oriented language.  The input to a compiler is called
source code and the output of a compiler is called an object-unit, together
with an optional compile listing.  An object-unit normally includes many calls
to subprograms that must be linked with the object-unit before a program can be
run.  Fortran, Pascal, C, and Cobol are examples of common problem-oriented
languages.

complementation constant -
the number to which a binary integer in its "true form" (X) and its complement
(X') add up to (R). That is R = X + X'. In two's complement form, R is a power
of two. In one's complement form, R is one less than a power of 2. See Loomis,
Chapter 1.

complete binary tree -
a binary tree with leaves on at most two adjacent levels (Standish, 1980).

compound statement -
a group of more than one statement in a programming language, with some
language structure which allows that group to be treated as a single statement
according to the syntax of the language. For example, PASCAL has the BEGIN ..
END construct, and COBOL85 has ENDverb constructs.

computational science -
scientific investigation through modeling and simulation of physical processes
on computers.

computer - 
(1) a machine that manipulates symbols and can be programmed.  The advantages
of computers are speed, timeliness, precision, the ability to perform complex
procedures reliably, low cost per instruction, and the ability to store and
retrieve large amounts of data.

(2) the basic journal of the IEEE Computer Society.

computer architecture -
the attributes and behavior of a computer as seen by a machine language
programmer. (Doug Rutledge, 1993)

computer art -
works created with the aid of computer-based tools and methods for the purpose
of fulfilling an aesthetic need in the creator as well as in the public (I.V.
Kerlow, BYTE, September, 1984).

computer conference -
a computer-mediated conference among people. For example, IUP VaxNotes and
the LotusNotes software support computer conferencing. A computer conference
is generally considered to be an "asynchronous, dispersed" interaction. See 
also EMS and teleconference.

computer graphics -
the computer-assisted creation, storage, manipulation, and display of graphic
representations.

Computer Information Systems -
a popular title for an academic department that combines some of the features
of Computer Science (CS), Management Information Systems (MIS), and Information
Science (IS). The focus of a degree in CIS is on information systems that
include computer technology as an essential element. See also system and
information system.

computer network -
any arrangement which allows computers to communicate directly with each other.

computer program - 
a representation in a computer programming language of an algorithm for
manipulating symbols.

computer programmer -
a person who represents algorithms and data structures in computer-readable
form. See also software engineer.

computer programming language - 
a set of conventions for expressing algorithms in a form that can be executed
by a computer, possibly after compilation or interpretation by suitable
language processing programs. (See Ledgard and Marcotty, 1986, pp. 6-7.)

computer science -
the study of problems of data representation, communication and processing in
automatic computing machinery. This encompasses the development and application
of theoretical knowledge in three main areas:

   1) data structures, algorithms, programming languages and the
   representation of knowledge

   2) management science, especially in the areas of software
   engineering and computer system resource management

   3) computer engineering, especially in the enhancement of the
   data storage, communication and processing capability of computing
   machinery.

computer scientist - see computer science

computer virus -
a small and unwanted program that replicates and attaches itself to other
programs in the system. The metaphor of a virus is appropriate because it is an
unwanted infection that can spread to other systems that come in contact with
an infected system.

concatenate -
join things together (without merging or rearranging the parts of those
things).  For example, "abc" concatenated with "xxx" is "abcxxx".

concurrent -
activities or events which occur at the same time

condition name -
in Cobol, a name for a condition.  Condition names are coded with a level-88
sentence anywhere in the DATA DIVISION.

conditional operator -
a ternary operator in C which is the equivalent of a double-alternative if
statement.  For example,  x > limit ? "OK" : "NOK"

conditional statement -
in Cobol, a statement which may "branch". In Cobol-85, all conditional
statements may be terminated by END- scope terminator.  For example, the IF and 
READ verbs begin conditional statements. A PERFORM ... UNTIL statement is
conditional, while a PERFORM statement without an UNTIL clause is an imperative
statement. See also "imperative statement".

conference - 
in VAXnotes, a file of topics and replies managed by the NOTES software.  Forms
of VAXnotes conferences include meetings, public forums, notebooks, and
bulletin boards.  To get started in VAXnotes, enter the command "notes".
Suggestion: open sample_conference and read a few entries by pressing returns.

configuration management (CM) - 
identifying the configuration of a system at discrete points in time for the
purpose of systematically controlling changes to that configuration throughout
the system life cycle. Software configuration management (SCM) specifically
refers to the management of things such as source code, test data, system
files, and user documents throughout the software product life cycle. Tools
that support configuration management include the Unix make utility, AT&T's
Source Code Control System (SCCS), and DEC's Code Management System (CMS).

connect -
to reconnect a disconnected process:

    do a $ show user /full username

    do a $ connect vta5024:   (or whatever the disconnected VTA is)

If necessary, do a <control-w> and maybe an EVE DO: refresh to get your
screen back.  (It works neat!)

connectivity -
how many people or networks nodes are connected in a particular situation. The
concept is that having a computer means a lot of more if you are connected to
interesting people and computing resources.

constraint -
in the context of software engineering, a system constraint is any limitation
on a system or its development. For example, schedule (by Christmas), cost
(free), system (PC with 286 processor and 1 Mbyte), staff (IUP students), ...
(Yes, requirements are constraints, but the term is usually applied to things
that defined during system development. Requirements may have more fuzziness
and flexibility than constraints.)

contention -
the event that occurs when two or more processes are competing for the same
system resource.  This most commonly occurs when two or disk I/O requests are
competing for disk access.

context-dependent grammar -
a grammar in which one or more of the productions has more than one symbol on
the left-hand side. For example, the production  

    assignment_statement -->  {identifier} = {expression} 

defines the syntax of an assignment statement only to the point of assuming
that identifier has been declared or implicit declaration and typing are part
of the language, there are no irreconcilable type conflicts, identifier is not
an INPUT-only parameter, and maybe other things. These things are often stated
as "rules" for the production and the form of the grammar is treated as
"context-free".  However, the following production is context-dependent.

    {paragraph} within a specific Cobol Procedure Division --> 
              {previously-referenced-paragraph-name}.
                       {sentence}...
                       
context-free grammar -
a notation for specifying the syntax of a language with the four components:

    1. A set of tokens, known as terminal symbols.
    2. A set of nonterminals.
    3. A set of productions where each production consists of a nonterminal,
       called the left side of the production, an arrow, and a sequence of
       tokens and/or nonterminals, called the right side of the production.
    4. A designation of one of the nonterminals as the start symbol.

continue -
(1) a dummy statement in Fortran and Cobol.
(2) to continue a statement in:
    VMS ~ end a line with a dash and start the next line after column 1
    Cobol ~ a bad idea, but start the next line with a dash. To continue a quote
        (alphanumeric literal), take the previous line as far as you can and
        restart the quote on the next line with a ".  
    Fortran 77 ~ place a dash in column 6 and keep on going
    Unix and C ~ end the first line with a \ (which "quotes" the following
        return).

control break - 
an event that happens when a sorted file is processed sequentially and the
current record has a field in the sort key which is different from the previous
record.  For example, a file which contains records sorted by a Julian date
could have a major control break on year and a minor control break on day.  End
of file (EOF) is often considered to be a final control break.

control field -
a data field that is used to group items in a report.

control file -
an output of a file maintenance activity containing data concerning the
activity. For example, the number of records in the file before the run, the
number of records added and deleted, and the number of records after the run.
(See M&P, Chapter 1 or Glossary.)

control flow -
a computing term for the sequence of processing events in a serial algorithm
(i.e., a procedure that does not include concurrent processes). Flowcharts and
pseudocode are common tools for describing control flow.

control footing -
data for a control group in a control-break report that are printed after the
details for the control group.

control group -
a group of records that have the same values for a control field in a
control-break report.

control heading -
a heading in a control-group report that is printed before the details for the
control group.

control interval -
an IBM term for a unit of disk storage that VSAM transfers between disk storage
and virtual storage when an I-O request is made.  This term is equivalent to
the VMS meaning for the word "cluster".

control total -
a total for a control group. Final totals and counters are usually thought of
as control totals.

control-break report -
a report which is in sequence by at least one control field and includes a
control heading and/or control footing for the control groups. When a
control-break report does not list data for individual records it may be
referred to as a summary report.

control-group - see control group

controllability -
a property of computer programs which describes the ability of a user to select
inputs which will produce ANY specific outputs that are in the output domain of
the program.  A program which does not have this property has a more restricted
output domain than what is specified in its interface.

cooperation -
an association of persons for common benefit which is marked by a willingness
and ability to work together. (Webster)   Cooperation may be distinguished from
collaboration by a division of labor.  See also "coordination",
"collaboration", and "CSCW".

coordination -
a work pattern in which tasks are brought into common timing, action or 
movement.

copy statement -
a Cobol statement that "includes" Cobol code from a file which is separate from
the source code prior to compilation. Other languages do a similar thing and
call it an "include" statement. The code that is copied into a program is
called a "copy book" in Cobol. The copy statement concept is different from a
"macro" because macro code is compiled (or assembled) before it is inserted
into a file. See ldisk$colib:[compsci.jac-txt]cobol-copy.txt for a handout.

core - an obsolete term for main memory.

COSMOS - 
The registration and student records access system on the administrative vax at
IUP.  To get COSMOS documentation, print/q=laser ldir$docum:adminb.doc
(4/24/92) To get into COSMOS as a faculty member on an administrative system,
simply enter COSMOS at the VMS prompt. Note that you will need a password.

counterintuitve -
a situation in which your intuition fails you. For example, computer
people and users who like to speak rather than type think that "voice
annotation" of word-processed documents is a feature that is likely to
be very popular. Their intuition is misleading because voice
annotation turns out to impractical in may situations. (See Grudin in
CACM, January 1994)

coupling - 
a measure of the interdependence of modules in a design structure; the amount
of information shared between two modules. (De Marco, 1978) Strong coupling
complicates a system since this makes modules harder to understand or modify by
themselves.

coverage testing -
designing tests for a program so that every statement and every path through
the program are tested.  It should normally be possible to test every
statement, unless there is unused code; it is often impractical or impossible
to test every path.

COW - an acronym for "Can Of Worms." The term has been applied to some
really messy diagrams, especially in software engineering and system
design.

cp -
the Unix command which invokes the copy utility. See "man cp" on a Unix system.

CP/M - see CPM

CPM -
(1) Critical Path Method, or 

(2) Control Program for Microprocessors, a popular operating system for
microprocessors in the late 1970's and early 1980's.

CPU -
central processing unit; controls and coordinates communication among a
computer's components and interprets and executes instructions.

cr - 
carriage return; an anachronism for the "Return" or "Enter" key on a keyboard. 
Note that there may be a difference between the meaning of an Enter key in a
numeric keypad and a Return key which is part of an alpha group of keys.

cracker -
someone who attempts to penetrate the security of a computer system for
malicious or criminal purposes.

cross -
/CROSS_REFERENCE is a compile option that controls whether the compiler creates
a cross-reference listing as part of the listing file.  A cross-reference
listing is a report of what identifiers are declared in a program, what line
they are declared on, what lines they are used on, and a * indicates where their
value is changed.

CS - Computer Science. See entries for Computer Science and computer scientist.

CSAB - Computing Sciences Accreditation Board

CSCW -
Computer-Supported Cooperative Work; both a professional organization and an
annual conference dedicated to CSCW. Groupware may be defined as software for
CSCW.

CSE - Computer Science Education

CSP - Communicating Sequential Process (see Hoare, Communications of the ACM,
Dec. 1978.)

CSTB - 
Computer Science and Telecommunications Board, a unit of the National Research
Council.  The board conducts studies and hosts workshops in accordance with its
charter to promote the health of computer science, computing technology, and
telecommunications.

cursor -
a visible marker on a VDT that indicates where the user is pointing. In text
editing, the cursor is often a blinking rectangle or underscore that indicates
where the next typed character will be entered.

cybernetic composition - 
process by which music is composed through  the collaboration of a human and a
machine (also called automated composition). (Jeff Senley, 1991)

cybernetics - the science of control processes, wherever they occur, whether in
nature or in artifacts.

cyberphobia - 
fear or dislike of computers. Similar terms: computer anxiety, computer phobia,
technophobia.  Possible reasons for cyberphobia include:

> a connection to math anxieties,
> poor typing skill,
> fear of being blocked in job markets,
> fear of being left out or left behind,
> intimidating gadgets, 
> forced changes in work activities,
> dislike of being treated as data rather than a human being
  (depersonalization),
> loss of privacy (as discussed in Arthur Miller's Sam Jack lecture 10/29/92),
> nervousness about computer matching or other ways of computers being used for
  some sort of negative action against an individual,
> fear of computer failure or computer error. 

cyberspace -
the space of data, events, and actions within networks and digital media. For
many people, this is dominated by Internet or other public computer networks.

cycle - 
a "clock tick" in a CPU. The basic unit of time for measuring the speed of a
process, but there are other factors: e.g., word size, bus width, average
cycles per instruction.

cycle stealing -
occurs when a data channel and the CPU (or any other processor) attempt to
access the same area of main memory simultaneously. Memory cannot be accessed
this way, so time is "stolen" from the CPU cycle.

cylinder -
the set of all tracks on a magnetic disk (or disk pack) that are the same
distance from the center of the disk. The tracks in a cylinder can all be
accessed without repositioning a movable access mechanism.

daemon -
a process that runs in the background and performs a system function. For
example, a printer daemon which controls a printer.

DASD - Direct Access Storage Device

data -
physical representations of facts or concepts suitable for communication,
interpretation, storage, or processing by minds or machines. Data must
ultimately be viewed as signals which can be detected by human senses, although
those signals may have to be enhanced before there are perceptible.

data channel - 
a device that connects a processor and main storage with I/O control units.
Direct memory access (DMA) allows data transfer to occur without the direct
attention of the central processor.

data dictionary - 
an automated central collection of descriptive information about data resources
and their relationships.  Data resources are typically described in terms of
subjects, relationships, and attributes (e.g., as in the IBM DB/DC Data
Dictionary software product). For example, the entry for "student_name" might
describe it as a group data item composed of last name, first name, middle
initial, with fixed or variable length and what the limits are, which programs
access and/or change it, if an audit trail is kept of its uses, whatever. Note:
an integrated toolset should require that all system identifiers be defined in
the data dictionary.

data engineering - 
designing a large system so that the data required by individual processes will
be available, correct, consistent and in the proper form at the time it is
needed and at an appropriate cost. (see engineering)

data file - see file

data flow diagram -
a diagram which shows the flow of data in a system between procedures (or
transformations) and the input and output of that system. Data flow is shown by
labeled, directed flow lines; transformations are shown by circles, rectangles,
or round-cornered rectangles; files are shown by special symbols; control
(selection and iteration) are not normally shown.  Gane-Sarson and DeMarco
diagramming styles are 2 of the popular forms of data flow diagrams. Data flow
diagrams are useful for abstracting the details of a transformation into
lower-level diagrams. Lower-level details must have the same net input and
output as the parent chart; this is called "balance".

data independence - 
the property of being able to alter the form or content of stored data without
affecting the ability of existing programs to process it correctly.

data management -
(1) the methods used to store and retrieve data. (Johnson and Cooper, p. 29)
(2) applying traditional management concerns to a data resource: planning,
    organizing, directing, and controlling.  Data management responsibility
    includes concern for backup, disaster planning and recovery, integrity,
    security, audit, usage records, and other things! (JAC, February 1993)

data name - see data-name

data security -
protection of data from error, loss, and unauthorized access. The leading
security risk is accidental error, but data managers must also concern
themselves with power failures, disasters, disgruntled employees, hackers, and
other criminals. Terms entered into this glossary from IEEE Spectrum, August
1992, include audit trail, bacterium, checksum, computer virus, digital
signature, intruder, logic bomb, trigger condition, Trojan horse, and worm.

data structure - 
(1) a grouping of related data items. (Koffman and Friedman)
(2) logical relationships between records in a file. (Loomis)

data type - 
a name for the  values which a data item may assume. For example, some of the
FORTRAN data types are INTEGER, REAL, LOGICAL, CHARACTER, and COMPLEX.  For
example, PASCAL allows structured data types, such as arrays and records, and
ordinal types which may be limited-range or enumerated.

data-name - an identifier for a data item in a computer program.

database - 
a collection of logically related data that supports shared access by multiple
users and applications.  A database typically contains data about multiple
types of entities and information about how the entities are logically related
to each other.  The data are integrated (not redundant) and there are multiple
access paths.

dataglove - 
an input device that is sensitive to finger, hand, and arm movements. In
current virtual reality applications, a dataglove allows its user to manipulate
objects in a virtual reality.

DBA - Data Base Administrator

dbf - 
a filename extension that dBASE III PLUS uses to indicate a database file.

DBMS - Database Management System; software that manages a database.

DCE - 
Distributed Computing Environment, an OSF standard.  AFS has been implemented
as a major component of DCE.

DCL -  Digital Control Language, the command language interface for the DEC VMS
operating system. Note: the following is an example of how to continue a dcl
command onto a second line:

      $dir <dash>   !- is a dash or hyphen; _ is an underscore or zot.
      _$*.for       !I did not type the dash because glossary confused it with
                    !  a new term.

DCS - see Distributed Computing System

DDA -
refers to a (symmetric) digital differential analyzer algorithm for vector
generation. (May also refer to Direct Data Access.  See DMA.)

DDE -
an acronym for Dynamic Data Exchange. An example of DDE might start with
creating a chart from a spreadsheet, then including the chart in a
word-processed document. If you would then change the spreadsheet data in a
way that would change the chart, DDE would automatically update the
word-processed document when it is displayed or printed.

deadlock -
in a computer system, the condition of an infinite wait loop.  The following
combination of events cause a deadlock:

(1) two or more processes require exclusive use of the same resources
(2) these resources are not preemptible
(3) some resources are held by each process while waiting for use of others
(4) there is a circular wait.

(Contributed by Jessica Ng, May 1993)

deadly embrace - 
a situation in which two or more  processes are waiting for resources held by
the others, and thus unavailable. This results in a stalemate situation which
cannot be resolved without intervention, hence the term "deadly embrace".  A
frequently used but less colorful term for the same situation is "system
deadlock".

debug -
a Digital software product for VMS that allows source-level execution of a
program which is written in any of a variety of programming languages.

DEC - Digital Equipment Corporation (proud vendors of VAX and #2 in hardware)

decimal digit - one of the digits 0,1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,9

decimal notation -
numeric values represented in base 10 form using decimal digits and place value.

decision table -
a presentation in tabular form of conditions and actions, called rules; a table
of all contingencies that are to be considered in the description of a problem,
together with the actions that are to be taken.

declare (an identifier) -
in a programming language, an expression that communicates to the language
processor attributes of an identifier, without necessarily allocating memory
space or assigning a value.  See define and binding.

DECstation - 
a product line of Ultrix (Unix) workstations manufactured and marketed by DEC.
See also VAXstation.

default -
the action a system will take when you do not choose an alternative. The
default response that a system will assume in a dialog is often shown by
enclosing it in brackets. For example, when you exit from a word processing
session, you may notice the following question on your display:

     Do you want to save the latest version of mystuff.txt? [Yes]

If you enter a return, the system will assume that you want to save a copy of
mystuff.txt.

default drive -
in DOS, the drive which DOS will assume contains files that it looks for.
On a standalone PC with a hard drive, the default drive is normally c:.
On a networked PC, the default drive is often F:.  (similar terms: current
drive; logged drive)

define (an identifier) -
in a programming language, allocate space for an identifier.  A value may also
be assigned, but this is not necessary.  Note: by common usage, the expression
"define a variable" often means to declare a variable and simultaneously
allocate memory for it. This is an appropriate mental model for what is done in
Cobol 74/85 programs.

delimiter symbol -
a symbol that signals the beginning and/or end of a syntactic unit, such as a
comma in a list or parentheses in a formula.

delta -
the changes that were made to an old version of a file to make a new
version. The "TPU" files maintained by EVE are analagous to a delta.
The idea is to save the changes, not the entire file.

demographics -
the statistical characteristics of a human population.

demon - see daemon, a Unix term

depth-first -
the equivalent of doing a preorder traversal of the hierarchical structure of
an object. In terms of a conventionally outlined document, this would amount to
reading the document straight through. System builders often like to present
their designs in breadth-first fashion, but audiences often prefer depth-first.
In depth-first top-down testing, modules are tested one at a time using stubs 
in an inorder traversal of the hierarchical module structure.
See also breadth-first.
 
design -
a statement of specific data, procedural, and architectural details which
satisfy a requirement for a system. Requirements state WHAT services are needed
and WHAT constraints there are on a solution; a design describes HOW a specific
system will be constructed and HOW it will work.

design technique -
design is an art more than a science. A design technique is an attempt to
*systematically* produce a design. "Structured design" (Yourdon and
Constantite, 1979) is an example of a design technique.

deskcheck -
a procedure for checking an algorithm or program without running it on a
computer.

desktop publishing - 
the use of personal computing to prepare documents for publication.  Desktop
publishing combines word processing with page composition, graphics, multiple
fonts and font sizes, color, and whatever else contributes to a professional
publication.  The basic components of a desktop publishing system are a
personal computer, a word processing program, a page makeup program, and a
laser printer.  PageMaker is a popular desktop publishing program which is
available on IUP Macintosh computers located in STR 107 and the ISCC in the
basement of Stright Hall.

detached process - a background process

device independence - 
the ability to request I/O operations without regard for the characteristics of
specific devices.

DFD - Data Flow Diagram (see bubble chart)

dialogue -
focused interaction between two or more people, with a stated goal or outcome.
In VisionQuest, the meaning of the term dialogue is similar to the conventional
meaning of the term "meeting".

digital signature -
data that can be generated only by an agent that knows some secret and hence is
evidence that only that agent must have generated that data.

dir - 
in DOS and VMS, a command to list the identifiers for files contained in a
directory. The DOS command allows options and switches; the VMS command allows
options and qualifiers. The comparable Unix command is ls and the comparable
AppleDos command is catalog.

direct address - 
(ISO standard) an address that designates the storage location of an item of
data that is to be treated as an operand.  (Contrast with an indirect address)

directory -
(1) a list of the contents of a part of the secondary storage available to a
computer, including at least the names of files.

(2) (ISO) a table of identifiers and references to the corresponding items of
data.

(3) in DOS and VMS, a command to list files and their attributes.

disconnect -
see "connect" for help on reconnecting a disconnected session.

discussion - in VAXnotes, a topic and all the replies to it.

diskette - 
a plastic disk with a metallic coating which is used to record data and
programs for computers.  Data may be copied back and forth from a diskette to
RAM by using a disk drive.  Diskettes come in a variety of sizes, e.g., 8"
(obsolete), 5.25" (floppy, single or double density), and 3.5".

distributed computing languages - 
support computation by multiple autonomous processes that communicate by mess
passing rather than shared variables and may be implemented by geographically
separated networks of communicating processes.

distributed computing system - 
a loosely coupled computing system that provides services to support the
execution and interaction of its components. (IEEE Computer, August 1991, p.
18)

dithering -
in computer graphics, a process of combining adjacent pixels to give various
visual effects of color and/or intensity.

DMA - Direct Memory Access

do loop -
a Fortran counting loop, similar in style to a for loop in Basic or C.  See for
loop and for versus while loops.

documentation - 
recorded data that can provide direction or understanding to its human users.
Software documentation is a general term for all system related facts durably
recorded in human usable form. This includes a variety of things that may
generally be classed as system documentation or user documentation. The
following items are typical:  problem statements, feasibility studies, design
statements, source code, maintenance support documentation, user tutorials and
user reference materials.  Documentation may be prepared as text, graphics,
source code, or any non-printed media (e.g. interactive computing or
videodisk).

DoD - Department of Defense

domain -
the set of values for which something is defined.

domain testability -
the freedom of a program from input-output inconsistencies. A program which is
domain testable has the ability to produce controllable output from specified
inputs and the property that it produces observable output from distinct input.
(see also controllability and observability)

DOS - Disk Operating System. 

(1) The operating system for IBM-compatible microcomputers.  MS-DOS refers to
Microsoft DOS and credits Microsoft, who holds the copyright.  PC-DOS refers to
DOS for IBM "Personal Computers".

(2) An operating system for IBM mainframes.

DOV -
Data Over Voice; a device which allows a single phone line to simultaneously
carry data and voice signals.

dowhile - the way that VAX Fortran 77 implements a while statement.

download -
to transfer a file from an interactive host to a computer system which is
communicating with the host.

downsizing -
moving applications from a mainframe environment to workstations (and/or
micros).

DP - data processing.  (see ADP and EDP)

drag - 
a mouse action where you move the cursor to an object, press a button and hold
it down, then move the mouse, causing the object to move.  For example, many
windows can be moved by dragging on their title bar.

driver - 
a program which is written to test a subprogram in a bottom-up development
strategy.

dummy argument -
in Fortran, a synonym for a formal parameter to a subprogram. A dummy argument
is an identifier local to a subprogram for a value that is passed to the
subprogram.

dump -
a display of the contents of a file or memory area.  A dump is often organized
to represent bits in hex or octal form, with accompanying ASCII interpretations
of the printable characters.

Dvorak keyboard standard -
an arrangement of  keys that allows faster typing than the conventional QWERTY
layout, which was designed to slow down typists.

dynabase -
a "database" that *seamlessly* integrates *all* of the text and other computer
media that an individual generates or accumulates over time. For example, this
glossary integrates terms in computing for Prof. Cross and the IUP community,
but it is not complete and it is more of a group application than a private
system. See Communications of the ACM, March 1994, page 11 for a recent update
on the concept.

dynamic -
something which happens at the time a program is run.  For example, dynamic
memory allocation and dynamic data structures.

dynamic array -
one which has its size defined when a program is run.

dynamic system -
a system which is a collection of parts which interact with each other and
change each other over time.

E-mail -
electronic mail.  Help for VMS e-mail may be printed by the command
@ldir$docum:print_maildoc.  (A special privilege is required.)

Notes on e-mail: E-mail is intangible, immediate, asynchronous
(uninterrupted and non-interrupting), and informal. E-mail, as
commonly used, is also limited to text in white on black without even
a decent type font. Because of this, avoid complex or emotion-laden
messages. KISS (Keep it short and simple).  "Emoticons" help a little
with non-verbal symbols for feelings. Hopefully, current multimedia
developments will increase the "bandwidth" of our e-mail messages, but
short, simple messages are a fundamental part of our society.
(Consider the recently adopted term "sound bites.")

EAM - Electronic  Accounting Machine

EBCDIC - 
Extended Binary Coded Data Interchange Code, an IBM competitor for ASCII. 
These codes use 8 bits, as opposed to 7 bits for ASCII.  They are principally
used on IBM mainframes.  Their collating sequence is different: lower case
followed by upper case followed by numbers, which is more sensible but less
accepted. See also collating sequence and ASCII.

echo -
in electronic data transmission, a repetition of a message from the receiving
node to the transmitting node in order to verify the transmission. Echo
checking is primarily used with character-oriented asynchronous transmission. A
character is transmitted to the remote computer and simultaneously displayed 
on the terminal screen.
 
edge-notched cards -  used for sorting or selecting without machinery.

EDI -
Electronic Data Interchange, intercompany computer-to-computer transmission of
business data.  For example, a retail store inventory system may transmit
orders to suppliers when programmed events occur.  There were As a measure of
the importance of this concept, 20,500 users of EDI registered with the EDI
Yellow Pages International in August 1991 (CACM, November 1991, pp.  68-70).

edit -
to make changes to a file or command. The most common editing activities on a
VMS computer like the IUP VAX would be done using EVE (EDIT/TPU) or
command-line editing. On a microcomputer running DOS, a user would use a word
processor, edlin, or the F3 key to make changes to the previous command to DOS.

editor -
software that supports changing computer files. E.g., eve (edit/tpu) and LSE.

EDP - Electronic Data Processing

EEC - European Economic Community

efficiency - 
the extent to which resources are used economically. In computing, increased
efficiency in the use of one resource, such as data storage, may come at the
expense of decreased efficiency in the use of another resource, such as
processing capacity.

EFTS - Electronic Funds Transfer System

EGA -
Enhanced Graphics Adapter card.  This method of getting color displays on a
microcomputer monitor achieves 16-color output.  The progression of capability
is CGA, EGA, VGA, Super VGA.

egoless programming - 
a term popularized by Weinberg in a 1971 book "The Psychology of Computer
Programming." The basic idea is that programming cannot be a private affair.
Programs must be written so that they can be read and they must be read by
others. Weinberg's walkthrough procedures were followed by Fagan's inspection
procedures and Harlan Mills' cleanroom procedures as ways of making code
visible and public. The point of this procedures is quality assurance at each
step in the development of software.

electronic bulletin board system - see bbs and bulletin board.

elementary item -
in a Cobol data structure, an data item which is NOT described in the DATA
DIVISION with an immediately following data item having a higher level-number.
(Level-numbers higher than 49 do not apply to this situation.)  Note that an
elementary item is the lowest level of a data hierarchy.  An elementary item
may have a PICTURE clause, while a group item may not.  See also group item.

ELOC - executable lines of code

EMF - 
electromagnetic field; see PEMF for facts related to CRT emission hazards.

emoticon -
a technical term for a "smiley". :)  The term is derived from "an icon for an
emotion." Personally, I prefer the more conventional term "smiley."

EMS - Electronic Meeting Support. The term EMS is generally applied to
information technology that supports a face-to-face meeting. See also
groupware, computer conference and teleconference.

encapsulation - 
the welding of code and data together into objects.  The point of encapsulation
is exactly that of data abstraction and information hiding. (Note: Ada packages
permit a user to encapsulate logically related entities.)  

end -
a word that is often used to signal the termination of an interactive process. 
Note: enter a blank line to terminate glossary.

end user - see end-user

end-user -
a person who uses computing to do work other than develop software or systems;
a person who can use computer technology to organize data, stimulate new ideas,
solve problems, and communicate the results to others.

end-user computing -
applications in which the user is responsible for all aspects of processing:
data entry, operations, and using the output.

END= - 
a parameter in a Fortran READ statement which identifies the label of a
statement to which control is transferred in the event the READ statement
encounters an end-of-file condition.

engineer - see engineering

engineering - 
the professional production of useful artifacts by skilled application of
scientific knowledge. Good engineering practice is characterized by predictable
construction processes, testing, measurement, and reliable products which are
fit for use. (see data engineering and software engineering)

entropy - a measure of the energy unavailable for useful work in a system.

entry-sequenced data set -
an IBM term for a sequential file in VSAM.  They use the acronym ESDS.  See
also Key-sequenced data set.

EOF - end of file

EOJ - end of job

EOLN - end of line; in WordPerfect, either of the End keys is an EOLN key.

eps - encapsulated postscript format

ergonomics - 
the science of adapting systems to people, with the end result of increased
productivity and acceptability. In computer systems, the goal is increased
speed, fewer errors, greater satisfaction and less frustration, all leading to
higher profits and lower operating costs. Four basic dimensions may be included
in the meaning of this term:

  > physical comfort and motor activity requirements
  > perceptual factors
  > psychological factors
  > cognitive factors

error trapping - the ability of a system to detect errors.

esoteric - 
something that that would not be interesting to the general audience for which
a document or other communciation is intended.

ethernet - 
a 10 Mbs wiring standard for connecting intelligent computing devices in a LAN.

ethnographics -
in general, the systematic recording of human cultures.  In CSCW,
ethnology is the analysis of cultural effects of IT for group support
and interaction. Ethnographers are concerned with human cultures that
emerge as a result of IT, but the main concern is effective groupware
(which is more likely with happy users). In general, the design of a
CSCW system should consider existing social processes and not try to
change them.

ethnology - see ethnographics 

euphemism  -
a sugar-coated way of saying something that your audience will not like.  For
example -->

MEANING OF 20 TOP TECHNICAL TERMS AND EXPRESSIONS
------------------------------------------------- 
1. A NUMBER OF DIFFERENT APPROACHES ARE BEING TRIED: No one knows how to
approach this problem.
 
2. CLOSE PROJECT COORDINATION: We know whom to blame if this project goes
under.
 
3. EXTENSIVE REPORT BEING PREPARED ON A FRESH APPROACH: We just hired three
know-it-alls fresh out of school.
 
4. MAJOR TECHNICAL BREAKTHROUGH: It works OK, but it looks very Hi-Tech.
 
5. CUSTOMER SATISIFACTION IS BELIEVED TO BE ASSURED: We are so far behind
schedule that the customer will be grateful for anything he can get from us.
 
6. PRELIMINARY OPERATIONAL TESTS WERE INCONCLUSIVE: Prototype machine exploded
when we threw the switch.
 
7. TEST RESULTS WERE EXTREMELY GRATIFYING: It works and we're not asking too
many questions.
 
8. ENTIRE CONCEPT MUST BE ABANDONED: The only person who understood the thing
has quit.
 
9. IT IS IN THE PROCESS: It is hopelessly bogged down in red tape obstructions.
 
10. WE WILL LOOK INTO IT: Forget it! We have enough problems already.
 
11. PLEASE NOTE AND INITIAL: Let's spread the responsibility for this.
 
12. GIVE US THE BENEFIT OF YOUR THINKING: We will listen to what you have to
say, as long as it does not interfere with what we have already decided.
 
13. GIVE US YOUR INTERPRETATION: I can't wait to hear your foolish ideas.
 
14. LET'S DISCUSS: Come into my office, I'm lonely.
 
15. ALL NEW: Parts not interchangeable with old design.
 
16. RUGGED: Too heavy to lift.
 
17. LIGHTWEIGHT: Lighter than rugged.
 
18. YEARS OF DEVELOPMENT: One finally worked.
 
19. ENERGY SAVING: Achieved when power is turned off.
 
20. NO MAINTENANCE: Impossible to repair.

EVE -
an acronym for the Extensible Vax Editor.  This DEC product is officially named
the TPU editor, which stands for "Text Processing Utility".

exit -
a word that is often used in an interactive process to end the process. Note:
the glossary process can be terminated by entering a blank line.

expand -
in LSE, a keystroke command which replaces a placeholder or token with
more detailed syntax or help. The keystroke is either <control-shift-?> or
<control-shift-underscore>, depending on the keyboard.

expert system -
a knowledge intensive computer application that solves problems normally
requiring human expertise.  It performs functions like asking relevant
questions, applying expert knowledge and problem solving heuristics, and
explaining its reasoning.

expertise - 
special skill or knowledge representing mastery of a particular
subject. For example, in computer programming, expertise includes
behaviors which incorporate plans, patterns and goals (PPG?) common to
experienced professionals.

exponential growth -
Growth is a function of time.  Exponential growth involves the time variable as
an exponent.  For example, if the number of squirrels in the Oak Grove would
double every year for ten years, we would wind up with 2^10 or 1,024 times as
many squirrels in ten years as we have now.  In contrast, if the number of
squirrels in the Oak Grove increases by 2 every year, in ten years we would
simply have 20 more squirrels than we have now.  (This would be called "linear
growth".)

extend -
a way to open a sequential file at its end and append records.  See $ help
cobol procedure open extend.

extended binary tree -
a binary tree in which empty subtrees are represented (e.g. by small square
boxes, cf. Standish 1980).

external path length -
the sum of the path lengths from the root to each of the empty (external) nodes
in an extended binary tree (Standish 1980).

facsimile - a copy of a document or other image; see fax

FASE -
the Forum on Academic Software Engineering, an electronic series of exchanges
sponsored by the Software Engineering Institute but currently managed by Keith
Pierce at the University of Minnesota, Duluth. Email contributions to 
fase-submit@d.umn.edu or subscription request to fase-request@cs.texas.edu

fault - see page fault

fault tolerant computing (FTC) -
the correct execution of a specific algorithm in the presence of defects. The
effect of these effects can be overcome by redundancy, either temporal
(repeated executions) or physical (replicated  hardware  or software).

fax - 
a common term for facsimile transmission, which can be thought of as a copy
machine with input at one end of a phone line and output at another phone. A
fax machine costs less than $1,000 plus the cost of a phone line. Fax machines
have been a major force for change in business, politics, and personal lives. 
They have demonstrated that technology changes the way we live when it is
simple enough and inexpensive enough to affect the routine things individuals
do in their everyday lives.

fdl -
File Definition Language (in VAX VMS).  FDL files are definitions of VAX RMS
files. (RMS is VAX Record Management Services. see VAX VMS help.)

feasibility study -
a study with the goal of defining a data processing problem, presenting
alternative solutions, doing some cost/benefit analyses, recommending a course
of action, and preparing a plan (and timetable) for designing and installing
the system.

femto - a prefix which means one trillionth or 10^(-12).

FEP - see Front-End Processor.

fi -
if spelled backwards. This word is used in pseudocode and PDL to indicate the
end of the scope of an if statement. Similar backward spellings are used for
other basic pseudocode words, such as do/od.

field - 
a data item consisting of one or more logically related characters; a specified
area of a data record for a category of data (or the value of an attribute of
the record). For example, in a student data record, "student id" would be a
likely data field.

FIFO -
First In, First Out; a queue data structure.

file -
(ISO) a set of related records treated as a unit.  For example, a set of
invoices or a set of facts about a student.  Types of files include master
file, transaction file, inverted file, data file, program source code file,
and others.  Files normally have names or other identification.  The content of
a file is as varied as the uses of computers or the contents of a manila
folder.

file access -
the method of accessing records in a file, normally sequential, random, or
dynamic (a Cobol mixture of both). A file may be OPENed "EXTEND" in Cobol, but
this is actually a form of dynamic access. When a file is OPENed EXTEND, it may
have sequential organization and access.

file organization -
the structure of data stored in an external file; the provision for file
access methods; and the physical allocation of records to a storage medium.
Cobol recognizes  sequential, relative, and indexed file organizations.
Fortran, Pascal, C and Ada refer to a file with relative organization as a
"direct file." Unix systems view everything on external media as a file and
organize all files as a sequence of bytes. Cobol views data files as
hierarchically organized in terms of records and fields, but programming can
reconcile the two views.

file server -
a device which provides remote centralized storage of data to workstations
connected to it via a communication network. Benefits include shared use of a
storage device, shared use  of files, user mobility, and automatic file backup
and recovery (cf. Svobodova in Computing Surveys, December 1984).

file size -
the number of components in a file multiplied by the number of components
(M&P); the number of bytes in a file, including bytes for data, indexes, and
unused space. File size is measured in either bytes or whatever is used for
the minimum unit of allocatable external storage, depending on the context.
For example, file size on a VMS system is measured in blocks. See also blocks,
granules, and sectors.

finger - 
a Berkely Unix utility that displays data about users of a system.  This has
proven to be both a popular application and a security risk because of the way
it is implemented.  The IUP VMS systems have a version of finger, but it has
been the source of system problems so its operational status is up and down. 
(See $ help finger on the IUP academic system.)

fish -
                          \
     \\                    \\
     \\\                  _\\\\__
     \\\\            __-""       "-_
     \\\\\________--"               "\
     \\\                  /           \
     ///  .___           |    (O   O)  |
     /////    ""-_       |             |
     ////         "-_     \   \_____/ /
     ///             ////           ./
     //             ///  "--______-"
                   //      \\

(Copied from help messages for the tuna.x processor on Honeywell CP-6.)

fixed-head disk -
a disk drive with separate heads for each track.  This is very expensive, but
it eliminates time delays for head movement.

flag -
in computing, a variable that indicates a system state condition.  For example, 
a variable may be set to indicate that a sequential file is at end-of-file or a
request for system services is waiting to be served.

flaky - 
a non-technical term for equipment or a software system which is afflicted with
non-repeatable anomalous behavior (i.e., non-repeatable bugs)

flame - see flaming

flaming -
expressing an inappropriate amount of anger, especially during an electronic
interchange. In a non face-to-face interaction, people sometimes say things that
they would not say face-to-face. The standard advice for people who interact
electronically is not to type when you have strong negative feelings about
someone.  Wait until your feelings calm down and talk with the person another 
way, preferrably face-to-face.

flextime -
an arrangement between an employer and an employee where the employee is
responsible for working a certain number of hours, but these hours may be
scheduled by the employee within certain limits.  For example, an employee may
be responsible for working 8 hours between 7:00 A.M. and 7:00 P.M., but the
employee decides when to work those hours.  The advantages of this arrangement
include:

    > allowing the employee to schedule early or late hours, depending on which
      are his or her more productive hours

    > allowing parents and working couples to coordinate their schedules

    > avoiding and lessening traffic congestion in cities

flit - 
the smallest part of a packet involved in routing, usually determined by the
band width of a channel.

FLOP - Floating Point Operations, a unit of processor speed, normally stated in 
Mflops/sec or Gflops/sec.

flow control - see control flow

flowchart -
(ISO) A graphical representation for the definition, analysis, or method of
solution of a problem, in which symbols are used to represent operations, data
flow, equipment, etc.  Synonymous with flow diagram.

fog index -
a measure of the length of sentences in words and the length of words in
syllables. The fog index has been used as an indicator of the readability of a
document, but it is not always a good indicator. It is often referred to as a
Gunning Fog Index. It gained widespread use when word processing made its
calculation a trivial matter.

for loop -
a loop control structure for counting loops, for example, the for statement in
Basic, Pascal, and C.  The DO loop of Fortran performs a similar function
without using the keyword "FOR".  Fortran and C allow the loop index to be a
floating point (real) value.  See for versus while loop; do loop.

for versus while loop -
a while loop may be used instead of a for (or DO) loop, but the for loop is
often easier to write and read because the controls are all at the top of the
loop.  As a general rule, the need to initialize a variable before entering a
loop or step the variable at the end of the loop indicate the likelihood that a
for loop would be a better choice.

fork -
(1) a (Unix) operating system routine that creates a new process.  "Fork" is a
Unix term that is similar to the vms term "spawn".

(2) a Unix command that creates a cloned process of its parent. 

format -
the form of data. In word processing, format includes such things as page
layout, line justification, and hyphenation.

format statement - 
in any programming language, a statement that expresses the form of input or
output.  Fortran format statements consist of a list of "edit descriptors"
enclosed in parentheses.  See Koffman & Friedman, p. 208.

Fortran -
Formula Translator; the first HLL (1957), Fortran is used by scientists and
engineers for mathematically-oriented problems and for supercomputing.  The
current ANSI standard for Fortran is ANSI 1977.  A Fortran 90 standard has been
agreed on, but compilers are not yet available.

forward - in e-mail, to send a copy of a message to someone else.

FoxPro - 
a DBMS product of Microsoft. It competes with dBase IV and Paradox. Microsoft
claims that its strength is that it is very fast. As of 11/93 a 10-pack
educational version sells for $799.

fractal - 
a curve or higher-dimension geometric object which has "fractional dimension". 
A fractional dimension exists if the estimated measure of the object becomes
arbitrarily large as the measuring stick becomes smaller and smaller.  For
example, the coastline of Britain increases as you measure it in smaller
increments because of its irregularity.  A more irregular object increases
faster as the measure decreases and thus has a higher fractional dimension, up
to the limit of the next dimension.  

Fractal objects are often self-similar, but they do not have to self-similar. 
The self-similarity consists of similar appearance at any degree of
magnification.  A fractal is an object that has a fractal dimension greater
than its classical dimension (but not greater than the next higher dimension).

fragmentation -
the breaking up of the storage areas for a disk file into non-contiguous areas. 
This slows down and complicates disk access, but it frequently occurs due to
attempts to reuse deleted areas of a disk.  "Defragmentation" of a disk can
improve its performance.  Defragmentation has gotten to be a common utility for
computing systems.

frame buffer - 
an array which contains color and intensity values for all the  pixels in a
display.  The terms  bit map and refresh buffer refer to the same concept.

Franz LISP -
a dialect of LISP specifically devoted to the automation of musical
composition. (Jeff Senley, 1991)

free riding -
in a meeting, a behavior and attitude that sits back and waits for others to
accomplish the work of the group.  See also "lurking," a similar term with
greater positive connotations.

freeware -
a program in which the author still holds the copyright but allows the program
to be used and distributed free of charge.

frequency of use -
in the context of file processing, how often a file is used. For example, the
file of registration data for a semester is accessed much less frequently by
mid-semester. See M&P, Chapter 1.

friendly - see user friendly

frm - 
a filename extension that dBASE III PLUS uses to indicate a report (format).

front-end processor - 
a computer that acts as an intermediary between a mainframe computer and its
users.  A front-end processor typically is designed to relieve the mainframe of
some of the processing required for transactions from interactive users.  (see
FEP)

ftp -
File Transport Protocol; a system which uses the TCP/IP protocol to allow file
transfers between a local computer and a remote computer.  If you use ftp at
IUP, you should know how to "get" and "put" files.  If you are asked to login,
attempt to login as "login anonymous", then give your internet address as a
password.

Sample ftp hosts:
	ftp.uu.net              (uunet in Falls Church, VA)          
        plaza.aarnet.edu.au     (Australia)
        ocf.berkeley.edu, then cd misc/fun/humor (did not work 4/16/93)

FUD -
Fear, Uncertainty, and Doubt. An acronym for what novices feel at
times, e.g. when they are getting acquainted with the Internet.

full binary tree -
a binary tree in which  each node either is a leaf or has exactly two nonempty
descendants (Standish, 1980).

function-oriented design -
a method of designing a software system by representing it as a set of
interacting units, each of which has a clearly defined function and data
interface to other system units.

functional programming -
the construction of programs declaratively rather than imperatively.  Functions
are used as an underlying computational unit and compute by the evaluation of
expressions which do not have side effects.

fuzzy -
something that is not clearly defined as either true or false. In "fuzzy
logic", attributes of things are not true or false, but have probabilities of
being one way or another.

gantt - 
a scheduling tool for project managers. It consists of a chart of elapsed time, 
planned (scheduled) time and milestones relative to a baseline (or calendar).
GANTT is essentially a time scheduling system.

garb -
a verb which is short for "garbage". The term means to turn a good file into
garbage. For example, a noisy phone line can garb a good file. See also
"munge". (These are serious terms.)

garbage collection -
any procedure for deallocating dynamically allocated storage when all
references to it have been deleted.  This can involve high overhead, but
failure to do it in a program that makes extensive use of dynamically allocated
storage can result in a program allocating itself so much memory that it either
exceeds its limits for memory or degrades system performance (and maybe piles
up a bill for pigging out on garbage memory).

gatekeeper -
(1) a person who is a local expert in something. For example, a person who
monitors technological, social, political, market, and other emerging external
trends and communicates them to people within an organization.  See Miller, The
Creative Edge, 1987 Addison Wesley, page 121.

(2) a model for a system that includes a person or organization that controls
access to the system. For example, the choice of what movies are shown in
theaters has a lot more to do with mega-distributors than it does with local
theaters or audiences. In the sense that movie distributors control what movies
are shown by theater owners, they are "gatekeepers". A similar example is true
of the cable industry. The point to computing people is that the Internet is
absolutely not subject to this sort of control and we hope that it will never
be. This is important as the "Information Infrastructure" concept develops.
(JAC, 3/7/94)

gateway -
a computer network interface  which allows messages to be exchanged between
networks.

General IF -
an IF statement which allows single, double, or multiple alternatives. (see
block IF)

generator -
A computer program that constructs other programs to perform a particular type
of operation (e.g. a report program generator).

gert -
a technique for graphing the accomplishment of goals and graphical activities.
(Graphic Evaluation and Review Technique)

gif -
a file extension which stands for graphic information file.  With appropriate
software, a .gif file can produce an image.  

giga - a prefix which means roughly one billion or 2^30.

gigabyte - one billion bytes.  An estimate of the data required to store the
Encyclopedia Britannica is 3 gigabytes.

GIGO - Garbage In Garbage Out

GKS - graphics kernel standard, a standard for 2D graphics.

glitch - some unforeseen and undesirable behavior in a computer program or
system.

globbing - in Unix, the process of expanding an ambiguous file reference.

GNU -
an integrated software system distributed by the "Free Software Foundation.
Gnu's not Unix, but Gnu includes C, Emacs, MIT X Windows, Make, Diff, Grep,
Tar, . . .

The Free Software Foundation may be contacted at 675 Massachusetts Avenue; 
Cambridge, MA 02139;  or e-mail gnu@prep.ai.mit.edu

GPSS -
General Purpose Systems Simulation. A problem-oriented language used to develop
simulation systems.

grade-check -
a program written by Jim Wolfe and available to IUP students whose profs choose
to give them access to their grades.  To run it, enter

      $ run ldir$grader:grade-check

    and enter ? for help as needed.
Note that many students have established the symbol gra for the above command.

gradecheck - see grade-check. The programs are identical.

grammar -
a specification of the syntactic rules for combining words (the lexicon, or
tokens, of a language) into well-formed expressions of that language.  A
production grammar uses statements, which are called productions or rewrite
rules, to express a syntactically valid combination of terminal symbols,
nonterminals (or metavariables), and metasymbols.  The most important  class of
production grammars is that of context-free grammars, which are often written
in Backus-Naur Form.  The restriction on this class of grammars is that the
left-hand side of every statement must be a single nonterminal symbol. 
Examples follow (ref. to Wulf, 1981).

   Production grammar
      1. <legal phrase> -> A <b part> C
      2. <b part> -> B
      3. A <b part> -> aa <b part> B <c part>
      4. <c part> -> C -> cc
      5. <c part> -> B -> B <c part>

Notes: <> enclose nonterminals, A thru C are terminals, a thru b are
metasymbols, and <legal phrase> is the start symbol. This production grammar
defines all strings of the form A+B+C+.

   Backus-Naur Form
      <integer> ::= <digit>|<integer><digit>
      <digit> ::= 0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9

granule - the smallest allocatable block of disk storage. A granule is usually
equivalent to the meaning of a "block" in VMS or a sector in MS-DOS.

graphic programming - see "visual programming"

graphics -
Any form of visual representation.  The concept of graphic arts includes
painting, drawing, photography and printing. Our IUP Communications Media
Department has a course CM 440 COMMUNICATIONS GRAPHICS which emphasizes the
planning and production of "presentation" graphics and printing by exploring
lettering, layout, color, mounting and laminating, copying, reproduction  and
photographic techniques and photographic media.

grep -
a Unix command that is an acronym for "get regular expression and print." The
syntax of the grep is straightforward, but the breadth of its usefulness is
remarkable. For beginners, the most difficult step is finding good help on how
to formulate regular expressions in the Unix command-language interface. See
Sobell's book, Appendix B for the best help I am aware of. If someone finds out
how to get "man" help on regular expressions, please let me know how.

grounding -
in communication, a check to see that a message is getting through. For
example, when you are giving someone else directions, you might ask the other
person to repeat the directions back to you.

group -
a group of people consists of two or more people who interact for a common
purpose. The purpose a group shares may be social or work. For example, 2 or
more people who are waiting for a bus become a group when they share an
umbrella or chat for social purposes. See also "group dynamics", "workgroup"
and "team".

group dynamics -
how a group of people interact. In a workgroup, this includes task-oriented
behaviors and group maintenance.

group item -
in a Cobol data hierarchy, a data item which is composed of one or more
subordinate data items.  Syntactically, this implies that it MUST be followed
by a description of a data item with a higher level-number.  (Level-numbers
higher than 49 do not apply to this situation.)  Note that a group item may
have a VALUE clause but it may not have a PICTURE clause.  See also elementary
item.

group maintenance -
group activities that focus on supporting the productive functioning of the
group rather than on directly accomplishing the purpose that the group is
intended to accomplish.  For example, introductions and assigning functions
like recorder or club president are maintenance activities.

group name -
in Cobol, a name for a group item.  See group item.

groupthink -
a situation where group loyalties may inhibit consideration of alternatives,
especially when they conflict with group norms or decisions. In some cases,
lack of "diversity" may cause a group to be blind to alternatives. The effect
of group loyalties overriding open consideration of alternatives and blindness
caused by lack of diversity are similar; group actions and decisions are not
based on consideration of all viable alternatives. Victims of groupthink are
often unaware of their problem.

groupware - 
a computer-based system that supports a group of people and provides an
interface to a shared environment. Examples of groupware include electronic
mail, Internet and CompuServe, bulletin boards, DEC's Vaxnotes and  ALL-IN-1,
Lotus Notes, VisionQuest, ForComment for group authoring, group drawing, and
IUP HANDIN. See also EMS, computer conference, and teleconference.

grove -
(1) The name chosen by IUP's Information Services and Communication Center
(ISCC) for the vax cluster at IUP.

(2) An experimental groupware system for group authoring. One of its key
innovations is almost no concurrency constraints for editing a particular part
of a document by multiple simultaneous users. See Ellis, et al, CACM, January
1991.

GSS - Group Support System

GUI - Graphical User Interface; how the user interacts with a workstation.

hacker - 
The internet Companion (Addison Wesley, 1993) contains 8 meanings (p. 119). 
The following definitions capture the spirit of this term with its many
nuances in meaning.

(1) someone who uses computer technology (or plays golf) for the fun of it, not
necessarily because they accomplish anything.  

(2) a person who enjoys and is good at programming.

(3) occasionally, and "incorrectly", someone who attempts to penetrate or
sabotage computer systems for the challenge rather than for criminal intent. 
"Cracker" is a better term for this meaning, especially if malicious or
criminal intent is involved.

hand trace - see deskcheck

handin -
a program which allows paperless submission, grading, and hand back of
documents. This program was written by Jim Wolfe, IUP Computer Science faculty.
It has been used at IUP since about 1983.

hardware - 
tangible components of a computer system. For example, a keyboard, mouse, video
display, or modem. A diskette is hardware, but the program and data on it are
software.

HDDS - 
Heterogeneous Distributed Database System (see IEEE Computer, December 1991)

hdtv - high definition television

header file for C -
Header files for C on the academic vax are in sys$library:*.h
On a Unix system, look for them in /usr/include/*.h

heap -
(1) a binary tree whose nodes contain keys arranged in descending order along
every path from the root to a leaf. Various implementations of this sort of
heap require "completeness," to the extent that only the bottom level can have
vacancies, and all the leaves on the lowest level occur to the left.  This
definition is frequently used in association with the "heapsort" algorithm.

(2) In some situations, the memory which is available for dynamic allocation to
executing programs is called a heap. This meaning of the term is separate from
definition (1).

height of a tree - see tree height

heterogeneous -
a collection of things that are different in some way. For example, a Cobol
record which contains different types of data and has multiple occurrences is
said to implement a heterogeneous table. See homogeneous.

heuristic - 
an exploratory method of problem solving in which there is knowledge of the
problem domain. Heuristics are critically different from algorithms in their
lack of certainty that a particular approach to a solution is optimal, or that
it will even work.

hexadecimal -
base 16 notation (hex for 6 and decimal for 10)

hidden file -
a file whose identifier is not normally listed by a directory command for the
directory where the file is located.

hierarchy - 
a partial ordering similar to an organization chart.  For example, think of
Professors organized under Department Chairpersons, who are in turn organized
under Deans.  In Cobol, think of level-01s which contain level-05 data items
which contain level-10 data items.  The following diagram is a hierarchical
structure chart for a program which will accept a name and age, then respond
with a short message based on the age bracket of the response.

                             Dialog about age
                                    |
          ....................................................
          |                         |                        |
   Input name and age        Respond to age             End Dialog       

HIGH-VALUE - a Cobol figurative constant that mean the highest collating value
that can be represented in 8 bits; X'FF'.

higher-level language - see HLL

histogram -
a special type of a bar graph in which the range of the independent variable is
broken down into equal-sized intervals.
 
hll - 
a higher-level language for programming than assembler language.  This term
refers to a programming language in which some statements are translated into
multiple computer instructions.  Examples include Cobol, Pascal, and Fortran. 
See vhll.

hold field -
a programming mechanism which involves setting up a program variable to
remember a value from previous processing that may be needed later.  For
example, in checking the sequence of records, a programmer may code a hold
field to record the value of the sequence key of a record to compare it against
the next record. 

home -
a cursor movement key that may cause the cursor to move to the left of the
screen, the top left position in a document, or other places in combination
with other keys.

home address -
the relative address which is computed by a hashing algorithm.  It is called a
home address because other record keys may hash to the same address, and some
records may have to be stored somewhere else.

homogeneous -
a collection of things which are similar. For example a Fortran array is said
to be homogeneous because every element in the array has the same data type.
See heterogeneous.

host computer - a computer system which runs programs which provide services in
a computer network.  Note: an Internet host is commonly thought of as a
computer system which allows public telnet and ftp access.  See also internet,
telnet, and ftp.  

hpcc - 
High Performance Computing and Communications initiative (a $1.7 billion U.S.
proposal as of 1991)

HTML - HyperText Markup Language

HTTP - 
HyperText Transport Protocol, a network protocol for retrieving hypertext
using an extensible set of formats (allowing nicer-looking documents and
multimedia). For a demo on a text-based display, try $lynx
http://egret.ma.iup.edu

human factors - 
human strengths and weaknesses as they affect human performance, especially in
human-machine interaction. Computer science is fundamentally concerned with
extending the capabilities and performance of computers, but human factors
determine goals for computer science and are critical to system design
decisions.

IBM -
International Business Machines (also, It's Better Manually, or Itty Bitty
Machines)

ICCP -
the Institute for the Certification of Computer Professionals. This group
promotes certification and has run the CDP, CCP, and other certification exams
since the mid-1970s.

icon -
a graphic symbol on a video display representing a command and allowing
interaction by pointing (e.g., a trash can for a deletion command). See GUI.

IEEE - Institute for Electrical and Electronics Engineers.
The IEEE has an Internet gopher that supports all of their publications and
activities: $ ieee :== "telnet info.computer.org" ! login as guest

if - the basic decision statement in programming languages.  (see block if,
general if, logical if)

image processing - the analysis of scenes or reconstruction of 2D or 3D objects
from their pictures. Subareas of image processing include image enhancement,
pattern recognition, and computer vision. (Note that image processing
emphasizes analysis, while computer graphics emphasizes synthesis.)

imbricate -
Wittlich, Schaffer and Babb define imbrication in Microcomputers and Music as a
process by which consecutive overlapping patterns of a certain number of string
characters are found.

  For example, musically speaking, take the phrase  

       A B C D E F G A B C B A B C B A

By using imbrication, you could find the occurrences of A B, B A, A B C, or any
other multiple-note patterns.  These answers would be 3, 2, and 3 respectively.
The imbricated three-note patterns in the string above would be A B C,   B C D,
C D E, D E F, ...  (submitted by Jeff Senley, December 1991)

immediate address - 
(ISO standard) the contents of an address part that contains the value of an
operand rather than an address. That is, an operand, or part of an operand,
which contains a value rather than an address.

imperative statement -
in Cobol, a statement in the PROCEDURE DIVISION which is NOT a conditional
statement.  See also "conditional statement."

implementation -
the phase of software development when a program or system is coded, entered
into a computer, compiled, and individual modules are tested.  Related terms:
program design; system test or integration testing; installation.

implied DO loop -
in ANSI 77 Fortran, a special form of a DO loop that can be inserted into an
input or output list. For example,  READ *, (scores(i), i=1, n)

index -
(1) in database management, a file of pointers to records which allows records
to be accessed in a particular sequence. In contrast, a sorted version of the
file stores copies of each record, rather than pointers to records.

(2) the position of something in context. For example, the Fortran INDEX
function returns the starting position of the first occurrence of a string as a
substring in another string.

index data type -
(1) in Cobol, an index data type contains a byte-offset value. It is declared
by naming an identifier in an INDEXED BY clause, or by a USAGE IS INDEX clause.

(2) more generally, an index is the ordinal number of the position of a search
target in whatever is being searched. For example, the index of "ro" in "John
A. Cross" is 10. 

indexed address - 
an address that is modified by the content of an index register prior to or
during the execution of a computer instruction.

indirect address - 
(Fred Hansen) the operand address can be obtained from the
absolute address provided for the instruction.  Thus it is
indirectly obtained. For example, JMP indirect through 6703 would
first go to 6703 and obtain the address contained therein, then
jump to this new address.

information - 
(1) a natural phenomenon that happens when data are processed that
"informs" the person, animal or machine that is doing that processing
(or causing it to happen in the case of an end user.)

(2) knowledge of value in decision making or problem-solving activity.

information filter -
a process that filters out irrelevant data and thus selects data from a
knowledge resource according to a statement of what a user or problem context
might find useful.  A filter is positioned as a "third party" to the
communication between a user and a resource (in other words, a client and a
server).  

information hiding - 
to conceal unessential details of the implementation of an ADT (or object, or
package) from its users.  Essential properties cannot be hidden.  (see also
abstraction, encapsulation)

information infrastructure -
the basic data facilities, equipment, and installations needed for the
functioning of a system or organization and informing of its members.   
In the case of national or global interest, the information infrastructure is
the collection of data transmission, archiving, searching, and entry
capabilities. The emphasis in infrastructure is often on the transmission of
data, hopefully in a bidirectional, interactive mode. Hopefully, individual
to individual, small group, broadcast, and individual search of archives will be
supported. Current concerns are "focused" on multimedia, universal access, cost,
common services, common conventions for communication, .. and making it clear
just what it is we don't have that will really make a difference in our lives.

information overload -
when a person or computer-based system receives more data than it can process
and loses some. (Actually, a more precise term would be "data overload".)

information system -
(1) simply stated, any system which enhances data processing activity. See also
"system" and "computer information system".

(2) in the jargon and style of information science, an IS is an augmentation of
decision making, problem solving, or knowledge seeking activity.  Computers are 
not necessarily a part of an information system which serves these needs. Data
acquisition, transmission, and processing are likely to precede the utilization
of the knowledge represented by the data, which then must be followed by a
communication or transfer process to an event world to which the information
system's acquisition system is sensitive.

infrastructure -
(1) an underlying base or foundation for an organization;

(2) the basic facilities, equipment, and installations needed for the
functioning of a system or organization. (PC Computing, January 1992, p. 65)

inheritance - 
the ability to derive a new class from an existing one; a relationship between
classes in an object-oriented context. Single inheritance allows one class to
acquire the structure of other classes in a strict hierarchy from a single
parent.   Multiple inheritance allows a class to acquire the structure of other
classes in a lattice with multiple parents. The point of inheritance is to
define an object and then use it to build a hierarchy of descendant objects,
with each descendant inheriting access to all its ancestors' code and data.

input -
data that is accessed by a computer as part of its data processing activity.

install -
to take whatever actions are necessary to allow a software application to be
used on a particular computer system. This often involves copying executable
files and possibly data files, picking a logical hard drive for the
application, choosing options, and dealing with licensing constraints.
See also "build" and "make".

instance - a specific object in a class.

instantiation -
(1) the creation of an object which is a new instance of a class or a
new specific class from a generic class.

(2) to represent by a concrete example.

integer -
a counting number (a whole number).  An integer may be either positive,
negative, or zero.  E.g., . . . -3, -2, -1, 0, 1, 2, 3, . . .
Decimal fractions are NOT integers: 3.25, 4.10.

In computer representations, a 32-bit integer may hold up to the positive value
2^31 -1, which is about 2 billion.  (Note: 2^31 -1 is a large prime number.)

integral expression - an expression that evaluates to an integer result

integrated toolset -
a set of tools for software development that have consistent terminology and
allow the work of different phases to be based on prior work for this project.
For example, a design should satisfy specifications, which in turn should meet
requirements. A "repository" for the "artifacts" of a software development
which includes a data dictionary is a basic element of an integrated toolset.
See also repository, artifacts, data dictionary, and configuration management.

There are varied types of integration. For exampled, an integrated interface
design reduces learning. Microsoft apps have an advantage because of their
similar interface. e.g., Word and Excel. See also OLE and DDE.

integrity -
(1) the extent to which modification of software by unauthorized persons can be
controlled. (Pressman, third edition)

(2) the extent to which errors in computer-based information systems are
controlled. (Human error is a greater threat to the integrity of a system than
malicious modification of data.)

(3) consider data integrity, program integrity, system integrity, and network
integrity in the context of data security.

intelprise -
an intellectual enterprise; a term coined by Shumpei Kumon, from Japan, as part
of his proposition that the post-industrial social phase will be based on
knowledge and wisdom.  (See the keynote address in the proceedings of the 1992
CSCW Conference or JAC notes.)

interactive computer graphics - 
human-computer interaction which includes visual displays other than
alphanumeric characters. Foley and Van Dam (1982) define interactive computer
graphics to be the use of computer graphics in which a user dynamically
controls the picture content, format,size, colors, or selected object on a
display surface by means of interactive devices such as a keyboard, mouse,
joystick, or graphics tablet. Icon-based menus and pointing devices are a
mid-level type of interactive computer graphics, and CAD is an example of a
high level type of interactive computer graphics.

interactive process - 
a process which executes on-line at a user's command and allows direct
interaction between a user and the computer as the process occurs.  (see batch
process)

interface - a shared boundary. See "user interface".

internal path length of a tree - 
the sum of the path lengths of all its nodes. The root is defined to have path
length 1 (Standish, 1980 defines the root as having level 1 and pathlength 0).
Internal path length is synonymous with the term path length of a tree. (ref.
Wirth, Algorithms + Data Structure = Programs, 1976) Note: Standish (1980)
defines internal path length of a binary tree as the sum of the lengths of the
paths from the root to each of the nodes. This would result in a different
answer than the Wirth definition. (An internal node is defined to be a non-leaf
node.)

internal representation -
the representation of values in computer computer memory. For example, integer
values are often stored as twos-complement, full-word binary values. See ASCII,
EBCDIC, real, integer, data type.

Internet -
a widely used and rapidly expanding "information infrastructure" that allows
users of connected systems to exchange messages and access the resources of
other connected systems.  Users may communicate thru electronic mail, transfer
files thru "ftp", or login to remote computers thru "telnet".  Begun by the NSF
in 1985, its connections, transactions, and users have practically doubled
every six months since 1987.  The Internet is an amazing global force!  Best
reference: The Whole Internet, by Ed Krol. O'Reilly & Associates, Inc. 1993.

interrecord dependence -
in a sequential file process, the condition that how the process
responds to the current record depends on other records. For example,
in a control-break algorithm, additional actions are required when the
current record is in a different control group than the previous
record.

interrupt -
a signal to an operating system that an external event has occurred, such as
the completion of a disk I/O operation.

intruder -
an unauthorized user who gains access to a computer system to examine data and
use the system for his or her own purposes.

intrusion -
in virtual reality, the restrictions placed on a user's senses by the virtual
environment.  (Chuck Merlino, 1993)

inverted file - 
intuitively, a file whose ordering has been reversed. Practically, it is a file
which contains entity identifiers associated with values of attributes of an
item, i.e. alternate indexing.

IP - Internet Protocol

IRC - an Internet Relay Chat.  See ldisk$colib:[compsci.jac-irc]handout.txt

IRM - Information Resource Management

IS - Information Science

ISAM - 
both a data organization and management method for an indexed file and the
concept of allowing access to a file to be either random by an index key or
sequention (i.e., dynamic, in Cobol terms). ISAM normally refers to IBM's way
of managing keyed data which they eventually replaced with their VSAM approach
to the same concerns.

ISCC - the Information Services and Communication Center at IUP.

ISDN - 
Integrated Services Digital Network (or, in semi-jest, "I Still Don't Need It").
Basic Rate ISDN are not available everywhere in 1994, but they provide two Kbps
digital channels over one circuit. This is attractive for data and
videoconferencing and other low-end multimedia applications. ISDN Primary Rate
services have been around longer and provide 23 64Kbps digital channels, mainly
used for voice at large corporations. 

ISO - International Standards Organization

IT - Information Technology

iteration - repeating a process

iup - 
Indiana University of Pennsylvania (Note: this version of glossary is designed
for computing terms. If you want to just mess around with the software, enter i
for a list of the first 20 terms that begin with the letter i.)

iup handin - see handin

jac -
My initials! (John A. Cross)  I often prefix a filename with my initials to
distinguish it from other people's files and group my filenames in one place in
directory listings.  For example, I make my gradebook files available as JAC101
or JAC499 rather than CO101 or LS499 because other profs teach other sections.

jargon -
the specialized vocabulary and idioms of those in the same work, as in
computing: a somewhat derogatory term, implying unintelligibility.  (from
Webster's New Universal Dictionary)

JCL -
job control language.  This acronym once referred to IBM mainframe job control
language in all its various generations and versions, but it has evolved to
mean the command language interface to an operating system.

JCTF - Joint Curriculum Task Force of the ACM and IEEE

job control -
a function of an operating system that prepares each job or job step to be run.

job sharing -
two or more employees sharing the responsibilities and salary for one job.

JSD - 
Jackson System Development; a life-cycle methodology that incorporates a style
and focus that is somewhere between a function-oriented approach and an
object-oriented approach to system design.

Julia set -
a close relative of the Mandelbrot set.  The Mandelbrot set is derived by
iterating z' = z^2 + c, where the initial z is (0,0) and c takes on different
values.  The Julia set uses different z's as starting points and generates a
different Julia set for every value of c.  A suggested place to start viewing
Julia sets is with J(-0.7448185 + 0.1050935i) (see Hill, p. 172).

justify -
text may be arranged on lines which have even margins on both left and right
sides by inserting additional space between words (and letters if the
technology supports it). Full justification has even margins on both sides;
Center justified text has no additional spacing inserted between words or
letters, but all lines are centered between the margins; left-justified text
has no spaces inserted and has what is called a "ragged-right margin".

k-ary tree - see n-ary tree

Kermit -
software for data communications and the communications protocol which it
supports. Kermit is popular at IUP and elsewhere because it is free, because it
works, and because it has become widely adopted. 

(in VMS, see also $ help kermit)

key -
(a) the identifying field of a record.
(b) the field whose value is used to place a collection of records into a
    sorted ordering.

key field -
a logical component of a data record that identifies it or determines its
sequence during sequential access of the records in the file. See also "key."

key window -
the window where keystrokes will be applied;  the currently selected window,
often highlighted by being brighter than other windows, but not always the top
window.

key-sequenced data set -
an IBM term for an indexed file.  Records in each control interval (data block)
are stored in ascending sequence by the primary key for the file.  See also
entry-sequenced data set.

keyboarding - skill in entering data through a keyboard.

keyword -
a word in a programming language that must be used to make a particular
syntactic expression work.  In terms of Cobol metalanguage, an underlined
uppercase word.

kilo -
a prefix which means one thousand or 2^10 (1024), depending on context.  The
metric system uses prefixes to indicate powers of ten, while computing terms
for quantities of memory use kilo, mega, nano, and tera to indicate powers of 2
that are roughly equivalent to the corresponding powers of ten.

kiosk -
a small, light structure with open sides used as a newsstand, bulletin board,
or other open information booth. (An example: there is a "kiosk" between
Stright and Uhler Halls.)

Kleene star (*) -
the use of an asterisk to denote zero or more occurrences of the preceding
symbol. A closely related notation is the use of a plus sign (+) to denote the
occurrence of 1 or more occurrences of the preceding symbol. For example (cf.
"regular expression"):

   ab* = {a, ab, abb, abbb, ...}

   aa* = a+ = {a, aa, aaa, aaaa, ...}

   (a)+b = {ab, aab, aaab, ...} Note that the +-notation can be
 confused with the alternation symbol: a + b = {a, b}.  Context and
 typography must be used to distinguish the two symbols.

KLOC - a thousand lines of code

kludge - a quick-fix or patchwork assembly that gets something to work.

LAN - Local Area Network.  A LAN features high bandwidth, low latency, and 
limited distance.  (Eelwu Jeong, 1993) Examples: Ethernet, Token-ring, STARlan.

language-sensitive editor -
a text editor which is sensitive to the syntax of a language. The concept
applies most commonly to a programming language, but other instances are
posible, such as a text editor which is sensitive to the syntax
constraints of a program design language. (See LSE)

laptop computer -
a battery-powered, portable computer that is small enough and light enough to
be carried about like a briefcase.  A true laptop should be practical to carry
to a meeting, on a plane, or to a data collection site. It should also have
provisions for transferring data to and from other computers, typically via
phone lines and removable disks.

large file - 
a file for which the design decisions related to it make a significant
difference for processing and access time and storage space.

laser -
an acronym for light amplification by stimulated emission of radiation; a
technology that benefits computing because tightly focused laser light enables
applications in optical data storage and transmission.

latency - 
how long it takes something to happen. The latency due to rotational
delay on a disk drive averages to be the time for half a rotation,
which is about 8.3 milliseconds at 3600 rpm.

launch -
a Macintosh term for starting an application. Launching may include setting up
a partition and loading some things into RAM. (To do it, just double-click on
the icon or name.)

library -

(1) in the context of computer systems, a set of data collections stored in a
    way that makes use of any member collection convenient and efficient.

(2) to access the IUP library, you have three options.  Note that
    all the options require VT100 emulation, which means you must
    do something to reset your terminal/device before you can
    reliably switch to using VMS.

    >> From Kermit 3.12,
        MS-Kermit> library
    >> From chief,
        Which service would you like? library
        login: library
    >> From VMS,
        set terminal/device=VT100
        telnet opac.lib.iup.edu
        login: library

(3) to access libraries on the Internet, start with $ netutil libs

life cycle -
a metaphor for the phases that a software system goes through from its
inception until it is discarded or replaced.  There are several models for the
software life cycle.  Typical phases are called system analysis, system design,
implementation, testing, installation, use and maintenance.

LIFO - Last In First Out; a stack data structure.

line - a line segment extended infinitely forward and backward.

line segment - the sum of all the points that lie on a path between two points.

linear nested if -
a case decision structure which is implemented by an if..else if..elseif..endif
form of an if statement.  See also "CASE" in this glossary and examples from
Dr. Cross.  Note that a linear nested if statement requires multiple endif
statements in many languages, which makes a case statement a more practical way
to implement a case decision.

linked list -
a representation of a list in which each item in the list includes a pointer to
the next item in the list (or nil/NULL).

list-directed I/O -
I/O which occurs for a list of variables and is formatted according to compiler
defaults rather than explicit programmer specifications. In Fortran,
list-directed I/O statements use an asterisk (*) as a format.  On input, values
may be separated by one or more spaces or a single comma. Character values must
be enclosed in apostrophes (single quotes '').  On output, numeric values are
surrounded by spaces and character values are just strung together.

LOC - lines of code

local networks - 
communication networks that provide interconnection of varied data
communicating devices within a small geographic area. The acronym LAN refers to
a Local Area Network.

local variable -
a variable that is known only in the block of code in which it is contained.

log -
(1) a record of a system's activity. For example, a record of transactions
    against a database.
(2) an abbreviation for "logout", the command to terminate a session of
    interactive computer use in vms.

logic bomb -
a software sabotage technique which consists of a program which is executed
when a particular set of events happens, like a particular date or a particular
user uses the software. (see "trigger")

logical if -
in Fortran, a one-line IF statement with exactly one statement and no false
alternative.  For example:

       IF (a .EQ. 1) PRINT *, 'a is equal to 1'

login.com -
a VMS identifier for a file of commands that are automatically executed at
login time.  At IUP, separate login.com files may be placed in the user's
disk$member and disk$user directories.  Additional login.com files may be
installed by the project supervisor and the system programmers in the ISCC.

logo -
a graphic symbol for an organization or other object. For example, the letters
IUP arranged in a copyrighted graphic form is the official IUP logo.

lookup -
to search for something in a data structure. For example, to find something in
a database.

loose coupling -
relatively little coupling between a program module and the environment in
which it is used; a desirable attribute of a program module. See coupling.

LOW-VALUE - a figurative constant in Cobol that means the lowest collating
value that can be represented in an eight-bit byte; X'00'.

lse - 
Language Sensitive Editor, a DEC VMS product. See $help lse. Note that lse is
one of a class of text editors for programming that facilitate the entry of
correct syntax and the correction of syntax errors. Vax lse is both
multi-language and extensible to user-defined language syntaxes.

lurking -
watching events in electronic discourse without participating, often to get the 
tone and acceptable behaviors of an electronic group.

lynx -
a client program that provides a user-friendly ASCII interface to WAIS
servers. The program is maintained and distributed by the University
of Kansas. Try $ lynx http://egret.ma.iup.edu

M&P - 
the text used for CO 315 in Fall 1994. Miller, Nancy E., and Petersen, Charles
G. "File Structures with Ada." 1990. Benjamin/Cummings Publishing Company,
Inc.

m-ary tree - see n-ary tree

m-way search tree -
a search tree in which each node has out-degree <= m, each node is composed of
a set of pointers and key values, and the key values are arranged in a specific
manner that facilitates searches thru the pointer structures.  A binary search
tree is a special case of an m-way search tree.  (Loomis)

machine cycle - 
the minimum unit of time that something happens in a CPU. In many cases, an 
integer add instruction consumes one machine cycle. "Clock cycle" is a similar
term. See also MHertz.

macro - 
(1) (ISO) an instruction in a source language that is to be replaced by a
defined sequence of instructions in the same source language.  The macro
instruction may also specify values for parameters in the instructions that are
to replace it.  Examples of this kind of macro can be found in word processors,
spreadsheets, and the C programming language.
 
(2) In assembler programming, an assembler language statement that causes the
assembler to process a predefined set of statements called a macro definition. 
The statements normally produced from the macro definition replace the macro
instruction in the program.

mainframe - 
a relatively large computer; a computer that provides multiple memory and
processing services to multiple users.

maintainability - 
a combined measure of understandability, modifiability and verifiability.

maintenance (of software) - see software maintenance

make -
a Unix utility that builds and rebuilds an executable version of an application
system with a minimum of compilation and linking. See "man make" on a Unix
system or any Unix text.

man -
the Unix command for help. The command is short for "manual".

management -
the planning organizing, controlling, directing and staffing of an activity.

Mandelbrot set - 
a set of points in the complex plane such that the sequence of numbers formed
by squaring the previous number and adding a constant does not diverge.  The
images of Mandelbrot sets are self-similar at any level of magnification and
are an exceptionally rich source of color images and mathematical diversion.

map -
to establish a set of values having a defined correspondence with the
quantities or values of another set. (ISO)  In graphics, a map is a set of
values for the pixels in an image.  Another example is a linkage editor map.

martini -
a geographic name server run by the University of Michigan. To set up a VMS 
symbol for it: $ martini == "telnet martini.eecs.umich.edu/port=3000"
Use Martini for facts you migth expect in an almanac or encyclopedia. To get
started, give the command HELP.

massively parallel -
term used to describe a computing system that is capable of applying 1,000 or
more processing elements to a single job.

math functions -
to link math functions on Ultrix systems, cc demo.c -lm

MBO - Management By Objectives

meeting - 
in VAXnotes, a meeting is one form of a conference. (See conference.)  In
VisionQuest, a meeting is called a dialogue. (See dialogue.)

meg - a million bytes of data storage. See also mega and bytes.

mega - a prefix which means one million (10^6) or 2^20. (see kilo)

MegaHertz - see MHertz

megaprogramming -
a technology for large-scale programming using modules.  It is a form of
programming which encompasses largeness, persistence, diversity, and large
capital investment.  See CACM, 1993.  (Shamim, 1993)

memory -
the ISO standard describes memory as "a deprecated term for main storage". 
Related terms include transient vs. permanent memory, main (primary) memory vs.
auxiliary (secondary) memory; virtual memory; mass storage; optical memory vs.
magnetic memory; RAM and ROM; PROM and EPROM.

menu - 
(1) a list from which you can choose an option, e.g., in a restaurant you place
an order from a menu, while on a computer you click on or otherwise indicate
your choice.

(2) a campus data service run by the ISCC for the IUP community.  The "menu"
program provides access to campus data ranging from an event calendar and data
center hours to student records and scheduling data.  For example, to look up
the current configuration of the vax cluster, select Academic Applications,
Faculty Guide to IUP Computing, Mainframe Systems and Services.

message -
a request for an object to carry out the actions in one of the operations of
its class.

metacharacter - 
a character which means something other than itself in a particular context. 
For example, a wildcard character in an ambiguous file reference is a
metacharacter.  In Unix and C, you may "quote" a metacharacter to obtain its
literal value of its metavalue, depending on context.

metafile - 
a file which is used for long-term storage of a computer graphic image.

method - 
an operation on a class that returns an object. A method is analogous to a
procedure or function in a procedural context.  A method is code bound to an
object.  The code provides an interface for messages requesting an operation
and a means to perform the requested operation.  (also known as a demon) 

methodology -
any set of rational principles for the SYSTEMATIC design of an artifact. (CJS,
in CO319, 10/8/86)

metric - see software metrics

MFlops - Millions of floating point operations per second.

MHertz - 
millions of cycles per second for a CPU. All other things being equal, a 33
MHertz 486 will run faster than a 25 MHertz 486. However, there are many factors
which may influence the speed of a system.

MHz - see MHertz

MICR -
Magnetic Ink Character Recognition, the standard and hardware technology for
symbols which are printed in magnetically sensitized ink.  Banks use MICR to
read account/bank/document id's printed on checks, deposit slips, and other
documents.  (Chow, 1993)

micro - a prefix which means one millionth or 10^(-6).

microcomputer support -  Stright G1; 357-7870

microprocessor -
a chip which contains the ALU and the control unit for a microcomputer.

Microsoft technical support - ftp.microsoft.com

middleware -
technology that shields applications from underlying network protocols and
operating systems. For example, "middleware" may allow users to access multiple
databases without knowing the intricacies of each. More generally, middleware
makes connections between client and server in a distributed computing
environment possible.  The term is part buzzword and part hype, but with
current emphasis on things like client-server, distributed computing, and open
systems, it is a necessity.  (See Information Week, November 1, 1993, p. 62)

MIDI -
an acronym for Musical Instrument Digital Interface, the default standard in
the music industry for digital instrument communication.  It was created with
the purpose of solving ever-increasing musical equipment compatibility
problems.  Implications of MIDI usage include simultaneous linkage of several
digital instruments and/or a computer and creation of a "tapeless" recording/
sequencing facility. (Jeff Senley, 1991)

milli - a prefix which means one thousandth or 10^(-3).

MIMD -
Multiple Instruction and Multiple Data-stream capability for parallel
processing in a computer architecture.  The Cray X-MP computer is actually a
MIMD/SIMD hybrid because it allows more than one of its processors to work on
different parts of a problem using a shared memory (MIMD) while each processor
has the capability of vectorized computations (SIMD).

minicomputer -
a "midrange" computer, somewhere between a personal microcomputer and
a mainframe in cost, speed, and data storage capacity. A minicomputer
might be dedicated to a single mutliuser task, like registration, or
used to manage the communications of a network, like the Vax front-end
processors (FEPs).

MIPS -
       (1) Millions of instructions per second; often derived by dividing
           MHertz rating by cycles per instruction.  
       (2) Mips Computer Systems, a computer vendor.
       (3) A trade journal.

MISD -
Multiple Instruction and Single Data-stream capability for parallel processing
in a computer architecture.

model -
a scaled down version of something that can be used to represent it or
demonstrate interesting behaviors. See system model.

modem -
a MOdulator/DEModulator device that converts digital signals to analog and vice
versa, thereby making it possible to transmit computer signals over telephone
lines.

modularization -
breaking a complex task into smaller tasks. The quality of modularization
decisions is reflected in the criteria of "strong binding and loose coupling." 
A strongly bound module is cohesive; a loosely coupled module shares little
data with other modules. (see cohesion and coupling)

module -
a separately compilable file of source code.  Note that COPY and INCLUDE files
are discrete parts of the code for a system, but they are not separately
compilable. The difficulty of developing, understanding, and modifying the code
for a system is dependent the number of modules, their size, their interfaces,
and their internal cohesiveness.  In general, either having too many modules or
having modules that are too long can cause difficulty. 

more -
the Unix utility to display an ascii file one screen at a type,
pausing until a space is entered. This is the rough equivalent of a
VMS type/page command, which pauses until a <return> is entered.

motherboard - 
in bus architecture, a copper printed circuit trace board with circuit traces
in approximately parallel lines and connectors for modules (printed-circuit
cards, or daughterboards) located at convenient intervals. A printed circuit
trace may be viewed as a group of wires with their insulation stripped off,
laid in a pattern on a board, and permanently set in place. The important
feature of a motherboard is that daughter boards can easily be inserted or
removed. A motherboard is also known as a backplane.

mount -
to inform the operating system that a file system is present and thus
make it available to users. This is a Unix term.

mouse - 
a hand-held input device which is connected to a computer system by a wire
"tail".  As an input device, a mouse has the advantage of allowing the user to
look at whatever it is he or she is manipulating. A mouse is limited by the
need for a surface to move it on. A pen is more appropriate for drawing.

MS-DOS - Microsoft Disk Operating System

MTBF - Mean Time Between Failures

MTTD - Mean Time To Detect (a fault in a computing process), also
known as error latency.

MTTF - Mean Time To Failure

MTTR - Mean Time To Repair (or Recover).

multicomputer -
a processor network in which each CPU has its own private memory.  Coordination
is accomplished by message passing.  See multiprocessor.  (Merlino, 1993)

Multics -
a multiuser, time-shared operating system developed in the 60's by AT&T, GE and
others.  It was too large to ever be popular, but the experience gained from it
is reflected in other operating systems.

multimedia -
the integration of more than one medium in a communication or information
system.  For example, the integration of sound output with a GUI is a common
example of a low-level multimedia application.  Including voice and video input
and storage capabilities is a little more sophisticated at this time.  

multiple-level control break algorithm -
an algorithm to process records sequentially, allowing for a hierarchical
structure of interrecord dependence. For example, an IUP class registration
report may list enrollment counts by course within department within college.
These are multiple, hierarchically structured control breaks.

multiplexor channel -
a channel which can manage data flow between main memory and multiple devices 
simultaneously. See "channel" and "selector channel".

MULTIPLY - 
a Cobol verb.  See $ help cobol procedure multiply

multiprocessor -
a processor network in which the processors have a shared memory.  See
multicomputer.  (Merlino, 1993)

munge -
to make a mess of a good file, or on a display, or on a listing, or other
media. See also "garb".

n-ary tree -
a finite set of nodes which is either empty or consists of a root and at most n
disjoint n-ary trees (called subtrees).

NAK - see negative acknowledge character

nano -
a prefix which means one billionth or 10^(-9).  Grace Hopper frequently pointed
out that light travels a little less than a foot in one nanosecond and passed
out lengths of wire cut to the exact distance at her public appearances. (see
note attached to kilo)

NAPLPS - North American Presentation-Level Protocol Syntax, a standard for the
transmission of text and graphics to videotext and teletext terminals.

NASA - National Aeronautics and Space Administration

NCGA - National Computer Graphics Association

ndx - a filename extension that dBASE III PLUS uses for an index file.

negative acknowledge character -
(ISO) A transmission control character transmitted by a station as a negative
response to the station with which the connection has been set up.  A negative
acknowledgment in binary synchronous communication indicates that an error was
encountered in the previous transmission and that the receiving terminal is
ready to accept another transmission.

nested IF -
an IF statement which contains another IF statement in either its true or false
alternative.

net -
for all practical purposes in 1993, "the net" is the Internet and all systems
which can send mail via the Internet. This slightly loose definition includes
CompuServe and other commercial systems which allow E-mail links to the
Internet. Who know what the NII "Information Infrastructure" will add to the
net in 1994?

NetMail -
a program used to communicate from a local mail system to nodes on wide-area
communication networks.  A typical syntax for using netmail is to address an
e-mail message To: netmail%"jacross@grove.iup.edu".  The word "in" may be
substituted for netmail resulting in To: in%"..."

network - see computer network

network protocol -
the design (and behavior) of software used to communicate over a LAN or a WAN. 
Examples: NFS, TCP/IP, SNA, DECnet. see protocol.

NeXT -
a small computer vendor (~350 employees in 1991) and their principal product,
NeXT software.  The Nextstation is no longer being produced because it is not
based on RISC technology.  The amount and quality of software that are bundled
with the Nextstation are the best available. (John Cross, Dec. 1991.)

NeXT made two deals recently.  Cannon is going to start production of an INTEL
based (486/Pentium) NeXT-dedicated workstation.  In addition, SUN is going to
use NeXTSTEP as part of the next revision to its SOLARIS software. (Don
Rosenberger, March 1994.)

NIH - 
Not Invented Here.  This acronym is used to describe a situation where people
reject something because someone else developed it. (Of course, it may also
refer to the National Institutes of Health.)

NII - 
an acronym for the "National Information Infrastructure," also know as the
"Information Highway" popularized in Time and Newsweek and promoted by Gore and
Clinton.  Techies may think Internet, average citizens may think interactive TV
and access to movies, others may think multimedia who knows what . . . (as of
late 1993) . . .

nil - 
nothing; by common usage, a data file with no content. NIL is also used in
Pascal as a value for a pointer that is initialized to point to nothing.

NIOSH -
National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health, responsible for
monitoring emissions from CRTs among other things.

node - 
(1) In a data network, a point where one or more functional units interconnect
data transmission lines.

(2) The representation of a state or event by means of a point on a diagram.

(3) In a tree data structure, a point at which subordinate items of data
originate. (SRA DP Glossary, 1979)
    
noise - 
anything which interferes with the playback of a recorded signal or the
reception of a transmitted signal. Dust and dirt on magnetic media are noise,
and so is the interference of two people talking at once in a meeting. Anything
which interferes with the accurate communication of meaning is termed semantic
noise. (Note: this implies that the problem of noise is a sub-problem of that
of semantic noise.)

normalization transformation - 
in computer graphics, the mapping of a window onto a viewport.  This mapping is
also called a viewing transformation, or windowing transformation.

notify -
a qualifier on the vms submit command that directs vms to send a message to the
user when a submitted task completes (or aborts).  See $ help submit /notify

Novell -
Novell Netware is popular software for LANs in 1994. Novell claims a market
share of over 60%. Pathworks, by Digital Equipment Corporation, is a distant
competitor. The basic functions include installation; sharing printers, disk
drives, and applications; and security.

NP-complete -
a mathematically formal statement of whether or not there is an efficient
algorithm to solve a problem. Generally, an NP-complete problem is
"intractable" (too hard for a computer). An algorithm to solve an NP-complete
problem frequently amounts to trying every possible solution where the number
of solutions is too large to consider them all.

NREN - 
National Research and Education Network, a gigabit-per-second data
communications network proposed for completion by 1996.

NSA - National Security Agency

NSF - National Science Foundation; bulletin from Mark Strawcutter follows:

Description: NSF Science and Technology Information System        
From: MJSTRAW      Date:    27-AUG-1991 21:25

From: OAK::MJSTRAW
TELNET to stis.nsf.gov, use login "public" (in lowercase).  For terminal
type vt100 (the default) works fine.  With a DOS PC running KERMIT, put
NumLock ON and use the arrows and such from the numeric keypad.  Getting
help at the terminal type prompt is a good idea the first time.

nsfnet -
a university computer network which is operated by the National Science
Foundation; the backbone and fastest connections of the Internet.
    (Tawann Simmons, 1993)

nth - numbered with an unspecified or inordinately large ordinal number.  For
example, to the nth degree.

null - 
something that amounts to nothing; in C, NULL is defined in stddef.h as
a pointer to address zero. The c value NULL for a pointer is similar to the
Pascal value NIL.

object - 
an element of a computer system that has a unique identity, state (represented
by public and private data), and public and private operations that define the
behavior and state of the object. By maintaining standard interfaces, objects
can be treated as "black boxes" which can be reused, modified and replaced
wihtout affecting the rest of the program. An object is avariable, or
instantiation of a class.  Another description: An object is an encapsulated
software entity that provides services when it receives a message from a
client. (related terms: information hiding, class and abstract data type) 

object-oriented design - 
modularizing a problem into smaller problems based on data (including the state
of an object) rather than function.

object-oriented programming -
a programming methodology based on modeling data objects and their behaviors
after the real-world entities they represent in a computation. In contrast to
structured programming, which breaks a problem into a hierarchical structure of
subordinate tasks, OOP models a problem domain as a set of interacting entities
(called objects). Thus, objects and classifications identified during the
analysis phase of software development are preserved during the design and
implementation phases. 

A typical object might be a screen that has attributes of size and location and
behaviors corresponding to different interactive mechanisms.

Smalltalk is reputed to be the purest and intrinsically best object-oriented
OOP language, but C++ is more widely known and used.

See object-oriented design.

oblique -
any angle other than a right angle.  In graphics, an oblique projection is any
projection in which the projection plane is not perpendicular to the lines of
projection.  In most cases, an oblique projection has a view plane which is
parallel to a front planar face of an object being viewed, with the projection
lines drawn at an acute angle to that face.  For example, when 3D axes are
drawn on a 2D surface with tow of the axes at right angles and the third axis
headed off at an angle, you are viewing an oblique projection.  Cavalier and
cabinet are common choices for oblique projections.

observability -
the property of a program that describes its production of consistent output
for distinct inputs. A program which lacks this property is dependent on state
variables which are not specified in its interface.

octal - a representation of a number in a base-8 system.

ODA -
Office Document Architectures; a set of architectures for office documents that
are being considered for international standardization. There are currently
about 25 descriptions. This effort is related to the SGML effort in the sense
that SGML embeds markers of the logical structure of a document, while ODA
describes what a particular type of document ought to look like. Vendors of
computer systems use ODA (e.g., as part of DEC's Compound Document Architecture
system), while SGML is a standards effort. (HMMicco and Phil Andrews, 12/91)

OEM -
an acronym for Original Equipment Manufacturer.  A company or organization that
purchases computers and peripheral equipment for use as components in products
and equipment that they subsequently sell to their customers.

OLE -
an acronym for Object Linking and Embedding, a Microsoft mechanism for seamless
integration of application programs. For example, Microsoft Word and Excel have
OLEs.  OpenDoc is a similar mechanism from Apple, Borland, and IBM. Both models
define mechanisms for files to contain data areas owned by different objects.
For example, a word processing document may contain a data area that is owned
by a spreadsheet application.

ones complement -
the straight complement of a binary number.  (See twos complement, which is the
ones complement plus 1.)

ontology -
in logic and Artificial Intelligence, the primitive concepts, terminology, and
interpretation paradigms of a domain of discourse which together provide a
conceptual framework for talking about an application domain.

OO - 
(1) object-oriented. For example, OODBMS. See object-oriented design.
(2) Pronounced oh-oh. An expression of dismay.  See oops.

OOD - see Object-oriented design

OOP - see object-oriented programming

oops -
if you arrived at this entry from the OO entry you do not have a humerus bone
in your arm.

open - 
(1) as a verb, open means to prepare a data set (file) for processing. In the
    context of particular operating systems and/or programming languages, this
    includes completing a set of attributes for the file which is to be
    accessed and returning a status code which indicates if an input file does
    not exist or cannot be read, an output file cannot be written, or
    everything is OK. See also "extend" and $ help cobol procedure open or
    similar helps in Fortran, Pascal, and C.,

(2) As a modifier in a compound term, e.g., in the terms open systems or open
    addressing, the term open connotes "accessibility".

open addressing -
in hashing techniques for random file addressing, any approach to collision
resolution whereby synonyms are all stored in the file's primary address space.
These techniques are generally compared with separate overflow addressing.

open lab -
a lab in which students may work on a variety of projects without direct
supervision. In current CS educational practice, an open lab is usually
equivalent to a project which has a deadline but no dedicated lab.
See also closed lab.

open subroutine -
(ISO standard) a subroutine of which a replica must be inserted at each place
in a computer program at which the subroutine is used. Synonymous with direct
insert subroutine.

open systems -
the ability of applications to be independent of the hardware and software
platform.  DEC said in their 1992 DECUS Annual Report: "What people really want
when they say 'open', in all its forms, is access to whatever kind of
information there is, and they want access to whatever kind of application they
like, and they want to do it through whatever kind of appliance they like to
put their fingers and eyes on.  And they really don't care who built it or what
kind of operating systems it runs."  In short, users want to do their own thing
with the details of the supporting systems being 'transparent' to them.

operating system (ISO) -
software that controls the execution of computer programs and that may provide
scheduling, debugging, input/output control, accounting, compilation, storage
assignment, data management, and related services.

operation -
in OOP, a class-level abstraction describing a sequence of messages or actions
that access or change the state of an instance of a class. 

operator - 
a symbol that causes one or more values to be manipulated to produce a single
result.  For example, a unary minus negates the value of a numeric data value
and a concatenation operator combines two character-string values into a single 
character-string value.

optimum binary search tree -
a binary search tree in which expected search times are minimized. The cost
time for a successful search can be measured as the sum of the products of the
frequency of search for each node, represented as a probability, times the
level of the node. The cost time for unsuccessful searches can be represented
as the sum of the products of the probabilities of arriving at an external node
times the level of each external node.

oracle - a mechanism to predict what the result of a test should be before
running the test. An oracle gives you some idea if a test should be
run and helps evaluate the correctness of actual tests.

order of magnitude - 
a difference in two measures that is about ten, as opposed to a difference that
is about 100 (two orders of magnitude), or closer to a smaller multiple
(ten-to-the-zero power is one).

organization - see "file organization:

orphan -
in printed documents, the last line of a paragraph that is printed as the first
line of a new page.

orthogonal -
(1) at a right angle to; perpendicular to.
(2) in a discussion, a remark or concern that is going "at a right angle to"
the course of the discussion.

OS/2 - an IBM-sponsored operating system for microcomputers. The strength of
OS/2 is that it is multitasking and generally a much more capable operating
system than DOS.  Its weakness is that it is huge and an IBM product in an open
world.  The amazing thing about it is that it is holding up well beyond what
people thought it would (as of 11/93).

OSI - Open Systems Interconnection (see open systems)

OTA - the U.S. Office of Technology Assessment.

outsourcing -
obtaining computing expertise and facilities management outside of an
organization.

overloading -
the ability to attach more than one meaning to the same name in the same scope
as differentiated by type or some other class characteristic. (Overloading is a
simple form of polymorphism.) 

overstrike mode - 
a text editing mode in which characters replace characters already in a file as
they are entered. This mode is also called "overtyping". It is usually
implemented in a way that a user can choose either "insert" mode or overstrike
mode.

overtyping - entering data in overstrike mode.

PACISE -
Pennsylvania Computer and Information Science Educators (pronounced pay-cease)

package - 
an Ada construct that declares a set of data and program units in a single
program unit and can be used to create ADT's.

packet switching - 
a method of digital communication in which messages are divided into packets of
a bit size which is determined by the needs of the transmission network, and
are transferred to their destination in a store-and-forward manner over
multiple "virtual" circuits, which are dedicated to the connection only for the
duration of the transmission of the packet.

page fault -
the event that a program which is executing needs to access auxiliary memory
for data or instructions which are not currently in its RAM.

page-break -
an event in which the output of a process starts appearing on a new physical
page. A "soft" page-break occurs when the processor decides to start a new
page; a "hard" page-break occurs when the user directs the processor to start a
new page (<ctl-return> in WordPerfect).

palindrome - 
a string that reads the same both forward and backward. Upper/lower case and
spaces are often ignored. Examples are "abcBA" and "otto".

panel - 
an interactive device in windows interfaces which is like a menu, usually with
a query and buttons and possibly a place for text entry.

panning effects - 
in computer graphics, the visual effects produced by moving a fixed-size window
across a larger picture.

paradigm -
literally, an example or pattern. "A programming paradigm is a collection of
conceptual patterns that together mold the design process and ultimately
determine a program's structure." (Ambler et al., IEEE Computer, Sep 1992, p.
28) Object-oriented programming and procedural programming are considered to be
programming paradigms.

PARADOX - 
a DBMS that is popular with PC users in 1993.  It is currently regarded as a
better package than dBASE IV at this time.

paragraph -
in Cobol, a part of the source code that begins with a paragraph-name and ends
with the next paragraph, section, division, or end of source code.  A paragraph
must contain at least one sentence.  A paragraph is slightly different from the
Cobol concept of a procedure (or module) because a Cobol procedure could be a
SECTION.

parallel arrays -
two or more arrays whose ith entries all relate to an ith entity. Parallel
arrays are an alternative to arrays of record (Cobol and Pascal) or structure
(C) variables.

parallel computer -
a computer which incorporates multiple processors operating simultaneously
(i.e., in parallel).

parallel programming - 
programs which incorporate concurrent execution of threads that may compete for
shared resources when cooperating in accomplishing a common goal.

parameter -

(1) a variable that is given a constant value for a specified execution of a
procedure. For example, the source and destination objects in a copy command
are two of its parameters.

(2) a name in a procedure that is used to refer to an argument passed to that
procedure.

(see also argument, actual argument, dummy argument)

parity -
a state of things being equal or equivalent. In computer system architecture,
the term is often applied to a technique for adding a bit to a physical unit of
computer data (like a word of memory or a packet of data transmission) that is
set on or off (1 or 0) for all such units according to an odd or even parity
scheme.  For example, when a data transmission is received, the receiver can
check if an even or odd number of bits is received. If the "parity" of the
transmission is not what was expected, there must be something wrong with the
communication link or the transmission.

parse - see parsing

parsing - 
the use of syntax and contextual cues to determine the functions of the tokens
(words) in an expression (generally, but not necessarily, linguistic) in order
to create a data structure that can be used to get at the "meaning" of the
expression.

PASCAL - 
a programming language developed by Niklaus Wirth in the early 1970's and named
after the French mathematician.  It is a block-structured language designed to
facilitate learning programming skills.

patent -
a document which grants exclusive right to the production, use, sale, and
profit of an invention. Since the early 1980s, and especially in the late
1980s, patents have been issued on particular techniques that can be used to
build programs, or particular features that programs offer. For example,
Apple's HyperCard program allegedly violates patent number 4,736,308 for
displaying portions of two or more strings together on one screen, effectively
scrolling with multiple subwindows. Scrolling and subwindows are common
techniques, but combining them may be a violation of patent law. 

The threat is that software patents may inhibit software development in the
U.S. The former policy of providing intellectual property rights to software
developers via trade secret laws provided less protection but threatened less
legal entanglement for software developers. (See Dr. Dobb's Journal, November
1990, pp. 56-73.)

pathname - 
a list of directories and separators (/ in Unix or \ in DOS) ending with the
name of a directory or nondirectory file.  A pathname is used to trace a path
through the file structure of locate or identify a file.

pattern recognition - 
the identification of shapes, forms, or configurations by automatic means.
(ISO)  For example, as in computer vision, speech recognition, or a spelling
corrector as implemented in the glossary program.

PBX - 
an acronym for "Private Branch Exchange". Designed and used in the 1970s
predominantly as a telephone switching device for offices, PBX has evolved into
a powerful tool for integrated voice/data transmission and networking. (Black,
"Data Netowrks", 1989. Pages 842-852.

PC - 
(1) a personal computer.  Initially, in 1981 and for a few years after, a pc
was an IBM microcomputer.  In 1991, the term connotes a single-user
microcomputer.  

(2) a popular magazine on personal microcomputing.

PDL - process design language

peer to peer -
a computer networking system which involves two systems running the same
protocols interacting at a peer level. That is, there no hierarchical
relationship between them. For example, the term client/server does not apply
to peer to peer interaction.

PEMF -
pulsed electromagnetic field; electrically generated magnetic fields that have
been used to treat bone fractures. Concerned people have argued that if PEMFs
have a positive effect on human bones, they might also have hidden negative
effects on users of CRTs.

PERT - Program Evaluation and Review Technique

physical symbol system (Alan Newell) - 
a collection of patterns and processes, with the processes capable of
producing, destroying and modifying patterns.  Patterns designate objects,
processes or other patterns.  Patterns which designate processes can be
interpreted. Examples include computers and human beings. According to Newell,
a physical system has the capability for intelligent behavior.

PIC clause -
in Cobol, the term PIC clause is an abbreviation for PICTURE clause.  A Cobol
PICTURE clause may be used to define a number of attributes of  an elementary
field, particularly the type, length, and editing specifications. If you are on
a VMS system, enter the following for more detail: 

           $ help cobol data clause pic

pipelining -
a method of parallel processing in which execution of a new task is started
before the preceding task is completed.

piracy - see software piracy

pirate - see software piracy

pivot node (of an AVL tree) - 
the node which is the closest unbalanced ancestor of a node which is being
inserted into an AVL tree. A node of an AVL tree is balanced or unbalanced
depending on whether its left and right subtrees have equal height.

pixel - 
a picture element.  An image is composed of many picture elements, each with a
set of attributes.

pixel map -
a representation of an image that is composed of a set of attributes for every
pixel in the image.  Related terms: pixel, pixmap, frame buffer.

pixmap - a pixel map

PL1 -
Programming Language 1. PL1 is a higher-level programming language that has
roots in ALGOL, COBOL, and FORTRAN. PL1 was popular on large IBM systems in the
late 1960s and early 1970s, but its popularity waned when no standard emerged.

plane - 
the set of points whose rectangular location coordinates satisfy an equation of
the form Ax + By + Cz = D.

platform -
jargon for the computer hardware and operating system where application
software is being run. The term is a metaphorical reference to a distinct
showplace where something is happening.

pluralistic society -
members of diverse ethnic, racial, religious, or social groups maintain an
autonomous participation in and development of their independent culture or
special interest within the confines of a common civilization. (Webster's New
College Dictionary)

point - an infinitesimal location in space (2D or 3D).

pointer -
a data type which stores the address of a memory location where a data value of
a specified type is stored. For example, a pointer type could be declared as
"pointer to integer" or "pointer to pointer to floating point value".

polymorphism -
giving an action one name that is shared up and down an object hierarchy, with
each object in the hierarchy implementing the action in a way appropriate to
itself.  For example, two classes called car and boat can perform an operation
called "move", but the method which carries out the operation is different. 
The use of the same command to generate similar effects using different code is
polymorphism.  

POP -
an acronym for Post Office Protocol, a service used on the Internet to allow
remote noted to run local mail software, thus lowering connect time.

port -
(1) to install software in another system other than the one it was constructed
    in.
(2) a functional unit of a node thru which data can enter or leave a data
    network.
(3) an access point for data entry or exit to a system.
(4) in data communication, that part of a data processor which is dedicated
    to a single data channel for the purpose of receiving data from or
    transmitting data to one or more external, remote devices.

portability -
the ability to use data and programs with different computer systems (the
essential differences are hardware, media, recording specifications, and
operating systems).  The concept of physical portability is often confused with
this computer-specific meaning because it is something that people look for in
microcomputer and telecommunications systems.

porting from unix to vms -
This example will show how the pattern matching in glossary will distinguish
between unix to vms and vms to unix.

porting from vms to unix -
This is an example of a computing tip that a user consultant might like to
remember and be able to retrieve.

POSIX - the IEEE portable operating system interface standards

postscript - 
a trademark of Adobe Systems, Inc., for a device-independent page description
language.  Postscript can be used to drive many popular laser printers to
produce desktop publishing quality in terms of fonts, font sizes, graphics, and
in some cases color.  Postscript is widely used for passing graphic output
between devices and installations because it is "clear text", that is, it does
not contain tricky little binary codes that confuse file transfer programs.

The postscript language is defined best in two paperback books, a Tutorial and
a Reference Manual, published by Addison-Wesley and Copyrighted 1986.  Many
system programmers and system managers keep these books on hand.

At IUP, postscript is effective at producing striking effects on the laser
printer attached to the vaxes in Stright Hall.  Documentation is available in
the file:   ldisk$colib:[compsci.jac-txt]postscript.doc.

precedence -
in an expression which contains multiple operators, the order in which
operators are evaluated. Because of its rich (and complex) set of operators,
the precedence rules for C are particularly detailed. For example, in the
following statement, the precedence of evaluating the operators can be shown by
adding parentheses.

             x = a + b / c * d;  is equivalent to:
             x = (a + ((b / c) * d));

predicate - 
(1) in logic, that which is affirmed or denied about the subject of a
proposition.

(2) in grammar, the words that make a statement about the subject, for example:
    The wind <blows>.
    The wind <blows from the East>.
    John <threw the ball>.
    The grass <is green>.
(These definitions and examples came from Webster's Unabridged Dictionary.)

predicate calculus - 
the branch of symbolic logic that uses symbols for quantifiers and for subjects
and predicates of propositions as well as for unanalyzed propositions and
logical connectives. Called also functional calculus. See also propositional
calculus.

presentation graphics - 
passive, support graphics to aid clarity, conciseness and focus to numeric
data.  This form of graphics generally takes the form of charts.  Much of its
power is drawn from its universality, conciseness (i.e., greater information
transfer 'bandwidth') and the fact that humans process visual data differently
than numbers and words.

press -
a mouse action which involves pointing at something, pressing a mouse button
and holding it down.  When it works, this action should have an effect like a
multiple click.  Think of holding down a key and kicking in an auto-repeat
feature for that keystroke.

prettyprinter -
a program which takes a source program as input and produces a
"beautified" version of the source with conventional indentation.
Turbo compilers (Borland) and the Unix cb and indent utilities are
examples of automatic formatting of source code. The functions of a
prettyprinter may go beyond indentation; the basic concept is to
automatically enhance the readability of code by changing what it
looks like.

prime -
a term used in cleanroom engineering to represent a specification that is
implemented directly in code and must be verified by a proof.

primitive -
a term that is occasionally used in cleanroom engineering as a synonym for 
"prime". A primitive specification is one that cannot be expanded any
further without implementation in the target programming environment.
E.g., "Swap the values of two array elements." Note that a primitive
is the limit of a general-purpose design language. It is included with
code as a comment in cleanroom style and it is verified by arguing
that its corresponding code does what the primitive says.

printer -
a device that produces a visible record of data from a computer system on paper
or other media.

printer queue - 
in VMS at IUP, to find the names of the printer queues type SHOW QUEUE.  To
find the names of laser printer options, SHOW Q/DEVICE=PRINTER.  To find the
names of forms (types of paper), SHOW Q/FORM 1v*. (There are so many forms that
you should limit what you ask for.  The same comment applies to the queues.)

privileged instruction - 
(ISO standard) an instruction that may be used only by a supervisory program.

prn - 
a filename extension which Lotus 1-2-3 uses to indicate the output of a Print
to File command.

problem domain - 
problems which share a common source of complexity, at a pertinent level of
abstraction, or from an appropriate point of view. E.g., business data
processing, real-time process control, or file / database applications.

procedure division -
the part of a Cobol program that process the data and files described in the
ENVIRONMENT and DATA divisions.  Pseudocode documents the control flow
which is coded in the PROCEDURE DIVISION.  See $ help cobol procedure.

process -
in Unix, the execution of a command by the operating system. In general, an
executable file that has been invoked but has not terminated.

process design language (PDL) -
a language for designing programs that has some features of both natural
language and programming languages. The advantages of a PDL are that it is
closer to the language of the application than a programming language, it can
be independent of a particular programming language, and it is textual, which
makes it easier to apply computer tools. (see pseudocode)

processor - 
software or hardware capable of  processing data. For example, a CPU or a
programming language processor.

profile - 
(1) a program written by IUP staff to automatically establish what kind of
system is communicating with our VAX hosts. $ set terminal/inquire accomplishes
the same thing.
(2) lots of other things .. ask if you are interested.

program - see computer program

program block - 
a portion of a program which contains all the declarations, definitions, and
other statements for a task. The concept of a program block includes the
ability to limit the scope of any of its identifiers to that block, or some
part of it.  For example, in PASCAL, the block structures are PROCEDURE,
FUNCTION, and PROGRAM. Related concepts: scope, compound statement.

program design language (PDL) -
a common meaning for the acronym PDL, although process design language is a
preferred meaning.

programmer - see computer programmer

programming environment - 
a software development environment (SDE) that supports only the programming
process. See Sommerville, 4th edition, page 352. The Bell Labs "Programmer's
Workbench," circa 1977, is a prime example.

programming language - 
a set of conventions for representing an algorithm in a way that can be
translated into computer instructions.

prompt -
a character displayed by an operating system or application program to indicate
that a computer is ready to accept commands. For example, the $p$g command in
DOS causes the operating system to display the current drive and directory ($p)
and a > symbol ($g) as its prompt.

propellor head -
a term that non-hackers might use to describe techies. The term may derive from
science fiction fandom's tradition of propellor beanies as fannish insignia.
Similar terms: computer geek, computer nerd, digit head.

propositional calculus -
the branch of symbolic logic that uses symbols for unanalyzed propositions and
logical connectives only. Also called "sentential calculus". See also predicate
calculus.

protocol - a set of rules governing the exchange of data.

prototype -
a functioning model that is constructed for developer and client assessment.

PrtSc - 
a key on microcomputer keyboards that attempts to allow the user to immediately
print whatever is displayed on the screen.  On some systems printing can only
be stopped by turning off the printer.  Some things that appear on the screen
do not print.  For example, underlining in WordPerfect and other things that
are caused by "hidden characters" do not print.

PSC - Pittsburgh Supercomputing Center

pseudocode -
a method for expressing an algorithm in English-like statements that can be
rewritten in compilable code. Pseudocode differs from the concept of a program
definition language in its direct similarity to a particular programming
language. See program definition language (PDL).

public domain -
free from copyrights or patents, these programs may be used by the public
without compensation to the creators. (from an article by Andy Rathbone in
Compuserve Magazine, November 1993, p. 13. See also freeware, bannerware.)

public key encryption -
an asymmetric scheme for data encryption that uses a pair of keys. A public key
encrypts data and a corresponding secret key decrypts it. For digital
signatures, the process is reversed: the sender uses the secret key to create a
unique electronic number that can be read by anyone possessing the
corresponding public key in order to verify that the message is truly from the
sender.

purge -
a VMS command which deletes all but the highest numbered (most recent) versions
of a file.  The purge command is often combined with the /log qualifier so that
the files which are deleted are listed.

pwd -
the Unix shell command that executes the "print working directory" utility.
See "man pwd" on a Unix system.

QBE -
Query By Example, a database term

query -
in interactive systems, an action at a terminal that elicits a response from a
system. For example, a database software package may respond to a query about
all employees in the accounting department with a count and an average salary,
or it might list the employees, depending on how the query is prepared by the
user.

queue - 
a list data structure in which insertions may only be made at the end and
deletions may only be made from the beginning.  A queue is a first-in first-out
(FIFO) data structure.  (See stack)

quicksort -
a sorting algorithm first published by C.A.R. Hoare in 1961. It has an
average performance of O(n*log(n)) steps and a worst case performance
of O(n*n). See your data structures textbook for the details of the
algorithm. e

quit - 
a word that is often used to signal the end of an interactive process. 
Note: enter a blank line to terminate glossary.

quota - in VMS, the disk space alloted to a user. See show quota.

QWERTY -
an acronym for the most common arrangement of letters on a keyboard.  The
acronym comes from the first five letters on the top row of letters.  The
QWERTY keys were arranged to slow down typists in the early years so that the
did not go too fast for the early typewrites and jam the keys.  The modern
Dvorak arrangement is faster for a skilled keyboard person, but old ways can be
hard to change . . .

R&D - Research and Development

r-r - 
A text-limited way to laugh in e-mail. (Har-har, do you C it?)
A real belly laugh might come thru like r-d-r-r.

radix sort -
A 'bucket-sorting' algorithm which  has a unique destination for each sort
code, similar to an electronic card-sorter. This sorting concept is not only
conceptually simple, it also guarantees o(n*keywidth*keyrange) complexity as
opposed to o(n^2) or o(nlogn) for algorithms which do not make assumptions
about the sort keys. (This concept is a close relative of the DISTRIBSORT of CO
315, and is generally in the category of bin sorting algorithms.)

ragged-right -
text which is left-justified. (see justify)

RAM - Random Access Memory

random access -
the ability to access any addressable unit of data that is less than all of a
file or memory. For example, a random access record-oriented file allows a user
program to access any record without reading sequentially through the file to
the point where that record is stored.

random access memory -
conventional main memory that is both readable and writeable.

rank -
relative standing in a group.  For example, the IUP grade-check system reports
both student rank and absolute scores. Rank is a statement of how a student's
score compares to other scores.  Assigning letter grades based on a statistical
"curve" assigns a greater importance to rank in the grading process, while the
use of a 60%-70%-80%-90% standard is more criterion-based.

rapid prototyping -
in software engineering, a working model of a proposed system which is built
before design is complete, in order to help involve customers in determining
requirements and deciding on a final design.

rationale -
the underlying reason for doing something. In software development and
maintenance, there is a need to clarify and document the WHAT (requirements and
specifications), the HOW (design), and the WHY (rationale).

ray tracing -
a method of rendering graphic images that conceptually asks what the eye sees
through each pixel in the image but most often computes what a ray of light
from the eye through each pixel encounters. The light sources of the scene are
then considered to compute the ambient, diffuse, and specular components of
light. This method of rendering produces very high quality images at the cost
of extremely high amounts of computation.

RDBMS - a relational DBMS (see DBMS)

reactive system -
a concept that includes embedded systems (e.g., in autos, systems for
controlling brakes or carburetion), concurrent systems (e.g., parallel
algorithms), and real-time systems (e.g., telephone switching). These systems
often present "wicked problems" to software developments. [See Harel, IEEE
Computer, January 1992, p. 10.]

read -
a statement found in many programming languages.

>> In Cobol, the READ statement attempts to read a record from a specified
   file.  Common clauses to modify its meaning include AT END, NOT AT END, and
   INTO.  The READ file-name INTO identifier is equivalent to a READ file-name
   followed by a MOVE of the record into the identifier.  See $ help cobol
   procedure read 1.

read-only memory -
memory which cannot be modified except by a special user, often the
manufacturer of a device which contains the ROM.

real -
a floating-point data type. The internal representation of a real number
usually takes the form of a modified scientific notation with a normalized
mantissa, exponent, and sign bit.

real-time -
a process which must coordinate its actions with its environment; a process
which responds quickly and reliably enough to participate in the events of its
application domain.

record -
(1) (ISO) A collection of related data or words, treated as a unit.  For
example, a record in Cobol (or Pascal) is a collection of one or more data
items.

(2) A unit of data transmission.

redirection -
in Unix, the process of modifying the source of standard input or the
destination of standard output at run-time by parameters added to the command
that invokes a process.  For example, the glossary.exe run-unit might be
invoked by a command that specifies a list of terms to be looked up with the
syntax:    % glossary < myterms

reengineer -
rebuild an object, such as a software system, from existing design data in
order to improve the overall quality of the object. See also reverse
engineering.

reentrant program -
(ISO standard) a computer program that may be entered repeatedly and may be
entered before prior executions of the same program have been completed,
subject to the requirement that neither its external program parameters nor any
parameters are modified during its execution. Reentrant programs may serve
multiple users simultaneously, without requiring multiple copies of the
executable code.

regression testing -
testing before and after changes are made, then comparing the results to verify
that only the intended functions changed.

regular expression -
in effect, a formula that specifies a set of strings (called a language) over a
set of atomic symbols (called an alphabet). The use of the Kleene star (a)* and
the closely related +-notation (a)+ are frequently helpful in stating a regular
expression. Examples follow (ref. Wulf et al, 1981):

   ab* = {a, ab, abb, abbb, ...}

   (a + b + c + d + e) = {a, b, c, d, e}

   d*.d+ where d = (0 + 1 + 2 + 3 + 4 + 5 + 6 + 7 + 8 + 9)
       = {.0, .1, ..., 1.0, 1.1, ...}

Note: I am often asked for help with Unix regular expressions. The best
reference I have is Appendix B in Sobell's Unix book. 

relative address -
(ISO standard) an address expressed as a difference with respect to a base
address.

relative file -
a relative file is one which is organized into a series of fixed-length
positions (cells) that are numbered consecutively.  The cell in which a record
is filed is computed from its key "relative" to an algorithm a particular file
uses and the length of records (and possibly cells, if they are different from
records).

release -
a term that is used in configuration management to indicate an edition of a
software system that is different from prevision editions in a major way.
"Version numbers" indicate minor changes. For example, Release 5.0 should be
different from all lower-numbered versions in a major way. See also "version".

reliability - 
considered as a function of time, reliability is the conditional probability
that the system will survive for a given period of time, given that it is
operational at the beginning of that period. More generally, reliability is the
probability that a system will fail while it is in use. Note that the
reliability of a system depends on what it is being used for and where it is
being used. (related terms: availability, MTTR, MTTF, MTBF, software
reliability)

repository -
in Sue Conger, "The New Software Engineering", 1994:
"A repository is an active data dictionary that supports the definition of
different types of objects and the relationships between those objects."
In practice, the meaning of the term repository may encompass configuration
management. See configuration management, data dictionary and integrated 
toolset.

requirements -
the services a system should provide and the constraints under which it must
operate.

reserved word -
a word that may only be used as an element of a programming language, not as a
programmer-defined identifier.

resolution - 
the number of points per unit of measure which a display device is capable of
presenting in a non-overlapping display.  Common ways of expressing resolution
include dots per inch vertically and horizontally, giving screen dimensions in
pixels, spot size and minimum pen movement on a plotter.

retrieval trie - see trie

reuse of software -
using all or part of an existing software artifact in the development of
another software artifact.  For example, the design and code for an object in a
GUI may be reused in another part of the application or in a totally different
application. Another example is to reuse code which implements a basic
algorithm, like a sequential file process or a control-break, in another
application by changing details like a report format and/or identifiers.

reverse chronological order -
arranging data items in a LIFO sequence, rather than in a FIFO sequence as in
chronological sequence.  Note: maintaining a sequential log file for
transactions in reverse chronological order can be achieved by opening the log
file in a Cobol program with the "EXTEND" attribute.

reverse engineering -
the process of developing a set of specifications for a system by an orderly
examination of specimens of that system. (ref. Chikofsky, E. and Cross, J. in
"Reverse Engineering and Design Recovery: A Taxonomy", IEEE Computer, January
1990, pp. 13-17.) The purpose of reverse engineering in a software context is
to identify system components and create a representation of the system in
another form or at a higher level of abstraction. In practical terms, reverse
engineering is starting the process of building something by studying the
details of an existing version that works. On occasion, reverse engineering is
a euphemism for violation of intellectual property rights. See also
reengineering.

reverse Polish notation - a synonym for postfix notation (ISO).

revision of software -
making a change to existing software. The term applies to all forms of software
maintenance. See also software maintenance.

revolution -
On a disk drive, a rotation of a disk. Rotational delay is a component of disk
access time that depends on how fast the disk is rotating, which is measured in
rpm's. 3600 "revolutions" per minute on a hard disk works out to 16.67
milliseconds per rotation, which implies an average latency due to waiting for
the data on a disk to come under a read/write head of 8.3 milliseconds. Typical
rotation speed on a removable disk drive is 360 rpm.

RFP -
Request For Proposal. An RFP (or a specification) is the first step in  a
software development project, which makes it a critical document in software
engineering. If you are into lifecyle models, it is the "birth" of a project.
An RFP is a beginning to a dialogue that is successful if it results in
profitable business for the software developers and a satisfied customer. An
RFP may be very informal or very detailed. An RFP is often sent to multiple
bidders. 

rightsizing -
I couldn't find this one -- it seems to refer to placing applications on the
right size system. In current distributed systems, this makes sense. Please 
contribute more if you can...

RISC - Reduced Instruction Set Computer; typically around 100 instructions.

risk -
the probability of something undesirable happening times the harm caused by the
system failure.

risk-based testing -
assessing values to the harm caused by possible system failures and
probabilities to each failure. The risk is the product of the harm done by the
failure and the  probability of it happening. Risk-based testing tests focus on
high-cost and high-probability failures.

RMS -
Record Management Services in DEC VMS.  See help rms.

robustness - 
the extent to which a program minimizes the unacceptable consequences of inputs
by responding easily to arbitrary erroneous inputs and by foreseeing and
indicating undesirable effects of an input.  (related term: error trapping)

ROCOF - relative occurrence of failures, a unit of reliability
measurement and modeling.

ROM - see Read-Only Memory

root directory -
the main directory of a disk (in DOS) or a file system (in Unix).
Subdirectories are hierarchically organized under the root directory. Good use
of a floppy disk often involves having only directories in the root directory
and all files attached to subdirectories.

rotation (of the nodes of an AVL tree) - 
A manipulation of the nodes of an AVL tree which attempts to improve the
height-balance of the tree. The child which is on the high side is brought up a
level, and the node which was its parent becomes its child on the appropriate
side, together with attaching one of the subtrees of the node which was brought
up a level to the node which was pushed down a level.

router -
a device that connects 2 LANs running different protocols (see bridge).

RSD - Requirements Specification Document

RTL - 
run-time library, a VMS collection of modules which provide run-time services
and can be linked into any program which provides the required data types.
See $ HELP RTL

run -
to give a command to execute a program.  The VMS command is "run".  The default
extension for the identifier following a run command in VMS is .EXE.  As a
noun, "run" refers to an execution of a program.

scaffolding - 
software system components that facilitate system construction and testing, but
are not intended to be part of the final product. Examples are 'stubs' in code
and miniature files. This term seems to have originated with Boehm (cf.
Software Engineering Economics, 1981.)

SCCS - Source Code Control System. A Unix-based configuration management tool.
It is available at IUP on the DecStations in Stright 219.

science - 
a paradigm for discovering the laws of nature.  The current convention consists
of forming a hypothesis by observing nature, making a prediction based on the
hypothesis, collecting data relevant to the hypothesis and the prediction, and
analyzing the data for confirmation or denial of the hypothesis.  (Denning,
CACM, October 1991, Vol. 34 No. 10, p. 130.)

SCM - software configuration management. (see configuration management)

scope -
the realm of a declared meaning for a program identifier. In PASCAL, the scope
of an identifier is the program block in which an identifier is declared,
excluding any sub-block in which the same identifier is declared again.  In
Cobol, the scope of a verb which may have embedded statements may be ended by a
scope terminator that begins with END-.  See also "scope terminator".

scope terminator -
a syntax for terminating the scope of a block or other chunk of code.  For
example:

>> in C, {block}
>> in Pascal, BEGIN {block} END
>> in Cobol, verb {statements with no period} END-verb

scroll -
the process in which text appears at one edge of a screen as other text
disappears off the other edge. Scrolling can be thought of as moving a window
over a block of text that is bigger than the window.  The terms scrolling up or
scrolling left correspond to moving the window in those directions.

SCSI -
an acronym for small computer system interface. A SCSI (scuzzy) port permits
high-speed communication between the computer and devices, e.g., a CD-ROM. A
SCSI connector is a 25-pin plug.  SCSI connections may be "daisy-chained" to
allow multiple SCSI connections to a single port, but there may be a limit on
how long the total wiring may extend.

SDE - software development environment

SDM - software design methodology

SE - Software Engineering (see software engineering)

search argument - see table argument

search function - see search function

search tree -
a tree data structure for organizing the elements of a linearly ordered set to
facilitate direct access to an individual data element.  For example, a binary
search tree is organized so that the labels for the nodes in the left subtree
of any node are all less than the labels for the nodes in the right subtree. 
(related topics: multiway search tree, B-tree, B+ tree, avl tree)

secret key encryption -
the traditional scheme for secret codes where only one key, known to both the
sender and receiver of a message, is used to encrypt and decrypt the message.
(Also know as symmetric or private key encryption.)

sector -
a pie-shaped portion of the recording surface of a magnetic disk. Each track
(concentric ring) contains parts of each sector into which a recording surface
is divided by a disk "format" process.

seek -
the time required to move the read/write heads to a desired cylinder on a
moveable head disk drive. See also settling time, latency due to rotational
delay.

segment -
(1) a set of graphic output primitives that are arranged and labeled as a
group.

(2) a portion of a program which has its memory requirements managed by the
operating system so that the user can think of it as virtually a physical unit.
That is, it is loaded and swapped out as a unit.

segmentation -
organizing the memory requirements of a large computer program into
programmer-controlled chunks. With more severe memory constraints and less
sophisticated memory managers in operating systems, this used to be a major
concern of application programmers. The function is becoming increasingly
transparent to system users. (JAC, 1992)

SEI - Software Engineering Institute

select -
in Cobol, a clause that begins each sentence in the FILE-CONTROL paragraph of
the INPUT-OUTPUT SECTION.  The purpose of SELECT sentences is to list the
internal file names used in the program and provide a mechanism to connect them
to files or devices in the computing environment.  See $ help cobol environment
file

selection sort -
a sorting algorithm in which the key of the largest (or smallest) unsorted
record is identified, followed by an action which places it at its proper place
in the sorted records. (n-1) repeated applications of this algorithm will sort
a collection of n records.

selector channel -
a channel which can only manage data flow between main memory and a single
device at one time. See "multiplexor channel" and "channel".

semantic knowledge -
knowledge of concepts, such as the notion of a linked list. Semantic knowledge
is acquired through experience and learning; it is retained in a manner that is
independent of the representation in which it was experienced.  See also
syntactic knowledge. (Sommerville, Software Engineering, fourth edition, p. 27)

semaphore - 
an integer variable that can be accessed only through two standard operations :

    (1) WHILE s <= 0 DO skip;
        s := s-1;

    (2) s := s+1;

Modifications to the value of a semaphore must execute atomically, in the sense
that no two processes may simultaneously execute either of the above
operations.  A semaphore can be used to deal with the situation in which more
than one concurrent process has a critical section of code.  (Peterson and
Silberschatz, 1983)

sensitivity analysis - 
changing numbers in a spreadsheet to see what effect the changes have on other
cells in the spreadsheet or other spreadsheets.  See what-if analysis.

sequence set -
the set of data blocks in a B+-tree structure in which blocks are linked
together and records can be accessed sequentially.

sequential file organization -
see sequential organization.

sequential organization -
(1) for a file, the organization of a file so that records may only be accessed
one after another.  (see random, relative, and keyed organization)

(2) for a table, the organization of a table so that table entries are ordered
by the collating sequence of a table argument.

serial lookup -
a table lookup procedure which involves checking table entries one after
another.

service bureau -
an organization that provides data processing services for other individuals or
organizations.

settling time -
the time it takes a moveable read/write head to settle onto a rotating disk.
See also latency due to rotational delay and seek time. Note that "start/top
time" is a similar concept on a disk drive with floating/flying heads.

sgml - Standard Generalized Markup Language.

shared device -
a device which may have more than one program using it at the same time. For
example, a disk on a file server for a network may have several programs
attempting to transfer data at the same time. This event is called "contention"
for the disk. The antithesis of a shared device is a printer, which must
completely serve the output needs of one program before it can begin printing
the output of another program.

shared environment -
in the context of groupware, the things which people who are working
together have in common. With regard to technology, this could include
data, software, an interface to software, system privileges, system
view, e-mail, an audio and video link, and access to a network. A
WYSIWIS interface is an example of a shared environment, while
coordinator privileges are an example of an environment which is not
shared equally with all dialogue participants.

shareware -
software that is distributed on a trial basis for the cost of distributing it.
If a user tries it and decides to keep using it, the developer asks that they
register their copy for a small fee.  This is basically a
"try-for-a-while-before-you-buy" marketing arrangement. It is also called
"user-supported software". See also public domain and freeware.

shear -
in Computer Graphics, an affine transformation in which any combination of the
following distortions occur:  an object is stretched horizontally by an amount
proportional to the vertical distance from the x-axis;  an object is stretched
vertically by an amount proportional to the horizontal distance from the
y-axis; an object is stretched in the z-direction by an amount proportional to
the distance from the xy-plane. In terms of a 2D transformation matrix, T = [1 
a]    where ab is nonzero.  An example of a shear would be italic [b  1]   
letters formed where a ~ .3 and b is zero.

shell - 
a processor for Unix system commands.  The name is taken from the model of Unix
as an onion skin with a kernel of operating system programs surrounded by a
shell and layers of application programs.  Popular shells include the Bourne
shell, the Joy C shell, the Korn shell, and various GUI's.

show - 
a VMS command that displays the current status of a process, the system, or
devices in the system.  In VMS, see $ help show or, in mail, MAIL> help
set-show. See also show quota.

show quota -
Shows the disk space allotted to a VMS user and how much has been used. To check
the disk space left in ldir$colib, first set def ldir$colib, then 
    $ show quota/user=xx$compsci

side effect -
in the invocation of a subprogram, modifications to arguments. In general, a
side effect is any change other than the effect that is specifically intended
for an action.

SIG - special interest group.  Professional societies often include SIGs on
special topics.  For example, see SIGCSE.

SIGCSE -
the special interest group on computer science education within the ACM.  They
publish a quarterly bulletin and hold an annual symposium on computer science
education at the annual ACM computer science conference (CSC).

SIGGRAPH -
the ACM Special Interest Group on Computer Graphics. (see also NCGA)

SIGIR - the ACM Special Interest Group on Information Retrieval.

sign bit -
A single bit in the representation of a numeric value that represents is sign
(positive or negative). See twos complement for a contrasting way to represent
the sign of a numeric value.

sign test -
in Cobol, a test for positive, negative or zero.

SIMD - 
Single Instruction and Multiple Data-stream capability for parallel processing
in a computer architecture.  The Connection Machine 2 is a SIMD machine because
it has the capability to broadcast different data sets to its many small
processors and then broadcast a single instruction to each of the processors
for them to work on their different data in parallel.  This is an extremely
fine-grained form of parallelism, but it has immediate applicability to array
processing.

Simpsons -
                             (####)
                           (#######)
                         (#########)
                        (#########)
                      (#########)
                     (#########)
                    (#########)
                   (#########)
                  (########)
   _____         (#########)
  /     \       (#########)    |\/\/\/|     /\ /\  /\               /\
\/\/     |      (#########)    |      |     | V  \/  \---.    .----/  \----.
 |  (o)(o)       (o)(o)(##)    |      |      \_        /       \          /
 C   .---_)    ,_C     (##)    | (o)(o)       (o)(o)  <__.   .--\ (o)(o) /__.
  | |.___|    /____,   (##)    C      _)     _C         /     \     ()     /
  |  \__/       \     (#)       | ,___|     /____,   )  \      >   (C_)   <
  /_____\        |    |         |   /         \     /----'    /___\____/___\
 /_____/ \       OOOOOO        /____\          ooooo             /|    |\
/         \     /      \      /      \        /     \           /        \
 HP Homer       HP Marge       HP Bart         HP Lisa           HP Maggie


                       Don't have a cow, man!

                               |\/\/\/|
                               |      |
                               |      |
                               | (o)(o)
                               C      _)
                                | ,___|
                                |   /
                               /____\
                              /      \

               (Submitted by Tin-Yaw Mak, Christmas 1991)

single-statement function - see statement function

SISD - 
Single Instruction and Single Data-stream capability for processing in a
computer architecture.  The VAX at IUP is an example of a SISD computer,
although limited vectorization is possible, which would make it a SIMD
architecture.

SLIP - Serial Line Internet Protocol, which allows a computer to use TCP/IP
(Internet) protocol, with a standard telephone line and a high-speed modem.

SMALLTALK - 
the original object-oriented programming language.  Smalltalk has its roots in
LISP at MIT.  The earliest version was developed by Alan Kay in 1972 on the
"Dynabook" project.  (See Prof. Cunningham for more details.)

SMTP - Simple Mail Transfer Protocol

SNA - System Network Architecture (IBM)

sociology -
the systematic study of the development, structure and function of
human groups conceived as processes of interaction or as organized
patterns of collective behavior. (Webster's 7th) Sociology applies to
the study of and planning for the impact of information technology on
how people live together. See also ethnology.

software - 
computer programs, together with all the associated documentation which is used
to develop, use, or maintain those programs. Computer programs are defined to
be human authored specifications  which provide direction or control to a
computer system (which includes all levels of programming languages and
executable specifications).  Software is thus a system which provides direction
and control to a computer system, together with records that provide direction
and understanding to human developers and users.  Note that software is not an
end in itself: it functions as a subsystem to an information system (or
possibly a control system).

software configuration management (SCM) - see configuration management.

software design -
deciding how the functional requirements of an application will be implemented
in software (and hardware).

software development environment (SDE) - 
a set of techniques to assist the developer(s) of a software system, supported
by some (possibly automated) tools, along with an organizational structure to
manage the process of software production. (Wassermann, 1981) The SEI
generically defines a "computing environment" to be the collection of hardware,
software, standards, policies, people, and procedures which members of
technical computing projects use to pursue project objectives.

software development methodology (SDM) - 
a process for software development. Typical features include a sequenced set of
steps which combine management procedures, technical methods, and automated
support in a disciplined approach to the task of software development.
(Wassermann, 1981)

software engineering - 
(1) the application of a systematic, disciplined, quantifiable approach to the
development, operation, and maintenance of software; that is, the application
of engineering to software. IEEE Std 610.12-1990, IEEE Standard Glossary of
Software Engineering Terminology.

(2) the practical application of scientific knowledge in the design,
construction and maintenance of computer software (Boehm, 1976) that is fit for
use, on-time, and within budget (Cross, 1992). 

(3) Jensen and Tonies (1979) emphasize the importance of performing these
activities economically and producing reliable software products. 

Notes:  At this time, software engineering is more reasonably viewed as a goal
rather than as an accomplished state of practical software development
practice, due in large part to the inadequate knowledge base. (see engineering) 

software life cycle - see life cycle

software maintenance - 
the process of modifying existing operational software while leaving its
primary functions intact. Software repair maintenance is distinguished from
software modification (AKA update maintenance) in the fact that the functional
specifications remain intact.

software metrics - 
measurements derived from the requirements, design, code, or documentation of
computer software. The motivation behind software metrics is the ability to
predict product behavior from measures taken on a software product or its
component parts. A typical goal for a software metric might be a prediction
criteria for the time to develop a software product or for the number (and
significance) of faults that a component is likely to possess.

software piracy - unauthorized or illegal copying of software.

software reliability - 
the probability that deviation from the required output by more than a
specified tolerance in a specified environment does not occur during a
specified exposure period.  It is expressed as P(n) = Prob of no failures over
n runs, or P(t) = Prob of no failure over interval 0 to t. (cf. reliability)

software requirements engineering - 
the discipline for developing a complete, consistent, unambiguous statement of
needs for a software system (Boehm, 1976). Rzepka and Ohno (1985) point to a
need for an iterative process of analyzing the problem, documenting the
resulting requirements insights, and checking the accuracy of the understanding
so gained.  Requirements are precise statements of need, including the
externally visible behavior, as well as constraints such as performance,
reliability, safety and cost.  The collection of requirements represents both a
statement of the problem to be solved and a model of what functionality is
needed. Requirements documents must include supporting data and analysis from
the point of view of the user domain. They must be understandable by the
customer, the system designer and representative users, which limits the kinds
of formal representation methodologies that are feasible.

software tool - 
software that aids in the creation and maintenance of software. Its goals
include the elimination of mundane or error-prone tasks in order to reduce cost
and gain reliability. Examples include formatters, screen editors, test
generators, test coverage analyzers, configuration managements, private
libraries, cross reference listings, application authoring systems, very high
level languages, interactive debuggers, syntax-directed editors (Zelkowitz,
1984), documentation support, database and data dictionary support and
automatic program generators. (cf. Hanson and Rosinski, p. 189)

software utility - 
software that aids in the use of software and hardware.  Examples include file
and program conversion, data communication software, and integrated software
packages like LOTUS and JAZZ.

sort -
rearrange records (or other objects) into a specified collating sequence
according to a specified attribute or set of attributes. For example, student
records could be sorted by student-ids, which are unique, or by name, which may
not be unique, and by student-id within name. There are many algorithms for
sorting and many context-sensitivities.

source code -
a computer program as it is written by a programmer, before compilation.

spanned data storage -
data storage in which a record is stored in two or more physical storage units
such as blocks, VMS clusters, or IBM control intervals.

SPARC - 
Scalable Processor Architecture; a licensable RISC implementation developed by
SUN.

spawn -
a VMS command which creates a subprocess of the current process similar to a
fresh login.  You must "log"out to return to the first process.  See 
    $ help spawn

specification -
a statement of the requirements of an object which is precise enough to serve
as a contract between a client for the object and a developer of the object. A
specification defines WHAT is to be done, while a design is a statement of HOW
it is to be done. A design specification for a system or program is a
specification of what the parts are and how they relate to each other.

Specifications are derived from requirements and form the basis for design. 
For example, a system requirement may be to respond to user phone queries
within a reasonable time; a specification may be to respond to 90% of user
queries within 2 seconds when no more than 20 users are interacting with the
system; a design decision may state that there will be a message to the
user every 2 seconds that the system works on the response without completing
it. 

Note: In the cleanroom terminology of Cobb and Mills, a user's reference manual
is considered an external specification, while an internal specification 
completely states the mathematical relation for which the program implements a
rule and by which the program can be verified.

speedup -
time required on a conventional machine divided by time required on a vector
machine (or an analogous statement in another context).  (Doug Rutledge, 1993)

spiral model - see Boehm's sprial model

spooling (Simultaneous Peripheral Operation Online) -
(1) (ISO) The use of auxiliary storage as a buffer storage to reduce
    processing delays when transferring data between peripheral equipment
    and the processors of a computer.
(2) A term which is synonymous with concurrent peripheral operations.

spreadsheet -
a computer-based worksheet for recording numeric data with labels and formulas
that express relationships between the numeric values. Spreadsheet software
originated in the late 1970's with an idea of helping accountants do what-if
analysis of worksheet data and business offices deal with tables of numeric
data.  The original product was Visicalc. Current spreadsheet software includes
capability for charting, linking with other worksheets, computing with 
functions, programming macros, and database capabilities such as sorting and
searching.

sprite - 
an animated graphic that is programmed to a certain "depth" that implies
whether it is visible, covered, or partially covered by something else in an
image. Sprites are familiar to many K-12 computing educators as part of Apple
II Logo and graphics since the early 1980's.

SQA - Software Quality Assurance

SQL - structured query language

stable sort -
a sort in which the ordering of input records which have identical sort keys
does not change in the output file.

stack -
a list data structure in which insertions and deletions may only be made at the
beginning.  A stack is a last-in first-out (LIFO) data structure. (see queue)

star - 
(1) jargon for "asterisk" (because it only has one syllable)
(2) a network topology with a central node through which all messages must
    pass.

start/stop time -
the time it takes the read/write heads on a disk drive with moveable heads to
start and stop. See also seek time.

statement -
a syntactic unit of a program that is analogous to a sentence. In Fortran, for
example, statements are classified as executable, specification, comments, or
compiler-directing. Executable statements are identified by their "verb". For
more detail on the statements of Fortran and constraints on the order in which
they can be coded see the vms help for "fortran statement".

statement function -
a function that is declared as a single statement in the program which invokes
it. Basic and Fortran have statement functions. (also known as a
"single-statement function")

static method - 
a method that is called as compiled, without run-time dependencies which
determine its character.

statistical testing -
a testing strategy that focuses on typical usage patterns so that a statement
can be made about how likely a system is to function without error when it is
used according to what it is designed for. Risk-based testing and clear-box
testing are alternative strategies.

stochastic process -
a process that produces random events, as contrasted to events that are 
determined by context or input.

stress test -
a test designed to determine system performance under pressure. For
example, many users, many interrupts to an operating system, using
exceptional amounts of memory, putting many things into a dynamic (or
static) data structure, sensitivity to small changes in the data for a
mathematical computation, many disk accesses, ...

string - 
a sequence of data items of a certain type.  Common examples include "character
string", for example "r2d2", and bit string, for example B'10100'.

strong AI - 
the claim that if a computing device can act in a manner that is
indistinguishable from that behavior of a human acting intelligently, then the
computing device is literally a human mind. If strong AI is possible, then the
program may be to its host computer system as a mind is to its brain. See
Turing test.

structure chart - 
a graphic representation of the hierarchical calling structure of a main
program and its subprograms, together with the data which they share and
whether each data element is input or output relative to the subprogram.

structured design -
a technique for software design, frist documented by Yourdon and Constantine
[1979]. The goal of the method is to respond to the fact that people are
limited in their ability to manage complexity. Therefore parts are kept small
and separately solvable (and correctable). This sounds almost like
object-oriented thinking. It actually works out to involve a context diagram,
data flow diagrams, and structure charts.

structured programming - 
an organization for programming activities that lessens the negative effects of
problem complexity.

stub -
code for a subprogram which is used to test the program which invokes it and/or
the data interface between the two.

stubs - see stub

submit - a VMS command that directs the VMS system to "batch" a file of DCL
commands.  Differences form "interactive" execution of a DCL command file
include:

>>  the user can do other things while the commands in the command file are
    being executed, including logging off.

>>  batch makes more efficient use of system resources than interactive
    execution of commands.

>>  additional qualifiers are available.  See also $help submit /printer,
    /noprinter, and /keep.

subprogram -
a program that is invoked by another program.

subroutine -
a subprogram that can return any number of results, or zero results. Results
are returned through modifications to arguments.

subscript - 
an occurrence number which designates a particular variable in an array.
For example, in the expression x(1), 1 is a subscript.

subscripted variable - 
an identifier which includes a subscript. For example, x(1).

supercomputer - 
a computer that has a potential computing speed comparable to the fastest
current technology.  Supercomputer speeds are attained by reducing cycle time,
reducing cycles per instruction, reducing the number of instructions to do a
computing task, vectorization, and parallelization.  Time Magazine describes
supercomputers as the most powerful number crunchers currently available. (John
Cross, November 1991)

surrogate -
in information filtering, a representation for the meaning of text in a form
more amenable to processing by computer.  (Dave Science, 1993)

In general, something appointed to act in place of something else.

suspense file -
a file of transactions that have been rejected by a batch validation program.
Synonym: abeyance file.

SVR4 - Unix System V Release 4, the accepted standard Unix in 1991.

switch -
a binary-value indicator or control device (i.e., an on/off electrical device
or something that can be set to steer trains onto either of two tracks).  In
computing, a switch is either a boolean/logical variable (Fortran), a
condition-name (Cobol), a bit-field (C), or some sort of flag.  See also
"flag".
  
syllabus - 
at IUP, a description for a course including course objectives, grading policy,
instructor name and availability, texts and other materials, and a detailed
course plan.

symbol - 
a representation for something.  For example, * may be a symbol for
multiplication or wildcarding.  A symbol which can have more than one meaning
in a given context is called an overloaded symbol.

synchronous -
coordinated with respect to time; in the jargon of CSCW, synchronous group
activities must occur at the time, while asynchronous activities may occur at
differenct times.

synergism -
what happens when the whole is greater than the sum of its parts; what makes a
system different from a collection of interacting components; what we hope
happens with good teamwork.

synergy - see synergism

syntactic knowledge -
detailed knowledge of how to represent something, such as knowledge of a
language. See also semantic knowledge. (Sommerville, Software Engineering
Fourth Edition, p. 27)

syntax - 
rules for how tokens of a language may be formed and how they may be arranged
into compilable expressions.

syntax-directed definition - 
a generalization of a context-free grammar in which each grammar symbol has an
associated set of attributes, partitioned into two subsets called the
synthesized and inherited attributes of that grammar symbol.  (Aho, Sethi, &
Ullman, 1986, p. 280)

synthesis -
the composition of two or more things to make a whole with new properties. In
Higher education, "synthesis" is a higher-level cognitive activity that
contrasts sharply with the "fact acquisition" that must precede it. At IUP,
students are required to take a synthesis course during their senior year. The
point of this course is to have experience in a multidisciplinary, group
approach to problems or issues. "Analysis" is the opposite of synthesis. See
also "Bloom's taxonomy" in the glossary and LS (Liberal Studies) courses in the
course schedule.

system - 
a set of parts, each with a specific purpose, that work together to accomplish
a goal.  For example, a computer system may be composed of a CPU, I/O devices,
memory, and connectors.

system analysis -
the following activities conducted with system objectives in mind. Note that
system analysis must be concerned with ALL system components, not just those
that are  computer-related. (Generally based on Pressman (1992), p. 146.)

(1) identify the customer (client) need (both present and future)
(2) evaluate the feasibility of different responses
(3) perform economic and technical analyses
(4) allocate functions to system components: hardware, software, people,
    procedures, data, connectivity
(5) establish cost and schedule constraints for system development
(6) create a system definition that forms the foundation for subsequent system
    development work.

system analyst - 
a person who designs information systems based on the requirements of end
users. See also system analysis, end user, information system.

system ease of use - 
a system which is easy to use provides features and capabilities which:

    1) Minimize distractions from the task at hand.
    2) Do not require system specific skill and expertise to use
       efficiently.
    3) Reduce user effort (e.g. defaults, model of individual user).
    4) Make complex or difficult tasks easy to perform (e.g. the use
       of procedural hierarchy and modularity in a context sensitive
       manner).

system learnability - a system is easy to learn when:

    1) It has an easily understood, but comprehensive structure.
    2) It does not require training sessions.
    3) It allows learning while being productively used.
    4) It has a simple, consistent model which encourages
       metaphorical use of general knowledge and experience.
    5) It allows previous learning to be easily retained.

system model -
a scaled-down representation of a system which allows the user of the model to
visualize the structure and/or behavior of the system from a particular point
of view. The model "scales down" the actual system by abstracting out details
that are not relevant for the particular purpose of a particular model.

system programming -
programming activities related to system software, i.e., design, development,
quality assurance, installation, support, and maintenance.  System programming
may require especially difficult testing, bit-level knowledge and manipulation,
concern for specific hardware detail, and specialized software tools. See system
software.

system software -
computer programs that facilitate the use of system resources by application
programs.  Common examples are operating systems, compilers, linkers, window
managers, utility programs, telecommunications software, and device drivers.

syzygy -
the event that the planets are in alignment, and thus all pulling together. In
group dynamics, syzygy is the event that every member of the group is pulling
toward the goal at the same time.

table -
in computing jargon, a synonym for an array. More generally, the term "table"
connotes a multidimensional data set similar to what spreadsheets manage.

table argument -
the field by which table entries are looked up.  For example, a table of month
abbreviations and complete month names might use an abbreviation or the number
of a month as a table argument. (see table function)

table entry -
the data referenced by a single occurrence or index value in a table.  (see
table argument and table function)

table function -
the data which a table argument may be used to look up.  (synonym: search
argument)

table organization -
the sequence and structure of entries in a table; the options for table access
provided by the sequence and structure of its entries. (see chronological
order, reverse chronological order, sequential organization, usage-frequency
organization, positional organization, parallel arrays)

tar - 
the Unix tape archive utility.  Unix also has a separate compress and
uncompress utility.  A Unix file with the extension ~.tar.Z is both tarred and
compressed.  At IUP, we can uncompress and untar files conveniently on
avocet.ma.iup.edu (Stright 219).

taxonomy -
a classification system. For example, an orderly classification system for
plants or animals according to their natural relationships.

TCP/IP - transmission-control protocol / Internet protocol

teaching portfolio -
"A teaching portfolio is a summary of one's major teaching accomplishments and
strengths, that is, a way to display reflective samples of one's 'best work'."
(Ray Shackelford Ball State University. Contact the IUP Teaching Excellence
Center.)

team -
a group of people working toward a common goal, each subordinating personal
prominence to the success of the group.

technology - 
(1) the means employed to provide objects for the sustenance and
comfort of humans. (Webster)

(2) the use of tools. (JAC)

telecenter -
an office or group of offices to which employees can go instead of commuting to
a main office. A telecenter is a middle road between telecommuting and
conventional commuting. (see Filipczak, p. 69 in Computers in Society reprints) 

telecommunication -
(1) data transmission between a computing system and remotely located devices
via a unit that performs the necessary format conversion and controls the rate
of transmission.

(2) communication over a distance, for example, by telephone.

telecommuting - 
working at a sight remote from a place of business using some form of
telecommunication. This is the ultimate in "flextime", but it must be planned
and managed very carefully or it can be an unhappy failure for both employee and
employer.

teleconference -
a human conference in which the participants are dispersed, but they are
supported by telecommunications. A multi-party phone call qualifies as a
teleconference, but videolinks among the participants are a more elegant
form. Teleconferences avoid the problems of travel to conferences and suggest
opportunities for distance learning.  See also computer conference and bbs.

telefax -
the linking of photocopying machines for the transmittal of black and white
images.

telephony -
transmission of speech or other sounds.

teletex - 
the linking of word and text processors via the public telephone network.  In
essence, a combination of an automatic text editing device with high-speed
telex equipment (cf. Electronic Publishing Review, first issue, 1981).

teletext - 
systems using TV sets to display alphanumeric information received by broadcast
signals (i.e., non-telephone). Such systems are one-way (i.e.,
non-interactive). (see also teletex)

telnet -
telnet help states that: TELNET is a program to allow users to connect their
terminals to other hosts on a network as though the terminals were connected to
hardwired terminal lines on those hosts.  The simplest way to run TELNET is to
enter the host name in response to TELNET's prompt.  For example, typing
"NIC.DDN.MIL" will connect you to the DDN Network Information Center, assuming
your system can reach NIC.DDN.MIL via some network.   Another example: to
connect to the American Philosophical Association (APA),
   telnet atl.calstate.edu  and login as apa.
Another example, to get weather, 
   telnet hermes.merit.edu, and ask for the um-weather host.

template -
a piece of code which is used over and over again.  A generic template supports
software reuse.  For example, consider Ada templates or basic file processing
algorithms expressed in a particular language.

tera - 
a prefix which means roughly one trillion, or 2^40.  (see note attached to
kilo.)  The amount of input data in the experiences of a human lifetime has
been ballpark estimated at 1 terabyte, which by implication is a lower bound on
the storage capacity of a human brain.

terabyte - one trillion bytes.  A published estimate of the bytes required to
encode the experiences of a human lifetime is roughly one terabyte.

terminal - 
an alphanumeric and/or graphics display and data entry device which depends on
a separate computer for its operation. A terminal is said to be "intelligent"
if it possesses and is using its own processing capabilities, separate from a
computer whose processing capabilities it happens to be using. A terminal
device which possesses processing capability but is not using for a work
session with a separate computer is said to be functioning as a "dumb"
terminal.

terminal format -

in Cobol, a format for source code that allows entries from column 1 through
column 80.  Area A is column 1 through 3.  Area B is column 4 and beyond. 
Continuation (-), page eject (/), and comment (*) indicators must appear in
column 1. The advantage of terminal format is that it allows full use of an
80-character wide display, more compact source code files, and easier entry and
editing of the source.  See ANSI format.

ternary operator -
an operator which produces one result from three arguments.  For example, see
the conditional operator of C.

test plan -
a plan for providing quality assurance by trying out something we want to build
or use. An initial test plan should be developed before software (or something
else) is built, bought, or decided on. A statistical testing strategy focuses
on testing how the software will be used. Other testing strategies may focus on
how a piece of software is most likely to fail or the most catastrophic
failures (a risk-based strategy). As more about the software is known through
design and development, additional testing may focus on the internal structure
of the software. (see testing, statistical testing, risk-based testing, coverage
testing, white box, clear box, black box)

testing - 
NOT a simple concept! Consider usage (statistical) testing, coverage
testing, unit testing, stress testing, thread tests, recovery tests,
performance tests, user testing (especially in a lab setting), alpha
and beta testing, ... See also "test plan".

thermal transfer color printer - 
a type of color printer where digital image data control the temperature of
tiny resistors in a thermal printhead to selectively melt spots of colored wax
on the donor medium and transfer them to the underlying sheet, one primary
color at a time. This process is repeated for each of the primary colors to
complete the full color image. A survey of this type of color printer shows it
to yield a relatively bright, waxy picture at an also relatively expensive
price per print. (ref. IEEE Spectrum, July 1984, p. 35)

thread test -
a "thread" is a path through a set of copperating concurrent
processes, as in an operating system. Thread testing is designing a
combination of tests in a fashion analogous to coverage testing for
programs. Paths (i.e., threads) are identified and tests designed to
test system performance when a sequence of events causes the system to
follow the thread.

throughput - 
(ISO standard) a measure of the amount of work performed by a computer system
over a given period of time, such as jobs per day. For example, the key to the
success of the multiprogramming concept as a means of increasing system
throughput is having a sufficient amount of processor time spent waiting for
I/O to balance the added complexity and overhead.

TINSTAAFL - an acronym for 'There Is No Such Thing As A Free Lunch".

tlb -
a VMS extension to file names which stands for "text library". a .tlb
extension is normally used for the name of a library of source code.

toggle - 
a switch with one actuator and two states.  For example, the Caps Lock key on
many keyboards changes state from off to on or from on to off every time you
press the key.

token - the vocabulary of a programming language.  Tokens include things like
identifiers, literal values, operators, and punctuators.

tool - something which helps its user do work. See software tool.

tools - see software tool

top-down design -
designing a system of programs by first deciding what subprograms a program
will need and the data interface for each of the subprograms, then repeating
the process for each of the subprograms until no more subprograms are needed.

top-down testing -
testing a piece of software by testing the main program with stubs for
subprograms first, then finishing the code for the stubs (and inserting stubs
for subprograms used by each level of subprogram as needed) and retesting.

topology -
in a communications network, the physical paths between nodes.
(Eelwu Jeong, 1993)

TP - transaction processing

trackball -
a cursor-positioning device that is similar to an upside-down mouse. A trackball
is less demanding on desktop space and dangling wires, but it can be harder to
get used to than a mouse. Note that a trackball is essentially a "no-button
mouse" which implies that the button signals from a conventional mouse must be
reassigned to the keyboard or another input source.

tree - 
a data structure which imposes a hierarchical structure on a collection of data
items; a finite set of one or more nodes such that there is a root and the
remaining nodes are partitioned into n>=0 subtrees.

tree height -
the greatest number of nodes in a path from the root to a leaf.  This is one
plus the number of the highest level on which the tree has non-null nodes,
where the root is on level zero.

trie -
a retrieval tree data structure in which the node structure is based on the
radix of key values and searches through the tree are based on the keys as
sequences of characters.  The height of a trie works out to be a function of
the length of the keys and shape of the trie is based on the number and
distribution of key values.

trigger condition - 
an external event that causes a program to change its behavior. (See "logic
bomb")

Trojan Horse -
(1) a computer program that hides inside a useful program, hence the name
"Trojan Horse". The term also applies to an apparently useful program that
provides a trap door through whicfh an intruder can surreptitiously access a
system.

(2) a computer program which, in addition to performing the desired function,
performs functions that compromise the security of the system it runs on.  For
example, by accessing unauthorized files to allow subsequent unauthorized
system access.  (Dave Science, 1993; similar to definition 1 but worded
differently)

trusted system -
a system believed to enforce a given set of attributes to a stated degree of
assurance.

TTL - I dunno. Please let me know.

tumor program -
a program which is attached to another program and increases its size. Many
computer viruses are detected by the fact that they increase the size of a
program that they are attached to.
 
TurboPascal - 
a Pascal compiler and programming environment that includes an editor, an
interactive debugger, and facilities for file handling.

Turing test - 
a criteria for artificial intelligence popular in the 1960's.  The Turing test
for artificial intelligence in its original form is that a conversation held
with an artificial intelligence cannot be distuinguishable form a similar
conversation held with an intelligent human.  In general, the Turing test
applies to any human behavior that humans feel requires intelligence. (See
strong AI, artificial intelligence)

turnkey system -
a system which can be installed by metaphorically "turning a key".  The basic
concept of a turnkey system is "one size fits all" and very little customizing
should be needed.

tweening -
the process of transforming one image into another by displaying p% of the 
points and attributes of the first image and (1-p)% of the second image,
allowing p to range from 100% to 0%.

twos complement - 
the ones complement plus one, which is the negative of the original binary
number.

Ultrix -
a DEC Unix operating system. See also math functions.

understandability -
the extend to which a software system is comprehensible and predictable. When
this measure is applied to source code or documentation, readability is
included in its meaning.

unfriendly - see user friendliness

UNICOS - the Unix Cray operating system.

unit testing -
testing a mdoule individually, ensuring that it functions well by
itself. See also integration testing or system testing and incremental
testing.

UNIX -
the name of an operating system and its family of related utility programs.  It
was originally designed and implemented by Ken Thompson in 1969 at AT&T Bell
Labs.  Its original advantages were that it was multiuser, interactive,
portable, and by 1975 it was available in source form to universities for a
small fee.  Its disadvantages are an arcane and unfriendly interface, multiple
varieties rather than a single standard, and a lack of realtime capability.

until loop -
a "test at the bottom" loop which repeats until the control condition is true. 
An test at the bottom loop control structure must execute at least once because
the control condition is at the end of the loop.  For example, a Cobol PERFORM
statement such as "PERFORM 100-read-and-process UNTIL EOF." is a test at the
bottom loop, while "PERFORM 100-process-and-read UNTIL EOF." implies a "priming
read" and a test at the top loop control structure.

upload -
to transfer a file from an interactive host to a computer system which is
communicating with the host.

URL -
Uniform Resource Locator, the Web (See WWW) addressing system with syntax that
lets objects be addressed using HTTP and other common network protocols, such 
as FTP, Gopher, and WAIS.

usability -
the usability of a software system is the extent to which it is reliable,
efficient, portable and maintainable.

usage-frequency organization -
arranging table entries in a table that is searched by application programs in
descending order of search frequency.  That is, the most frequently sought
items are listed first so that the system will spend less effort in looking for
table functions.

usage-testing -
system testing based on expected usage. See also "statistical testing."

user friendliness -
a measure of "friendly" qualities that a system has for its users. Ease of use
is the most readily stated friendly quality, but ease of learning and
reliability are also very friendly.  A friendly system is one which:

      1) Is comfortable and encouraging (feedback, reliability,
         recoverability, predictability, leaves control with the
         user, short response times, not congeniality or humor).

      2) Assists the user in progressing to his/her goals (e.g. helps,
         error trapping, allowance for interruptions and backtracking,
         model of individual user).

      3) Avoids regression and loss of work. (cf. system
         learnability and system ease of use).

user friendly - see user friendliness

user interface -
the manner in which a user and a piece of software interact. Common types of
interfaces are command, menu, and graphic, in increasing ease of learning but
decreasing ease of use for an experienced user.

user testing laboratory - 
a place where a system can be tested by its intended users with observation or
videorecording by the system developers. A videorecording of a user cursing an
unhelpful or clumsy interface can be a lot more effective than questionnaires
or other data that are collected when the user is not actually at the point of
frustration and annoyance.

user-friendly - see user friendliness.

username -
the identifying code which a system user enters at login time.

users group - 
a group of users of a specific class of hardware (or software), with the goal
of sharing and helping each other.

utility - 
a program included as part of an operating system.  Examples include copy,
sort, and editors.  You typically invoke a utility by giving a command at the
operating system prompt, which makes it difficult for a user to distinguish a
utility from an operating system command.

uucp -
Unix-to-unix copy program (and more). uucp is a system of programs, files, and
hardware that provides networking capability among Unix programs.

validation (of software) - 
establishing that a software product serves its intended purpose.

vanilla framework foe a system -
a loose-fitting, general-purpose conceptual framework for software development
at higher levels than code. [See Harel, IEEE Computer, January 1992, p. 10.] 

variable - a data item whose value can change in the scope of its definition.

VAX - virtual address extension; the common name for DEC "mainframe" computers.

VAXstation - 
a product line of DEC workstations that run VMS.

vector generation - 
the process of setting pixel values for the display of a line segment.

vectorizing -
the process of extracting lines, characters, and other geometric primitives
from a raster image. (see Foley et al, second edition, p. 196)

verification (of software) - 
establishing that a module of code agrees with its specification.

version -
a term that is used in configuration management for a numbered edition of a
software system. Version numbers normally follow a decimal point and indicate a
lesser collection of changes to the software than a "release". For example,
Version 1.0 is the original release. Versions 1.0, 1.1, 1.11, 1.2, and 2.0 may
exist. See also release.

VGA -
Video Graphics Array board that achieves 256 color displays on a microcomputer.
VGA is superior to CGA and EGA, but watch out for "Super VGA" and XGA.

vhll - 
very-high-level language for programming.  A programming language in which
individual statements may be thought of as being translated into many
statements in a conventional HLL.  For example, a 4GL.  See HLL and 4GL.

VHSIC - Very High-Speed Integrated Circuit

vi -
a text editor that is standard on all Unix systems. The name "vi" is derived
from the phrase "visual editor."  As a full-screen editor, it is extremely
clumsy to anyone who is used to just about anything else. However, it is widely
known and used because you can rely on being able to use it on any Unix system. 
The basic human factors principle applies: "You can get used to just about
anything .. and even learn to like it!" (The above comments are the opinions of
JAC, 9/92.)

videophone -
the addition of video to audio telephony. In late 1994, the cost of
adding this capability to a workstation which includes a modem and
adequate storage and computing (~8Meg 486) is ~$1,500.

videotex - 
two-way interactive telephone based communication systems using TV sets to
display alphanumeric information.  (CCITT generic term for systems of this
type.)

viewdata - 
a generic term for two-way interactive telephone based systems using TV sets to
display data.  This term has been superseded by the more current term
'videotex'.

virtual - effectively the real thing, as in virtual memory.

virtual device -
one that acts like something other than what it is. For example, a disk often
serves as a "virtual printer" when output are "spooled" to it rather than being
sent directly to a printer. See "spooling".

virtual memory - 
usable main memory resources which are not actually present in a computer
system, but are simulated by the operating system.  The operating system may
swap data between its auxiliary memory and its main memory, as the need arises
in one of its processes.

virtual method - 
a method which has references resolved at run-time.  (See also polymorphism and
static method.) 

virtual reality - 
an environment where the sensory data experienced by someone who interacts with
the virtual reality is indistuinguishable from the real thing.  Ideally, the
concept is that of an artificial world where objects can be manipulated, the
observer can move about, and all the sensory input from the artificial world
are indistinguishable from whatever is being modeled. This definition and the
concept are extensions of the Turing test for artificial intelligence.  

virus -
a harmful computer program that invades a computer system by attaching itself
to other commonly used programs.

VisionQuest - 
a CSCW product of Collaborative Technologies Coporation (800) 856-MEET.

visual programming - 
the development of a computer program by manipulating icons for program modules
and the data links between them.  The term visual programming occasionally
refers to programming visual output.  (see VPL)

visualization -
the use of images to explore a complex data set or communicate facts from the
data set.  The use of 3D color renderings of complex numeric data sets is
typical, but some visualizations of nonnumeric data sets have been done. 
Typical scientific visualizations include molecular modeling, medical imaging,
and models of the atmosphere and oceans.

VISX - a language for computer vision or image processing which is based on
Unix.  VISX uses five different functions: pixel, image filter, feature
processing, feature extraction, and image transformation.  (Dani Mashaw, 1993)

VLSI - Very Large System Integration

VMS -
virtual memory system, the VAX operating system. See DCL.

voice mail -
a centralized telephone system of answering machine and message
passing functions for a group of people. For example, voice mail may
allow you to broadcast messages to a distribution list or reread and
edit a voice message before youe leave it for someone.

volatility -
The volatility of a file is the number of records added, deleted, or
changed in a time period divided by the number of records in the file
at the beginning of that time period. For example, the IUP registration
data for Fall 1994 may contain 70,000 registrations, with a volatility
of 1,000 changes per day during the month of August.

volume - a recording medium that is mounted and dismounted as a unit.

VPL -
visual programming language; a visual method of communicating a program to a
computer, usually involving icons, data links, and possibly slides, dials, and
other means of communicating quantitative data.  See visual programming.

VR -
Virtual Reality, a technique of exploring computer-based environments with
multimedia interaction and some attempt to block sensory input from outside the
virtual environment during the interaction.  (see virtual reality)

VSAM -
an acronym for IBM's Virtual Storage Access Method.  VSAM dates back to the
midt to late 1970's.  VSAM provides three types of file organizations: 
entry-sequenced data sets (ESDS, a form of sequential organization); 
key-sequenced data sets (KSDS, a form of indexed organization), and
relative-record data sets (RRDS, direct files).

wait state -
a state in which a computer blocks other signals until it completes an
operation.  For example, the "wait mode" in Lotus 1-2-3 occurs when a disk I-O
operation is going on.  The "Wait" light on a keyboard indicates that keyboard
signals are blocked until the ligth goes off.

wall-clock time - 
the elapsed time for a process, as compared to CPU time, which is what
computer charges are often based on.

WAN -
Wide Area Network; used for connecting remote (non-local) devices, typically
via phone lines.

warm boot - 
booting a computer while it is running (without turning the power off and on). 
MS-DOS computers warm boot when the keys <control-Alt-Delete> are held down
simultaneously. (Users press and hold the keys one at a time until all three
are down, then release all three.)

waterfall model -
an early, simplistic model of a software life cycle, attributed to Royce
(1970). It consists of distinct phases which follow in sequence, but which may
require iteration. The phases vary, but typically they may consist of: analysis
and definition, followed by design, implementation and unit testing,
integration and system testing, then operation and maintenance.

weak AI -
the claim that AI research provides useful models of human intelligence, but
not actual artificial minds.

while loop -
a "test at the top" loop that executes until its condition is false.  See until
loop.

white box -
a view of a program module which includes its implementation (i.e., its code).
"Clear box" is a better metaphor, but white box is the conventional term
because it pairs well with the term "black box". See also black box.

whois -
part of the Network Information Center for looking up people on the nic.ddn.mil
network. Try "$ help who" on the academic vax, or simply "$ whois cross".

widow -
in printed documents, the first line of a paragraph that is printed as the last
line of a page.

wildcard - 
a symbol that stands for zero or more characters in a search for an identifier. 
For example, in DOS filename arguments, a * wildcard stands for any set of
characters, as in copy a:\*.*, while a ? wildcard stands for exactly one
character.

WIMP -
an acronym for "Windows, Icons, Mice, and Pull-down menus" in a GUI.

window - 
(1) an outlined area of a video display screen that looks like a window and
allows its user to use a specific software tool separate from what is going on
in other windows.  Windows are sometimes "tiled", that is arranged in
non-overlapping areas of the display, but with greater capabilities in
technology most windows are now "overlapped".  The most popular windows product
in 1992 is Microsoft's Windows 3.0.  The Macintosh operating system deserves
credit as the application that popularized a visual operating system with
windows.

(2) the viewable portion of a spreadsheet (or document, or database)

Word Perfect -
(1) A popular word processing software package. (Version 5.1 in 1992)
(2) A vendor of computer software which is responsible for WordPerfect and
    other products.

word processing -
the use of computer technology to create, reuse, and manage verbal
communications. Word processing software includes at least a text editor and
formatter, together with capabilities for managing files and printing
documents. Additional capabilities include importing and exporting text,
WYSIWIG display, color, and importing charts, graphs, and images. The
conventional meaning of the term extends as far as voice mail and multimedia
communications which go beyond written communications with graphics.  See also
desktop publishing.

wordwrap -
a text entry feature which causes words which overflow the end of a line to be
automatically moved to the beginning of a new line.

work cell -
A cell in a spreadsheet which is used for intermediate computations but is not
an integral part of what the spreadsheet is designed to show its users.  It is
often used for "what-if" analyses.   See O'Leary p. SS 80.

workgroup -
two or more people who share project involvement and/or resources. (e.g.,
sharing a file server in a cluster of workstations) See also group.

workgroup computing -
Mcrosoft definition [February 1994]: open, flexible software solutions that
build on existing, industry standard technology to help people work together
more effectively. Workgroup computing and groupware might be distinguished by a
greater emphasis on "synchronous group activities," such as EMS, in groupware.
However, the terms are practically synonymous. See also groupware and EMS.

WORKING-STORAGE SECTION -
in Cobol, the section of the DATA DIVISION in which program data and conditions
on those data are identified, defined, and possibly initialized.

workstation -
a user terminal which has local processing capability. More specifically, an
intelligent node in a local network, with the capability of providing local
processing to a single user as its normal mode of operation, but which is also
capable of functioning as a standalone alphanumeric and graphics system in
terms of both a network which includes a centralized capability for file
serving and possibly other services to network users. Currently, workstations
are designed with large (no less than 16") bit-mapped displays for displaying
graphics and overlaid windows.

worm - 
(1) an acronym for Write Once Read Many times, a type of optical disk whose
surface can be written on only once, but read indefinitely. 

(2) a computer program that invades a computer system from an outside source,
such as an electronic mail network or a bulletin board system. A worm program is
self-contained and self-replicates until it clogs the host system with many
copies of itself.

wp -
an acronym for word processing (fortunately for WordPerfect, wp can also be a
reminder of WordPerfect) 

wpg - a filename extension which indicates a WordPerfect graphic.

WWW -
World Wide Web, also known as the Web and W3, is a GUI interface for finding
things on the Internet. WWW has similar goals to "gophers," with the added
feature of hypertext links. WWW generally requires a little more hardware than
text-based gophers. Refer to the August 1994 issue of the Communication of the
ACM for a special article on WWW.

WYSIWYG - an acronym for "What You See Is What You Get"

XGA -
Extended Graphics Array board which can achieve up to 65,536 colors with
special equipment.  It has appeared in some of the IBM PS/2 series computers
and has a resolution of up to 1024 by 768 pixels.  The evolution to XGA has
been CGA, EGA, VGA, Super VGA, then XGA.

zeitgeist -
the intellectual, moral, and cultural milieu of the times.

zone punches - 
12,11 and 0 on Hollerith punched cards, used in combination with a numeric
digit punch to represent an alphabetic character.

zooming effects - in computer graphics, the visual effects which are produced
by mapping successively smaller windows onto a viewport.

zot - a term for an underscore character (_).
